2
TRAVELING. MENTALLY AND BODILY.
It
is a wholesome thing to be what is commonly
termed kicked about the world. Not literally
kickednot forcibly propelled by innumerable
feet from village to village, from town to town, or
from country to country, which can be neither
wholesome nor agreeable; but knocked about,
tossed about, irregularly jostled over the principal
portions of the two hemispheres; sleeping hard
and soft, living well when you can, and learning
to take what is barely edible and potable
ungrumblingly
when there is no help for it. Certes, the
departure from home and old usages is any thing
but pleasant, especially at the outset. It is a sort of
secondary weaning which the juvenile has to
undergo
;
but like the first process, he is all the
healthier
and hardier when it is over. In this way, it is
a wholesome thing to be tossed about the world.
To form odd acquaintance in ships, on the decks of
steam boats and tops of coaches; to pick up
temporary
companions on turnpikes or by hedge-sides;
to see humanity in the rough, and learn what stuff
life is made of in different places; to mark the
shades and points of distinction in men, manners,
customs, cookery, and other important matters as
you stroll along. What an universal toleration it
begets! How it improves and enlarges a man's
physical and intellectual tastes and capacities! How
diminutively local and ridiculously lilliputian seem
his former experiences! He is now no longer
bigotted
to a doctrine or a dish, but can fall in with
one, or eat of the other, however strange and
foreign
,
with a facility that is truly comfortable and
commendable: always, indeed, excepting, such
doctrines as affect the feelings and sentiments, which
he should ever keep garner'd up in his heart of
hearts; and also, always excepting the swallowing
of certain substances, so very peculiar in themselves,
and so strictly national, that the undisciplined
palate of the foreigner instinctively and utterly
rejects them, such as the frog of your Frenchman
the garlic of your Spaniardthe compounds termed
sausages of your Cockneythe haggis of your
Scotchmanthe train-oil of your Russian.
He has but little of the ardent spirit of boyhood,
or the mounting spirit of manhood in him, who can
quietly seat himself by his father's hearth, dear
though it be, until that hearth, by virtue of
inheritance
becomes his own, without a wish to see how
the world wags beyond the walls of his native
town. How mulish and uncompromising he
groweth
up! How very indocile and incredulous he
becometh! To him localities are truthsright is
wrong and wrong is right, just as they fall in with
or differ from the customs of his district; and all
that is rare or curious or strange or wonderful or
different from what he has been accustomed to, is
measured by the petty standard of his own
experience
,
and dogmatically censured or praised
accordingly
.
Such men are incurable, and what is worse,
legal nuisancesthey can neither be abated by law
nor logic.
I like human nature of quite a different
pattern
.
A boy, especially, is all the better for a
strong infusion of credulity in his composition. He
should swallow an hyperbole unhesitatingly, and
digest it without difficulty. It is better for a
juvenile
to be ingenuous than ingenious. It is better
for him to study Baron Munchausen than Poor
Richard's Maxims. The Baron's inventions fertilize
his imagination without injuring his love of truth;
Poor Richard's truisms teach him nothing but that
cold worldly wisdom he is almost sure to learn, and
learn too soon. Strong drink is not for babes and
sucklings; neither is miserly, hard-hearted proverbs
a penny saved is a penny earneda groat a
day is a pound a year, and such like arithmetical
wisdom. Keep it from them: it takes the edge
off their young sensibilities, and sets them
calculating
their charities. They will learn selfishness soon
enough without taking regular lessons. The good
Samaritan, honest man, cared not a fig-leaf for such
axioms, or he too would have passed by on the
other side.
Not that I mean to question the utility of
arithmetical
studies for children, or inculcate the neglect
of worthy proficients or professors therein. Hutton,
Tinwell, Bonnycastle, or more ancient Cocker;
far from it, I have too severely ere now experienced
the ill-effects of slighting the multiplication table
and other loftier branches of arithmetic; but I could
not then help it. I was a great traveler when a
boy, though not in the body; in imagination I
had circumnavigated the globe. A book of voyages
and travels was to me better than a holiday, and I
devoured the pages of Wallis, Cartwright, Byron,
and other navigators with an appetite that now
seems to me to have been really preternatural. How
I used to trudge away, not unwillingly to school, if
I had only Robinson Crusoe (which was then a
most veritable and authentic document) smuggled
2*
away in my satchel amidst grammars, dictionaries,
and other necessary and disagreeable productions.
Then Cook's Voyages! What an ocean of pleasure
to me were his ocean wanderings! How did they
divide, or rather completely abstract my faculties
from subtraction, multiplication, or division (short
or long)! I was sailing far away, in the good ship
Endeavor, over the illimitable Pacific,what were
vulgar fractions to me? I coasted through the
Friendly Islands and took no heed of decimals;
and, as far at least as I was concerned, arithmetical
progression became stationary. I might be
ostensibly
in practice; but my practice was to go on
indulging
in stolen sweets from morn till noon, from
noon till dewey eve, until the awful hour of
retribution
arrived, and I was called upon to exhibit the
sum total of my day's industry. This generally
consisted of one or more questions cabbaged or
stolen from some of my precursors in those
difficulties
.
Sometimes they passed muster; but oh! the
opaque darknessthe cheerless, hopeless, mental
blindness in which I found myself enveloped
whenever
my worthy teacher requested me to show how
I came by the answer. How I came by it in one
sensehow improperly and feloniously I came by
it, I knew full well; but as for establishing any
legitimate claim to the product, as for showing by
any given process how the answer could be
correctly
deduced from the premises, it was only a
waste of his time and mine to request such a thing.
Then poor left hand, came thy trialnot for thine
own demerits but for mine, fell blows from supple
cane or leathern thong right heavily on thee! Many
a blush and bruise La Perouse and Captain Cook
cost theeill-used memberunfortunate extremity.
But I was incorrigible. Blows and admonitions
were equally unavailable. I did not see or feel the
moral justice of either one or the other; they were
to me things of coursenecessities, not judicious
punishments; inevitable consequences, which must
be endured and could not be avoided, and the next
day I was again amongst my old friends the
islanders
,
tattooing warriors, roasting dogs and marvelling
how such strange flesh would eat when cooked,
or performing any other equally curious or
ingenious
operations. When not reading I was
dreaming
.
From the hubbub of the school I could
transport
myself in a twinkling to some fair Otaheitan
islesome speck of verdure that lit the ocean with
a smile, where summer, and gentle gales, and
beauteous flowers, and odoriferous species were
perpetual
;
and there, where feathery cocoas fring'd
the bay, would I lay myself down and watch the
breaking of the waves upon the sparkling shore,
until the tumbling of a slate or book, or the harsh
growl of the master, startled me from my day-dream
and brought me to a sense of things more
immediate
and material. But I possessed in a high degree
the happy faculty of abstractiona faculty that can
transplant you in an instant from the dullest scenes
and company to the brightest and gayestand in a
few moments I was again all abroadlistening
to the roar of Niagarascrambling over the blue
mountains of Jamaicalolling in the orange groves
of the Indies,until, after years of wandering I
would fancy myself returning to anxious friends
and old companions.
When the flower was in the bud, and the leaf upon the tree,
With the lark to sing me hame to my ain countree.
What was the petty pain of a few blows (I never
felt the disgrace) to such visions of delight?
Nothing
.
And so I continueda boy inured to stripes,
and utterly destitute of all marks or orders of merit
the tail of my classthe superlative degree of
comparison for idleness and inability. No
specimen
of my proficency in the art of chirography was
ever exhibited before company in the parlor of my
parents; nor
When friends were met, and goblets crown'd,
was I ever called upon, like other boys, to
exemplify
the beauties of the British Poets by my juvenile
powers of recitation.
I have traveled much in reality since then, and
beheld with the corporeal eye many of the scenes
and places that looked so surpassingly fair to my
inward vision in former times. I have become
familiar with strange faces, and have made
friends and acquaintance in far-off countries. But
time and the world have done their usual work
with me as with others. I am changedvilely
sophisticated; the smoke of cities is upon my soul,
and innumerable trivial sensualities have
imperceptibly
clogged the elastic spring of the spirit within
me. To enjoy the company of old mother nature
now, I must have all appliances and means to
bootbe easy and comfortable, neither hungry nor
athirst, instead of seeking her in every form and
mood as of yore. But this is the way, more or
less, with us all. As we grow up, we acquire an
unconscious preference for art above naturewe
love the country less and the town more, and shady
walks and hedge rows green are forsaken for
well-paved
streets and public promenades. We muddle
our brains with politics and political economy, and
form attachments to newspapers and distilled and
fermented liquors that it is often difficult to shake off.
Oh the lamentable deterioration of human nature!
We are the antipodes (to our disadvantage,) of even
the despised caterpillar tribe. We do not expand from
the grub into the butterfly, but degenerate from the
butterfly into the grub. When boysor wingless
butterflies,we disport in the free air and sunshine,
clad in the hues of health, and as free from care or
trouble as the lilies of the field. Every returning
day brings animation and enjoyment
Flowers in the valley, splendor in the beam,
Health in the gale, and freshness in the stream,
until the remorseless usages of the world
apprentice
us to doctors, tailors, lawyers, merchants,
shipwrights
,
sugar-bakers, &c. to be initiated into their
respective mysteries; we grow up to be sallow,
bearded menwe herd together in citieswe
monotonously
slink day after day from the dull
obscurity
of our dwellings through dirty lanes and dusky
alleys to our strange occupations, and then crawl
back again  we snarl at and undermine each
otherwe play with unbecoming zeal much ado
about nothing for a few yearswe die some day
just when we did not want to do sothe living clod
is resolved into the lifeless one, and we becomea
dream, a recollection, a dimly-remembered thing,
of whom perchance, some singular custom or odd
saying is recorded, at intervals, for a brief space of
time, and then (to all worldly intents and purposes)
we are as if we had never been!
There is, however, to counterbalance the many
pleasures and advantages of traveling, one peculiar
unpleasant sensation, which nearly all who have
journeyed must have felt. It is, in passing away
from any place where you have been warmly
welcomed
and hospitably treatedwhere you have
interchanged good offices, and eat and drank and
held pleasant communion with kindly pieces of
humanitythe thought that you pass away for
everthat you will see then no more! Their joys
or sorrows, their smiles or tears, are thenceforward
nothing to youyou have no further portion in
themyou will know them no more! It is, in truth,
a most unpleasant feeling; but a man had better
suffer from it, than be without it. I do not,
however
,
relish that easily excited, indiscriminating
kindness, awakened on every occasion; that
unvarying
civilitythat ready-made sympathy so
common in this world of ours. I dislike your polite
smilers, on first acquaintance; fellows who will
shake you by the hand, bow, and smile at meeting;
and shake you by the hand, bow, and smile at
parting, with equal indifference. Though not
altogether to be commended, I rather prefer their
oppositesthe race of unapproachables; persons of
cloudy and uninviting aspects, who station
themselves
in the less frequented parts of steamboats,
and odd corners of stage-coaches; who speak when
they cannot help it, and with whom a civil sentence
seems the prelude to suffocation. When the ice is
once broken, when you
do
get acquainted with
them, there is often much good fruit under the
rough rind; and when the time for separating
arrives, they look half sulky, half sorrowful, as they
give you their handas much as to say, we
might
have been better friends, but your road lies that
wayand mine this, and sogood-by. I would
be bail for one of those personages; I would put
my hand to a bond for him, (which I look upon to
be the extreme test of human confidence,) but for
your ever-ready smilers, they have, in general, no
more heart than an infantile cabbageall leaves
and husk, husk and leaveslet no such men be
trusted.
DEBATING SOCIETIES.
There are many evils in the present state of society, which it is much
easier to censure than eradicate.
Modern Moralist
.
One
of the most pernicious mischiefs of the
present
times, and one most pregnant with the seeds of
individual discomfort and general unhappiness, is
the rapid increase of Debating Societies; or,
rather
,
societies for the annoyance of the community
night-schools for the education of youth in
flippancy
and sophistryseminaries for the full
developement
of the organ of self-sufficiencyarenas
for the exposure of the weakness of the human
intellect, and the depreciation of heaven's creatures
in the opinion of all considerate people. These
excrescences are springing into existence on every
side, and are productive of the most lamentable
consequences
.
When I see (as I have seen) a meek,
diffident juvenile of eighteen or nineteen, of the right
age to imbibe wholesome, quiet wisdom and
nutritious
instructionseduced from his darling books,
and peaceful solitary chamber, to attend one of those
VOL. I. 3
pestiferous places, where, what they call
questions
,
are regularly discussed; when I see such an
one led on, step by step, by a little empty applause,
to exchange the modest diffidence that would gladly
learn, for the misplaced confidence that would
boldly teach, until he becomes, in the course of
time, a confirmed, hardened debater, lost to all sense
of shame and idea of proprietya perpetual
torment
to his more immediate relatives and
connections
,
and an unceasing nuisance to all the other
members of the great human family with whom he
may be brought into juxtaposition, I confess I
cannot
but feel a strong distaste for those reprehensible
nurseries for bad speeches and worse arguments.
Reader! didst thou ever misspend a few hours at
a debating society? If so, then hast thou seen
pitiful ambition in all its infinite varieties, and
almost every stage and degree of folly, froth, and
fatuity. How didst thou preserve thy serenity?
Thou mightst have looked, indeed, with calm,
contemplative
benevolence on some piece of
leadenheaded
ignorance, who, after a week's cogitation,
gravely and seriously set about building up a
reputation
by announcing that virtue was its own
and best reward, vice eventually its own
punishment
,
and other similar originalities; but there is
a species of reptile to be met with in those
congregations
of raw intellects, that is, to me at least,
peculiarly and distressingly repulsive. It is
generally
in the shape of a good-looking, smooth-faced,
self-sufficient, young gentleman, the leader, the
looked-up-to of the society, one skilled in quibbles,
quotations, and paradoxes; who thinks truth
beneath
his advocacy, and makes a point of taking
what is called the
difficult
side of the question,
in order to show off his surplusage of uncommon
qualities, by confuting his humble satellites, who
ingloriously content themselves with a homely,
obvious view of the matter in dispute. I am not
naturally blood-thirsty; but still, when I have seen
an unwholesome piece of mortality of this kind get
up, all smirk, amiability, politeness, and
complacency
,
to refute, in the most urbane manner, some
truism lineally descended from Shem, Ham, or
Japhet, or, it may be, antediluvian, I confess I have
felt the destructive principle rising within meI
have acknowledged my consanguinity to CainI
havebut no man is bound to be his own accuser.
Our worser thoughts heaven mend.
Yet there are people who contend that these dens
for the dislocation of grammar, for the maltreatment
of metaphors, and the ill-usage of all tropes and
figures whatsoever, these very debating societies,
are not only perfectly innocuous, but positively
beneficial
;
that they sharpen the tongues and faculties
of young men; that they accustom them to view
matters dispassionately, and examine both sides of
a subject; that they keep them, in some degree,
from theatres, taverns, billiard-tables, and other
immortalities
;
and that, moreover, they are a sort of
preparatory schools, wherein incipient legislators
may perfect themselves in declamation,
mystification
,
equivocation, and other indispensable requisites
for wordy war in after life. Oh misjudging fathers
of families! Is it more pernicious, think you, for
your offspring to injure the coats of their stomachs
by quaffing tumblers of brandy punch at a tavern,
than to sully their immortal minds by nightly
draughts of quibbles and sophistry? Is it worse to
play a straight hazard at a billard table, than to
learn habitually to undervalue truth, treating her
like a play-thinga shuttlecockto be bandied to
and fro as suits their convenience? Is it worse for
them to sit in a theatre and hear the divine poetry
of Shakspeare appropriately recited, than to be
listening
to the dull speculations, or inflated bombast
of raw juveniles; or worse than that, perchance,
being themselves actively engaged in damaging the
English language, their vernacular, their respected
maternal or mother tongue? Is the quarrel scene
between Brutus and Cassius less to the purpose
than a fiery altercation between Master Cicero
Timkins
and Master Demosthenes Simkins? Answer.
But are these things so? exclaims some
unsuspecting
,
kind-hearted father, or some amiable
mother
,
aroused, for the first time, to a sense of the
danger
of her darling child, who has recently joined one
of those associations, and in whom she has latterly
remarked, with sorrow of heart, unequivocal
symptoms
of obtrusiveness in company, and a rapid
development
of the organs of obstinacy and self-will.
Trust me, dear madam, they are, and must of
necessity be so. I am not trifling with you. I am
no giddy boy, writing for a thimble-full of local
notoriety, but am myself a parent (of some six
weeks standing); and though of the more obtuse
(where feeling is concerned) or masculine gender,
know how to enter into a fond mother's fears on
such an occasion. Trust me, where one boy is
benefited by such societies, hundreds are injured
in their intellects, their morals, or their tempers.
Where one over-bashful youth is inoculated with
a little becoming self-possession, hundreds acquire a
degree of audacity, repulsive even in those who
have arrived at whiskers, but perfectly shocking in
persons of tender years; who, by the yet unstiffened
down upon their cheeks and chins, are reasonably
expected to be patterns of meekness and
acquiescence
.
3*
But this is only a portion of the evils produced
by such unwholesome hotbeds for the forcing of
the intellect. The other natural consequences are
overweening pride, inflated notions of self, together
with contradictious, acrimonious, disputative habits,
which irresistibly prompt the unhappy possessors to
injure their friends, neighbors and acquaintance, by
committing, as it were, moral assaults upon them;
waylaying and deluding them, unawares, into
out-of-the-way
controversies, knocking them down with
arguments or quotations, and then rifling them of
their quietude and peace of mind, and otherwise
maltreating and abusing them. Is such conduct
commendable? Is it decent? My dear madam, if
you would not have your son become a piece of
unmixed
impertinencean unamiabilitya
flatulency
an
after-dinner annoyance and a tea-table curse,
keep him away from debating societies.
After this affecting appeal, I think I see you turn
to your first-born, and, with tears in your eyes,
exclaim
Oh, Ralph Nicholas, my love, go no more to
that
placeit will not, and it cannot come to good.
Madam, hand this lucubration across the table to
him, and conviction will stare him in the face; he
will yet be saved; and in the words of some great
moralist, I will not have
written
altogether in vain.
But to take, as the newspapers say, a more
enlarged and comprehensive view of the subject.
These abominations are spreading themselves with
awful rapidity over every section of the country.
In cities they abound, and are of every degree, from
bad to execrable. But worse than this: even in
the most (apparently) calm and sequestered villages
sanctuaries for retirement and contemplation and
solemn thoughtsthe demon of debate has
established
a president's chair; and the propounding
and discussion of questions are carried on by the
rustics with a vigor and pertinacity that argue any
thing but well for the peace and quiet of the
neighborhood
.
Really, unless some remedial measures
be adopted, habitual disputation may become
general
,
and no man be safe. But what chiefly
alarms me, who partly believe in the transmission
of peculiar qualities of mind, as well as body, from
generation to generation, is, that this diseasethis
moral blotch of wrangling and debating, becomes
rooted in the system; that what in our children is
only an acquired habit, may, in their children, and
their children's children, be a natural propensity!
I will be gathered to my fathers long ere that, and
therefore, cannot be supposed to be influenced by
any personal feeling in speaking thus; but, good
heavens! should it become hereditary! Then,
indeed
,
may the peaceable and well-disposed of
afteryears
those
who have escaped the taintbe
emphatically
said to have fallen on evil days, and
then will they exclaim, in the agony of their
outraged
quiet,
Oh, for a lodge in some vast wilderness!
Some boundless contiguity of shade!
But, perhaps, I am mournfully anticipative.
Providence
grant it may be so. But no means should
be left untried to check the evil.
I will apostrophize; perchance it may act as a
dissuasive.
Oh, tender, callow youth, of sixteen and upwards,
listen! A voice from the olden time, even that of
the wisest among men, calleth unto theemy
son, get wisdom, and with all thy getting get
understanding
;
and that thou may'st do so,
discountenance
those talking, turbulent, truculent
associations
for the effusion of the froth and scum of
oratory; eschew hot and bitter disputationseek
not for truth amid wrangles, and quibbles, and
disingenuous
paradoxesconsort not with such as
deal in them; but hie thee to thy silent chamber
and choose thy companions from the immortals,
from the demigods of thy land's language. Look
now, in this small room, what a goodly company
hast thou assembled around thee. What a
congregation
of wits, sages, poets, and philosophers; and
all willing to be known to thy poor self.
Insignificant
as thou art, how familiar may'st thou be with
Shakspeare, if it so please thee! John Milton will
not refuse thy acquaintance. Here is Swift, too,
divested of his rudeness; and Pope of his
pettishness
;
and glorious John; and Ben Jonson and
Sam Johnson, who take no offence whatever at the
unceremonious abbreviation of their baptismal
cognomens
.
If you wish to laugh, here are Butler
and Smollett, two right pleasant fellows, who will
speedily furnish you with an occasion; if you are
more attuned unto the melting mood, here are
Gray and Collins similarly disposed; and if you
are so unreasonable as to desire to laugh and cry
in the same breath, you can be accommodated, for
here is Laurence Sterne; and here, too, are witty
Farquhar, and wittier Congreve; and
kindly-hearted
Oliver Goldsmith; and meek, melancholius
Cowper; and blithe, honest, ill-used Robie Burns;
and I know not how many more true-hearted,
sound-headed fellows, merry and wise, such as
the antique Roman or the Greek, or all that lived
before the days of good Queen Bess, never had
the honor of keeping company with. If you are
ambitious of an acquaintance with the leading
literary
characters of your own times, here are Scott
Rogers, Campbell, Moore, &c. ready to waive the
ceremony of a formal introduction in your favor.
Are all these advantagesthese opportunities of
keeping the best of company, to be lightly
slighted
?
Neglect them, and you will walk through the
world an idealess biped; cultivate them, and when
you go forth amid the mass of mortals, you will
see with eyes that they see not with, and hear with
ears that they hear not with; and, whether in the
crowded city or the solitary plain, the glittering
ballroom
or the smoky cabin; amid the tumult of
society
or the silence of nature, you will, at all times,
and on all occasions, have it in your power to reap
The harvest of a quiet eye,
That broods on its own heart!
RESPECTABILITY.
Respectability
! Mysterious word! indefinite
term! phantom! Who will presume to say
authoritatively
what thou art? What metaphysician or
mental chemist will analyze thee, and expound to
the world the curious substance or essence of which
thou art composed? Where is the lexicographer
gifted with powers, subtle and fine as the spider's
thread, to define thee accurately, satisfactorily, so
that the general voice shall cry aloud, that
is
the
meaning of the word; and every individual whisper
to his neighbor, that was
my
meaning. As for
the explanations of the existing race of dictionaries,
they are mere evasions of the question.
About the boldest and most decided opinion
concerning
this particle of the English language that I
am acquainted with, was that given by a witness in
a swindling transaction, who, on being asked by
the judge his reason for affirming that the defendant
was a respectable man, replied, that he kept a
gig. There is something in the unhesitating and
undoubting confidence of this answer, that carries
weight with it. The witness was well acquainted
with the defendant's moral obliquities; he knew
that he had long been worthy the attention of the
laws of his country; he knew, moreover, that he
was only enabled to maintain this two-wheeled
vehicle by a constant infringement of the right of
meum
and
tuum
; he knew, in short, that he was
rich by good management and unhanged by good
luck; but still, there was no getting over the simple
facthe kept his gig; and so long as he
did
keep
it, nothing could impugn his respectability in the
mind of the witness. Yet, before we unthinkingly
laugh at this man's tenacious adherence to his
beau
ideal
of respectability, let us cautiously examine our
own thoughts on the subject. A gig
is
respectable.
A curricle may be dashinga phaeton stylisha
carriage genteel, lofty, magnificentbut a gig is
respectable
par excellence
. Yet, of itself, and
independent
of other circumstances, it does not wholly
and safely constitute respectability, and here lies
the difficulty. It is not all in allthere's the rub,
or the question might be settled. Besides, its
condition
must be looked to. It may be badly lined,
and worse painted; the shafts and wheels may be
in ill-condition; it may, in fact, have a
disreputable
appearance rather than otherwise; it may be
second-handed. All these apparently trivial, but in
reality essential circumstances, are to be taken into
account before we can definitively pronounce upon
the respectability of the possessor; and it behoves
us to be cautious; for, to a nice mind, ardently
engaged
in the pursuit of truth, a hair-breadth
distinction
is found, at times, more obstinately
irreconcileable
than a more manifest discrepancy.
Respectability! All-pervading power! like light
and life, thou art everywhere; or, at the least,
wherever civilization is, there art thou to be found,
despotically ruling the minds of men of every grade
and station, from the doctor to the dustmanfrom
the lawyer to the laborer. But of all the devotees,
none, I think, worship thee with the fervorthe
intenseness of shopkeepers and small tradesmen.
Thou art their idoltheir oracle! They consult
thee in all they do or say, or in whatever in any
shape appertains to them. Thou art ever
uppermost
in their thoughts, and there is no sacrifice too
great for them to makeno deprivation too severe
for them to endure, rather than to be banished
either in reality, or in the opinion of the world,
from thy presence. But though this race of
people
are more peculiarly thine own, millions of others
put in their claim of kindred to thee on some trivial
pretext or other. Thou hast more distant relations
VOL. I. 4
than a Scotchman likely to do well in the world,
even though his name be Campbell. And it is
curious
to mark the different ways in which thy
multitudinous
kith and kin infer a connection. Some
are respectable by descent, some by dress, some by
the situation of the dwellings in which they have
temporarily located themselves. A man in very
low circumstances, if he has no better claim, is
consanguineous on the strength of a hat with a
brim, or a stocking without a hole two precious
items in a poor man's eye; the spruce mechanic's
dapper coat, or his wife's silk gown, leave no doubt
in his own eyes at least, how closely he is allied;
the small tradesman's snug house, tiny flower-spot
before the door, and neat green railings, distinctly
mark him for thine own; while the more
aristocratical
storekeeper in the wholesale or large retail
way, getting above business, successful ship-brokers,
cotton-speculators, lottery-office keepers, and other
anomalies, forgetful of all thou hast done for them,
look above thee, and creep into the back ranks of
gentility and fashion, where they remain neither
fish nor fleshgenteel in their own estimation,
simply respectable in that of their neighbors.
Some men neglect their personal appearance, and
concentrate their claims to respectability in a brass
knocker, a plate with their name engraved thereon,
venetian blinds, or any other pretty additament to
their domiciles; others are respectable by virtue of
their connexions; others by going to the private
boxes at the theatre; others by a pew next the
parson
at church; others by the people they visit;
others by having every thing in season. Yet,
difficult
as it is for the mind of man to comprehend all
these things, and to decide properly and justly, the
women, taking advantage of their superior powers
of penetration, and delicacy of discrimination, divide
and subdivide respectability as easily as
quicksilver
.
They have their respectable
sort of
people
very respectablehighly respectableextremely
respectable
most
respectable, which makes the
thing about as difficult to understand or explain,
as political economy or electro-magnetism. Indeed,
there are some men, otherwise not deficient in
intellect
,
who never have even a glimmering of light
upon the subject. Think of the more than
Egyptian
darkness of Robert Burns, for instancemark
his heterodoxies,
What though on hamely fare we dine,
Wear hodden gray and a' that,
Gie fools their silk, and knaves their wine,
A man's a man for a' that.
No, sir,
he
is not a man; he is only a poor devil.
Or, grant that he is so by courtesy, what is a man
in these times, unless he is respectable according to
some
of the floating laws and regulations on the
subject? Oh, better had he ne'er been born! for,
as the Persian sage justly remarkethhe shall
drink of the waters of bitterness all the days of his
life, and his bread shall be as ashes in his mouth;
his face shall be near unto the earth, and he shall
be so small that his friends will look over his head
and see him not, even though the day be light
and his shadow shall be less than the shadow of a
dog, or of a Russian, whom God destroy!
Respectability is in and over all things. There
are respectable substances to eat, and drink, and
wear; there are respectable towns and streets and
situationsfor men and houses. There is a shade
of respectability in colors. A black coat is more
respectable than a brown onea white
handkerchief
decidedly more so than a red one. Why this
is we cannot tell, we only know that it is so.
One of the immutable laws of nature is, that
doctors and lawyers shall wear black coats and
white handkerchiefs, and perhaps to this, in a large
degree, is owing the respectability which is so
generally
conceded to those bodies. I speak not here
of lawyerlings and doctorlingsboys with scarcely
a tinge of their profession, who are injudiciously
abandoned in those matters to their own weak
judgments and perverted tastes, and who
consequently
go abroad in josephean garments of many
colors, but of full-grown responsible men of law
and physic. Who would trust a life or a lawsuit
of any importance to one of either profession in a
pea-green coat, fancy waistcoat, and colored
handkerchief
?
the idea is preposterous. There is more
in those black and white habiliments than the
unthinking
dream of.
4 *
A FEW OF THE INCONVENIENCES OF SEEING
SHAKSPEARE ACTED.
In
the mass of miscellaneous reading that is
constantly
meeting the eye and passing from the
memory
,
you occasionally meet with a remark or odd
saying of an adhesive qualitylike a burr it will
stick. It is long ago since the following came in
my way; so long, indeed, that I have forgotten the
precise form of words in which the meaning was
couched, but the purport of the sentence was
that Shakspeare lost by representation in the same
proportion that others gained by it;that the one
was like a spruce apprentice set off by his Sunday
clothesthe other like Apollo tricked out by a
tailor
.
I dare say the same thought has struck many
a man after reading or seeing Shakspeare, and been
illustrated by many men in many modes before
this time; still, let the reapers and gleaners go ever
so carefully over the field, there are always some
few stray ears to be picked up by a straggler
patches, remnants of the bounteous harvest that
has already been gathered in by the first in the
field. Nevertheless, that is no good reason why a
poor plodder in the stubble should be discouraged.
Let him gather together as he best may what others
have passed by, and see that it be sound and
wholesome
neither
blighted nor mildewed; let those
laugh that have little better to do at his
unostentatious
handful.
In speaking of the inconveniences of seeing
Shakspeare acted, let us pass by, in quiet
resignation
,
the more purely imaginative of his playshis
Tempest, and Midsummer Night's Dream.
These wild and delicate pieces of fancy were never
intended for the hard handling and business
calculations
of stage managers and their underlings. A
summer's day would be all too short to detail the
strange wrong, the mutilation, the degradation they
suffer on the stage. Their delicious poetry should
be for the hours of privacy alone; and even then,
a man should not trust himself to read some of the
passages in the latter play (or dream) aloud; they
are of too fine a texture for the harsh human voice,
and should be imbibed and conveyed to the senses
by the eye alone. But to hear them in a theatre!
To have them remorselessly bellowed forth from
the foot-lamps by the lumps of clay who do
the scavenger work of the drama, is absolutely
terrible! It is worse than assassinating Handel or
Mozart with a bagpipe, or playing Hadyn's
symphonies
on a hurdy-gurdy! And yet, what will
not mortals attempt? The most of us have actually
heard a stage
Bottom
issue such directions as these
to some silly, fat, flobby child in white or green
Monsieur Cobweb; good monsieur, get your
weapons
in your hand, and kill me a red-hipped
humble
bee on the top of a thistle; and good monsieur,
bring me the honey-bag. Do not fret yourself too
much in the action, monsieur; and good monsieur,
have a care that the honey-bag break not; I would
be loth to have you overflown with a honey-bag,
signior; while Moth, Peas-blossom, Mustard-seed,
and the other elves who
Creep into acorn cups and hide them there,
have been represented by the brothers and sisters
of Cobweb, the juvenile produce and property of
some industrious matron connected with the
establishment
.
This is as bad as Snout, the joiner,
representing the wall. And with all our vaunted
improvements in stage decoration, how much worse
off was the poor Athenian company for their lion,
and wall, and moonshine, than the unfortunate
modern scene-painter or property-man, who is called
upon by the text to furnish a bank as per order?
I know a bank whereon the wild thyme blows,
Where ox-lips and the nodding violet grows;
Quite over-canopied with lush woodbine,
With sweet musk roses and with eglantine:
There sleeps Titania.
No! there are scenes and materials about the
Tempest which may, in some slight degree,
excuse
its introduction on the stage, and atone for the
manifold barbarities committed upon it when there;
but never let the Midsummer Night's Dream
that fine filmthat pure abstractionthat delicate
fret-work of an ethereal imagination, have a
tangible
existence.
Let us pass to the common acting plays
Macbeth
.
You are sitting by the fire on a winter's
evening, wrapped in the perusal of this
masterpiece
of nature's masterpiece, preparatory to visiting
the theatre to see it played. In your mind's eye you
perceive the blasted heath, the scene of Macbeth's
temptation, sterile and wild, covered with masses of
primeval and herbless granite, and untenanted
save by the lonely plover or shy and solitary
moorcock
.
Beside some rude cairn are clustered the
weird sisters, posters of the sea and land,
recounting
their exploits, and holding devilish
consultation
;
in the distance is the army of Macbeth.
There is a bleak and gloomy grandeur in the
picture
you have drawn, and you hasten to the theatre
to have it realized. Does not your enthusiasm
receive
a shock? Before you is some old, confined
wood-scene used on all occasions, with Macbeth
and Banquo, the three beldames, and divers
ill-drilled
supernumeraries huddled together in most
unseemly proximity; while the hags, so wither'd
and so wild in their attire, are generally
represented
(for what reason managers only know) by
three low comedians, for the most part hearty,
plump, oleaginous personages, with whom all sorts
of odd, out-of-the-way associations are connected,
in patched red and tartan petticoats, and stationed
in the full glare of the gas-lamps! True, some of
this cannot be remedied; but much of it might,
were a tithe part of the money and attention
directed
towards it that is wasted on some gaud or
pantomime; and much that is now vulgar,
common-place
and ridiculous, might, by the aid of a
little liberality and common-sense, be rendered
grand and impressive. But the managers think
that Shakspeare may be used and abused after any
fashion; that he has stamina for any thing; and
they think right, though they act wrong. Scenery,
machinery, dresses and decorations, however,
may
be amended, that's comfort, yet; but alas! what
mental millwrightwhat skilful machinist, will
put in order and wind up the talking machines that
do the subordinate parts about the theatre to the
true Shaksperian pitch, and set them a-going for
the night! Is the schoolmaster yet abroad ordained
to shed a ray of light upon their benighted
understandings
concerning the meaning of the author,
or make them sensible of the simple but important
fact, that blank verse is not prose, and ought to be
spoken differently? Here it is where our great
dramatic poet principally suffers. The exuberant
genius of Shakspeare could not stoop to petty
calculations
.
It never entered into his thoughts what
unimaginative pieces of mortality would, in after
times, give utterance to the glorious poetry that is
scattered indiscriminately over his pages. Small
occasion had he to play the niggard, and carefully
apportion out his sweet fancies and rare conceits to
those who would be likely to give the most effect
in the representation; and hence it is that the
Goodmen Dulls of the theatrethe honest
plodding
gentlemen with small salaries and
corresponding
capacities, who, in other authors, have language
admirably adapted to their modes of thinking and
expression put into their mouths, have frequently,
when doing their work in subordinate characters in
Shakspeare, to utter passages redolent with beauty,
which they do in a way that very satisfactorily
shows these imperfect speakers have little
occasion
to thank the gods for having made them
poetical
.
Of all Shakspeare's characters there are not any
so systematically ill-used as these same witches in
Macbeth. It has been thought by many who
know something of the matter, that there are a
wildness
and sublimity in the character and attributes
of those malignant hags, that are perfectly
inapproachable
by any one below Shakspeare's calibre.
And, be it noted, they are not only of wondrous
import of themselves, but the mainspring of all the
principal events in the great drama to which they
belong. The talent and intellect of the greatest
ornaments the stage has produced, would not be
misapplied in
endeavoring
to give an adequate
idea of these strange and fantastical creations. Yet
what are they at present? Three old women,
absolute
objects of mockery and laughter to the
audience
.
Nay, this seems, in some degree, to be now
their legitimate purpose; for it is not unfrequently
the case, that when the spectators are more
decorous
than usual, some of the witches, by a grotesque
action or ridiculous intonation, appeal to them for
the customary tributea hearty laugh! But it is
not always the actors who are in fault. There is
one thing which has always especially moved my
admiration. It is the marvellous small provocative
to laughter which people require when congregated
together in large bodies, and when it is quite clear
they should do any earthly thing rather than laugh.
Here, for instance, where the most solemn attention
and breathless anxiety should pervade the house
First Witch
.
Look what I have!
Second Witch
.
Show me! show me!
Third Witch
.
Here I have a pilot's thumb
Wreck'd as he did homeward come.
Second Witch
.
A drum! a drum! Macbeth doth come
Upon this hint, if it be a favorite actor that is
expected
,
a universal uproar or
row
commences, which
lasts until Macbeth comes swaggering and bowing
down the stage. If it be not any great or novel
favorite that personates the hero, the scene proceeds
in the following lively manner:
Third Witch
.
The weird sisters, hand in hand,
Posters of the sea and land,
Thus do go about, about,
Thrice to thine.
Here the first witch, as a part of the incantation,
bows or nods her head thrice, and a general smile
instantly suffuses the faces of a majority of those
present, in boxes, pit, and gallery, which
indisputably
proves that nodding the head thrice is
essentially
and exquisitely comic. The second witch
continues and thrice to thine, suiting the action
VOL. I. 5
to the word, upon which a general titter ensues.
But when the third witch, in obedience to the line,
and thrice again to make up nine, nods thrice
more, the great merriment of the audience can no
longer be contained, and Peace! the charm's
wound up, is uttered amid a roar of laughter. By
day and night, but this is wondrous strange.
Certes, it would be a merry treat for Voltaire, the
blasphemer of Shakspeare, to see many parts of
Macbeth acted.
On the stage, in the garbled selection designated
Richard III. how much do we miss, or rather, what
a one-sided view is presented to us of the hero.
There is no relief in the character, it is scarcely
Shaksperian, for it is unmixed evil. All the darker
shades are deepened, and brought prominently
forward
:
and the lighter and more agreeable tints
sedulously excluded from the picture. We have
the hunchback, the bottled spider, the subtle
tyrant, the hypocrite, and the murderer, at full
length; but we miss the lively animated Richard,
the blunt, quick-witted soldier, the accomplished
courtier, the princely Gloster, such as he is to be
found in Shakspeare. We miss all his bitter, though
pleasant and not altogether unmerited gibes and
jeers at King Edward, his wife, and her relations
We speak no treason, man; we say, the king
Is wise and virtuous; and his noble queen
Well struck in years; fair, and not jealous:
We say that Shore's wife hath a pretty foot,
A cherry lip,
A bonny eye, a passing pleasing tongue;
And the queen's kindred are made gentlefolks:
How say you, sir; can you deny all this?
and twenty other similar passages, and we lose that
respect for him which, maugre his bad qualities,
his energy, his fiery courage, his constancy,
generalship
,
and intellectual superiority to those around
him, extort from us through the three parts of
Henry the Sixth. During the long and bloody
wars of the roses, he is almost the only prominent
character who is not at the same time as weak as
wicked.
But of all the acting plays, King Lear
undoubtedly
suffers most. Sins of omission and
commission
are here too numerous to be pointed out.
There is a radical unfitness too, in the exposure of
the infirmity and imbecility of the aged monarch
through five long acts, that it is scarcely possible
for genius, even of the highest order, to overcome.
The pity produced by an exhibition of physical decay
for any lengthened period, is nearly allied to
contempt
;
and contempt is by no means the feeling
with which either the mental or bodily weakness
of Lear ought to be regarded. In the closet, we
think of him with natural reverence, as a poor,
despised, weak, and infirm old man, fourscore
and upwards; on the stage, the repulsive
infirmities
attendant on this condition,shaking,
coughing
,
tottering; or worse than that, the awkward
imitations of them by the actor, who is constantly
obtruding them on us to show his knowledge of
and attention to, the part, repel our sympathies.
Besides, the madness of Lear is too subtle and
refined
,
almost too sacred, for the stage. The
superhuman
touches of pathos and passion are too
exquisitely fine and delicate for the atmosphere of
a theatre. We get too deeply interested to endure
the thought that it is but counterfeit well-painted
passion we are looking on; and, in the excited
state of our feelings, applause becomes
impertinence
,
and the other noises of a playhouse
loathsome
.
Whenever other writers for the stage have
failed, it has been from lack of meansfrom an
inability to conceive or express what the passion or
situation required; but Shakspeare has done more
than succeed; in the exercise of his immortal
powers
,
he has at times risen to a pitch that has
rendered
it impossible for mortals of more limited
faculties
,
even in their happiest moments of inspiration,
to give other than a poor and imperfect illustration
of his meaning. Of all his characters, this is most
conspicuous in Lear. In these latter days, no man,
save Kean, has succeeded in giving even a faint
idea of the craz'd monarch; all other attempts have
been little better than pitiable. I do not say this
dictatorially. There are many, I doubt not, better
qualified to judge than myself, who think differently.
I quarrel with no man's opinion, but claim the right
of expressing and retaining my own. Those who
are much in the habit of attending the theatre, get
inured to dramatic butchery of all sorts, and can sit
and see, even with a smile on their countenance,
Othello, Richard, Hamlet, Macbeth, and other of
their acquaintance, savagely slaughtered; but
even the most seared and case-hardened play-goer
must feel that an ill-judged attempt in Lear is little
better than profanation.
I am by no means contending that Lear should
never be played, but have only been endeavoring
to point out some of the difficulties and
disadvantages
attendant thereon: yet I had almost forgotten
the principal drawback. On the stage, the
Fool
,
(so called) the best and wisest, if not the wittiest,
of Shakspeare's fools, is altogether omitted. All his
pithy sayingshis scraps of doggerel, with a deep
meaning in themhis shrewd commentaries on
the folly of the king, and the ingratitude of his
daughtersall gone at one fell swoop. We miss
5*
him sadly, for he is not only the most sensible,
but best hearted of fools; and there is something
peculiarly touching in his unflinching adherence to
the fortunes of his master, at the same time that he
has judgment to see his interest lies the other way,
and shrewdness to give such keen and bitter
counsel
as this for the desertion of fallen greatness
Let go thy hold when a great wheel runs down
a hill, lest it break thy neck with following it;
but the great one that goes up the hill, let him
draw thee after. When a wise man gives thee
better
counsel, give me mine again. I would have
none but knaves follow it, since a fool gives it.
He seems too, to have a quicker insight than any
around as to how the world wags; for when
Kent asks,
How chance the king comes with so small a train?
he chides his dullness of perception by answering,
An thou hadst been put in the stocks for asking
that question, thou hadst well deserved it.
In the
last extremity, when the poor monarch is
unhousel'd
,
and exposed to all the fury of the elements,
we still hear of poor Motley
Kent
.
But who is with him?
Gent
.
None but the Fool;
who labors to outjest
His heartfelt injuries.
What a picture is presented to the imagination by
these few wordsnone but the fool of fallen
greatness on the one hand, and unswerving fidelity
on the other. It is gratifying to know that this
affection is at least reciprocated; for Lear, even
after his wits begin to turn, exclaims
Poor fool and knave! I have one part in my heart
That's sorry yet for thee!
But we might pursue this subject to the crack
of doom; or at least, to speak more prosaically and
sensibly, we might continue it to a most tiresome
and unreasonable length. The gist of what we
have been endeavoring to show, is,not that
Shakspeare should be played less, but that he
should be read more; to point out to those who
are contented to become acquainted with him for
the most part through the medium of the stage,
how much they lose by such a procedure; and to
prove that some of his plays, from their high and
peculiar nature, are fitted for the closet alone; and
to expose a few of the drawbacks upon the pleasure
of seeing him acted, occasioned by the carelessness
or incapability of those who have the charge of
dramatic entertainments.
MONEY.
Alas! what a thing is Poverty
Among the fallen on evil days:
'Tis crime, and fear, and infamy,
And houseless want; in frozen ways
Wandering ungarmented; and pain,
And worse than all, that inward stain,
Foul self-contempt, which drowns in sneers
Youth's starlight smile, and makes its tears
First like hot gall, then dry for ever!
Riches
are not happiness, say many old prosers
generally well-to-do in the worldgranted;
neither
is Poverty directly and absolutely misery; but
if she be not, she is near akinshe is mother of
miseries, and has, in truth, as swarming and
ill-favored
a progeny, of all shapes and sizes, as can
well be conceived, from full-grown evils down to
small, petty nuisances. As it often happens, the
junior portion of her offspring are the worst to be
endured. They have not the deadly stings and
matured malignancy of the elder evils, but are more
fretful, teazing, irritating, and annoying; and are
that set of imps that are perpetually pestering men
in middling circumstances, or rather, on the borders
or confines thereof, but whom an increasing
deficiency
of, and an increasing necessity for, the
circulating
medium, is gradually dragging down to
that class of despisable vagabonds, as Cooper's
housekeeper calls themthe poor. Be not afraid,
ye men of millions, am not about to make any
drafts upon your sympathy, I am not about to
attempt
to draw,
a-la-Banim
, any fearful, loathsome,
haggard picture of poverty and its effects. Such
pictures do little good, and much harm. They
have the tendency to sere and render callous the
feelings rather than excite pity, or open the
well-springs of divine charity. Besides, the
superlative
is not my line; the positive or
comparative
is quite high or low enough for one who neither
deals in celestial bliss nor ineffable woe, but am
content
to peddle in the small ware of mere human
troubles and inconveniences.
To want money is to want honor, love,
obedience
,
troops of friends; it is to want respect and
sympathy, and the ordinary courtesies of society,
besides, occasionally, victuals. The possession or
non-possession of it makes the difference whether
life has to be an enjoyment or a task; whether it
has to be a walk over a smooth, verdant lawn,
amid fragrant flowers, and aromatic shrubs, and
all things that minister pleasure to the senses; or
a wearisome up-hill journey through thorns and
briars, and other disgracious impediments. It makes
the difference whether you have to go bounding
exultingly along like the free, full-blooded courser,
or wend your way wearily and slow like the laden
and despised pack-horse.
To want money, in a high state of civilization,
is to be a kind of slave; it is, at least, to be
dependent
on the whims and caprices of others, instead
of indulging in all the pleasant eccentricities or
originalities
to which your temperament may prompt
you; it is to have to rise soon when you wish to lie
late, and go to bed early in order to be enabled so
to do; it is to have to eat indiscriminate provender,
instead of making a judicious selection from the
delicious juices of meats and fishes; it is to have
to live in unwholesome and anti-respectable
neighborhoods
,
and mix in daily communion with
people
whose ways are not your ways; it is to be a
drudge, a hack, a machine, worked for the profit
and advantage of others until the springs are
broken; it is to be omitted in family celebrations,
and roam about invitationless at Christmas; it is
to have to put up with equivocal nods and
recognitions
in the streetsto have your friends look into
print-shop windows as you approach, and suddenly
bring their admiration of the engraver's skill to a
period as soon as you have passed by; it is to feel
all delicate sensibilities, all free generous feelings, all
ardent and aspiring thoughts checked and crushed
within you by a petty but overbearing necessity; it is
to have to suffer at once the greatest misfortunes and
the most contemptible vexations; to have family
affections and social friendships uprooted and
destroyed
,
and to be obliged to be uncomfortably
careful
of coats, hats, and other habiliments. It is to
live a man forbid; or it is to become an exile
from your native landan outcast, a wanderer in
foreign and unhealthy climes, hunting for the
yellow
indispensable, until you are of the color of the
metal you are in quest of; until the temper becomes
soured, the feelings deadened, the heart indurated,
and the liver in an improper state. How
beautifully
has Leyden portrayed his own fate and
feelings
,
and those of thousands of others, in that pure
gem of poetry, the Address to an Indian Gold
Coin
For theefor thee, vile yellow slave!
I left a heart that lov'd me true;
I cross'd the tedious ocean wave,
To roam in climes unkind and new;
The cold wind of the stranger blew
Chill on my wither'd heartthe grave,
Dark and untimely, met my view
And all for thee! vile yellow slave!
To lack money is to lack a passport or admission
ticket into the pleasant places of God's earthto
much that is glorious and wonderful in nature, and
nearly all that is rare, and curious, and enchanting,
in art; or if you do travel about in a small way, it
is to have that most miserable, rascally, intrusive,
and disagreeable of all traveling companions
economy
,
yoked to you; to be under a continual
restraint
from his presence; to feel unable to give
your mind cheerfully and freely up to the scene
before you; and in the contemplation of a
magnicent
view, or a piece of hoar antiquity, to have the
wretch whisper in your ear the probable cost of your
pleasurable sensations; it is to have a continual
contest carried on in your sensorium between
pleasure
and prudence; it is to submit to small
inconveniences
and petty insults at inns for the
accommodation
of travelers, where, above all places on
earth, the men of money shine out with the most
resplendent glory, and the unmonied become the
most truly insignificant; it is, in fact, to have all
your enjoyments diminished and annoyances
aggravated
;
to have pleasure almost transmuted into
pain, or at least, to have such shadow of vexation
thrown over it as materially to change its
complexion
;
and when all is overjourney done and
expenses
paidit is to feel a sort of mean remorse
as you reckon up your past expenditure, and ponder
over the most probable remedial ways and means
for the future.
The two things most difficult of discovery, next
to the passage round the north pole, are talent in
a poor man and dullness in a rich one; therefore,
to want money, is to want wit, humor, eloquence, in
fact capacity of every kind, or, at the best, if they be
not altogether denied, to have such a duty levied
upon themsuch an oppressive drawbackthat
the rich man with inferior wares, is able to beat the
poor one whenever they come into competition.
For instance, the most casual observer of men and
manners must have noticed that in company a joke
from a man of 5000
l
. per annum, elicits more
admiration
,
and produces infinitely more hilarity and
good humor, than ten equally good from a man
worth 500
l
. Oh! it is perfectly wonderful the
raciness and point that an abundance of
temporalities
impart to a rather dull saying. Besides, a jest
from a man in the receipt of a contemptible income,
by some strange fatality invariably changes its
nature
,
and becomes little better than sheer
impertinence
.
It is that sort of thing which grave
gentlemen
and prudent matrons designate by the word
unbecoming. Now all this, though visible to the
meanest capacity, might puzzle a philosopher; he
VOL. I. 6
would be as unable to comprehend it as he would
the curious sympathy which evidently exists
between
sterling wit and superfine cloth, that
mutually
assist and set off each other. Many a quaint
conceit and rare piece of pleasantry has altogether
lost its effect and fallen pointless in consequence of
the speaker's garments not being of that texture, or
possessed of that freshness which is altogether
desirable
.
The moral, good reader, to be deduced from
all this isthat you be not petulant and
acrimonious
because these things are so, but that, if
endowed
with a money-making disposition, you
assiduously cultivate it, and then you will not need
care whether these things are so or not.
The want of money too, I am inclined to think,
produces physical changes which have not as yet
been sufficiently noticed by the faculty. It causes
a gradual and considerable accumulation of bile,
which lies lurking in the system, until the
incivilities
of friends, or the importunities of creditors,
cause it to become completely vitiated or inspissated;
after which a man, especially one predisposed to
melancholy and contemplation, looks at every thing
on earth through a pair of yellow spectacles. The
unhappy patient becomes saturated, body and mind,
with jaundice; he shuns the society of his fellow
men, buttons his coat up to his chin, pulls his hat
over his eyes, deposits his hands in the pockets of
his small-clothes, and takes extraordinary long
walks into the country. But even the fair face of
nature becomes changed; the barrenness of his
pockets throws a corresponding sterility over the
landscape, deducting the glory from the grass and
splendor from the flower. The blossoming of the
earth is no longer pleasant to his sight, or the music
of the merry warblers of the woods delightful to his
ear. His heart is out of joint, and all nature
seems to be filled with unpleasing comparisons
between
his own state and hers. He stalks about
with lowering brow and upturned lip, an unpleasant
discord amid the universal harmony and fitness of
things. At this juncture, let intelligence arrive of
a heavy legacy left him by some appropriately
defunct
distant relativeand lo! the change! It is
as a dark cloud passing from the sun. Monsieur
Il Penseroso becomes L'Allegro in a twinkling. He
draws his hand from the extensive vacuum in which
they have been dangling, takes the yellow
spectacles
from his eyes, raises the hat from his brow,
unbuttons his coat, and turns, with a feeling of
leisurely enjoyment, to welcome the fresh spring
breeze. The song of birds and the odour of flowers
are again grateful to his senses. The rivulet
tinkles
once more pleasantly in his ear, and the
cheerful
song of the lark finds a corresponding echo in
his own bosom. He indulges no longer in
speculations
on the vanity and insufficiency of things,
but hies homeward cheerful, free, enfranchised,
independent. He orders an approved cookery book,
lies a bed and studies it, and marvels, in a short
time, how melancholy ever gained a footing in this
mighty pleasant world. Oh money, money!
marvellous indeed are the changes thou canst
produce
.
Would that I were a bank director!
AN HUMBLE ADDRESS TO THE MARRIAGEABLE
LADIES OF THE UNITED STATES.
Note
.The following paper was suggested by seeing it repeatedly
stated in American papers, that Societies had been formed in
different
parts of the Union, wherein young ladies pledged themselves to
discourage the addresses of all young men who were known to have
used spirituous liquors; some excluded wine, and I think if they were
right in the one case they were right in the other; for whether a man
absorbs wine or spirits in sufficient quantities to produce intoxication,
is very immaterial. But, indeed, as all wines contain an admixture of
spirit (more or less), they come under both the letter and spirit of the
prohibition.
2dly.
Resolved
,That from this time forward we will not
encourage
or admit the addresses of any gentleman who shall be known
to be in any way concerned in the consumption of ardent spirits,
(except as a medicine.)
American Paper
.
Amiable
young ladies!Is this thing so? Has
the decree indeed irrevocably gone forth, that
throughout the United States bachelor and
brandy-drinker
shall henceforth become synonymous terms;
that the cup of wedded bliss shall never be quaffed
by him who quaffs of any other cup (tea and coffee
excepted)that an eternal line of separation shall
be drawn between those ancient friends, Hymen
6*
and Bacchusand that the nursery and the cellar
shall never more be found conjoined under the same
roof? What nest of malevolent spinsters, cut off
themselves from all maternal hopes; or what
congregation
of thin, dyspeptic, water-drinking youths
has persuaded you to the adoption of this suicidal
course, destructive alike of your own comfort and
happiness, and the comfort and happiness of
numerous
worthy, hearty fellows, I am lost in
conjecture
.
Can the holders of shares in the Manhattan
and other water companies have any concern in
the getting up and promulgation of this unnatural
resolutionthis sharp, biting statute? But let
who will be concerned, I will never believe that
such a resolution will or can become universal, or
ever attain to the firm texture of the laws of the
Medes and Persians, which alter not. What! have
all the bright eyes, blooming cheeks, and warm
hearts of the damosels of the western continent, to be
in future monopolized by cold, watery, fish-blooded
young men, incapable of a glass or two, or
occasionally
upwards; and has all hilarity, good
fellowship
,
decent conviviality, with their concomitants,
toasts, songs, and sentiments, to be prohibited under
penalty of being the sole occupant of a four-post or
other bedstead? My dears, you could never have
given the thing a thought when you vowed
yourselves
members of such a cruel and barbarous
association
.
You have been led away by morbid and
exaggerated descriptions of bloated intemperance,
and the madness of intoxicationof neglect and
poverty and miseryof sitting sorrowfully by the
lonely fire, listening to the dull ticking of the
clock, until some brute, whom you have dignified
by the name of husband, reels homeward from his
nightly debauch; and these horrid fancies have
haunted your imaginations until you have come to
the conclusion that there is a much more intimate
connexion between virtue and cold water than
really exists. Trust me, a man may drink seven
tumblers
per diem
of the pure fluid, and be no
saint; and another may take his social glass, enjoy
his bottle and his friend, and on high festivals get
merry, mellow, comfortable, elevated, sublimated, or
whatever the word is, without at all forfeiting his
general claims to sobriety, or trespassing upon the
duties of a husband or a father. And here is the
radical defect of temperance or abstinence societies
generally; the line of demarcation is too strongly
drawnthere is no neutral ground. It is touch
not, taste not, or else a very undeserved
opprobrium
(especially in small villages), is attached to
him who either touches or tastes, thus rendering
him careless and reckless from a sense of the
severity
and injustice of the stigma attached to perhaps
no very censurable degree of self indulgence.
According to the homely proverb, a man may as
well be hanged for a sheep as a lamb; and he that
gets no credit for moderation, is very apt to plunge
into excess.
But you, gentle ladies, have improved upon this
unjustifiable severity. What are the fulminations
of any body of he-creatures to your terrible
Malthusian
determinationyour fearful resolution to put
a stop either to the consumption of ardent spirits, or
to any increase in the census? The legislature
ought to look to it: the only comfort is, that
reasonable
doubts may be entertained of the
practicability
of your scheme; for it scarcely stands within
the prospect of belief that hearts will be torn
asunder
and deep-rooted affections dissevered upon the
discovery of the swain's having incautiously taken
off a tumbler of brandy and water! It is barely
possible that you will have the firmness of nerve to
really discard him for evermore for such a
transgression
,
giving him mournful occasion to exclaim
with the poet
Alas! how slight a cause may move
Dissension between hearts that love!
A something light as aira look,
A word unkind or wrongly taken
Oh! love that tempests never shook
A glass of brandy-punch has shaken!
Bethink you, too, what a glorious inquisitorial
system
you will establish for the amusement of maiden
aunts and bosom friends, who will be for ever on
the alert to crush your schemes of happiness in the
bud by instituting unceasing and unrelenting
inquiries
for the purpose of establishing the important
fact of your beloved having swallowed improper
compounds. And what a truly original foundation
you will lay for the exercise of the talents of the
future native novelist, who, in copying real life, will
doubtless frequently have to detail such scenes as
the following:
Henry unexpectedly entered the room, and to
his utter surprise and dismay found Laura literally
steeped in tears. Her eyes, which were red with
weeping, formed a curious contrast to the ashy
paleness
of her cheeks; and, although it was long past
the hour of dinner, she had yet her morning gown
on, her hair was still in paper, and every thing
about her spoke of sorrow and desolation and utter
disregard of personal appearances.
Henry approached, and by a regular series of
tender solicitations and delicate assiduities, sought
to win from her the cause of her distress. But vain
and fruitless were his manifold endeavors. For a
quarter of an hour she spoke notlistened not, to him
whose every word had heretofore been a charma
spell to hang and dwell upon. At length her grief
found vent in an audible torrent of exclamations
and interrogatories
`And can you, Henryyou who are the sole
author of my misery, pretend ignorance?you,
who have blighted all my young hopes of
happiness
;you,
who have betrayed my trusting
affection
you
who have'
`Me!' exclaimed the now really alarmed youth,
`what the deuce have I done?'
`And do you ask?you who have created an
insuperable barrier to our union,you who have
placed a chasm between us that can never be
overleapt
a
bar that can never be taken downa'
`Good heavens! what
have
I done?'
`You have,' sobbed the agitated girl, almost
choked with contending emotions, `you have
drunk a gin-sling!'
`I know it; and what of that?'
`Unthinking, cruel man! by so doing you have
wrecked my peace of mind for ever, and lost
yourself
the most affectionate and devoted of wives. Did
I not tell youanswer meSaturday fortnight,
that I had become a member of the Auxiliary
Branch
Anti-marrying-young-men-who-drink-ardent-spirits
Societythat I have vowed,'  &c.
Then what a climax will the reconciliation scene
be
`And you solemnly promise that you will never
hereafter drink a mint julep?
`Never!'
`Or brandy-punch?'
`Never!'
`Or whiskey-toddy?'
`Never, never!'
`Or a gin-sling?'
`Oh! never!'
`I am satisfied! We may yet be happy!'
And seriously, my dears, do you expect that any
rational, sensible, spirited manany man in fact
worth having, is going to submit to have his
judgment
impugned, and his discretion and
self-command
rated so low, as to be required to bind himself
by oaths and vows to refrain from what he does not
consider wrong? But I submit it to your candor and
good sense, whether the moderate and occasional
use of stimulating liquors is so dangerous and
pernicious
as it is the fashion to think, or affect to
think, they are. I include wine, of course; for the
non-prohibition of wine by temperance societies is
one of their most objectionable features;it is a
partial and one-sided exemption to gain the
countenance
of the wealthy and influential. The rich man
seeks the stimulus within his reachthe poor man
does no more; the aim and end of both is
excitement
,
and the difference in the means and effect is
so trivial in taking a general view of the subject,
that it is scarcely worthy consideration. But if the
rules and regulations of such societies lean
favorably
towards the rich and affluent, there are higher
and more impartial authorities which do not. It
is not for kings to drink wine; nor for princes
strong drink: lest they drink, and forget the law,
and pervert the judgment of any of the afflicted.
Give strong drink unto him that is ready to perish,
and wine unto those who be of heavy hearts. I
do not here wish to cast the slightest imputation of
hypocrisy, or impute unworthy motives to the friends
and organizers of temperance societies. I believe
many of them to be just and good men, ardently
desirous of promoting the happiness of their
fellow-creatures
;
but I do think that they in many cases
mistake the means, and in all attempt too much.
At the same time, doubtless, there are many amongst
them, who, from a natural distaste, for wine or
spirits
,
or from possessing a weak or debilitated
constitution
,
which imperatively forbids their indulging
therein, make a virtue of necessity, and take credit
to themselves for an enforced forbearance. And it
is a curious feature in human nature, that those
very persons are generally more intolerant than
those who really make a sacrifice by abstaining
from what they relish. But so it is.
Leaving, however, these matters to be debated by
others, let us, ladies, take a quiet, reasonable,
worldly
,
common-sense view of the question. We will
all, I dare say, agree that there is not under the sun
a more degraded creature than a drunkarda sot
a sponge that absorbs indiscriminately all
quantities
and qualities of liquors that come in his way;
a fellow like a desert sand, that drinks, and drinks,
and still is drya bond-slave to a pot and glass.
Neither will we disagree in our estimation of
another
very common and unamiable species of
animal
,
to witthe noisy, coarse young man who is
continually hanging about taverns drinking juleps,
smoking cigars, canvassing the merits of plays and
players, or wrangling and disputing about southern
nullificationa mixture of ruffianism and
puppyism
;
the sort of person who is continually
enjoying
himself by getting into what he calls famous
sprees or duced good larks, which means
committing
gratuitous impertinences and getting well
kicked, beaten, and put into the watchhouse
therefor
;
liquor only calls forth and fully developes the
natural rankness of the thoughts and feelings of
such a creature; and the sooner it kills him the
VOL. I. 7
pleasanter for society. But thee is another class
more worthy of your attention, who have not
altogether
foresworn the use of stimulants. Men who
from keeping generally sober, are the more keenly
alive to a little pleasurable elevation on particular
occasions, their faculties and capacities for
enjoyment
being fresh and unwornneither starved by
total abstinence nor blunted and cloyed by habitual
indulgence. In this class are to be found some of
the choicest specimens of humanity; the wit, the
poet, and the philosopher, the unobtrusive student
and the gay lively man of the world. Such
persons
seldom or never become drunkardsthey have
too much good taste; and is it not uncharitable in
you, or any one else, to attempt to affix a stigma on
them because they sometimes, on festive occasions,
seek relief from the wearisome monotony of the
world in a bumper? I take it for granted that
nearly all men like excitement, and women too.
True there are some schemes of quiet and rational
happiness which omit this article entirely; but then
they are generally so
very
quiet and rational, that
people are apt to fall asleep in the enjoyment of
them. Your sensibilities, ladies, are quicker and
finer than ours, and the desired sensation is more
easily obtained; for instance, company, a cup of
delicate green tea, and a modicum of harmless
scandal, cause your eyes to sparkle, adorn your
cheeks with smiles and dimples, set your tongues
a-going, and induce precisely that state of body
and mind which gentlemen experience after a glass
or so. Suppose, in the midst of your sipping and
chatting, the warm, comfortable tea-urn was to be
removed, and a pitcher of cold water substituted in
its place! Will you take another cup? Ah!
how your teeth chatter at the mere thoughts of
such a thing, and what a piece of wanton barbarity
you consider the exchange. Well, ladies, suppose
a few decent, inoffensive gentlemen seated round a
table, each with a glass of sparkling wine, or, why
mince the matter, whiskey-punch before him.
The good liquor begins to do its office; the flow
of reason and the feast of soul commence; the
jest, the song, the anecdote go roundthe petty
carking cares of business are forgotten, and the
tangible evils of life gradually fade away into thin,
unsubstantial vapors. Their glasses are outfill them
again. Suppose at this stage of the business some
spare, dissatisfied man conveyed away unobserved
the pleasing liquids which they had been drinking,
replenishing at the same time every glass with the
choicest spring water. Gentlemen, says he, I
will give you a toastTemperance Societies, and
success to their endeavors. What is the result?
Why several worthy gentlemen that were about to
be very happy, become suddenly uncomfortable, go
home in a bad humor, and quarrel with their wives
about small domestic grievances. How much is
virtue into pocket by this?
At public dinners (such an one as was given some
time since to our gifted townsman, Washington
Irving
,)
would you excommunicate wine and spirits?
Would you have all generous toasts and sentiments
washed down with cold water? What an
agreeable
fervor would pervade the company! At
patriotic
celebrations, too, think, oh think, of the
immortal memory of George Washington in pure
spring, or the American fair, in a bumper of
the best rock, Manhattan, or other waters of local
notoriety! Is such a scheme feasible; and, if it
were, is it desirable? Have the lords of the
creation
to follow the example of the cattle of the fields
and other inferior animals? Then why was a
discriminating palate given to man? Water is
highly commendable and agreeable in many
respects
.
It is useful in poetry, and poetical in reality.
In a landscape, for instance, what life and
animation
does it impart to the prospect; how sweetly it
gurgles and tinkles in a rivulet; and into what a
resplendent blaze of beauty it heightens a fine
sunset
!
But when presented to the eye on a small
scale,that is, in a tumblerit becomes
insignificant
and contemptible, and altogether unworthy
the notice of any person pretending to rationality.
Oh ladies, ladies, rescind your resolutions; but at
the same time bewarebeware of men that drink
alone, and of those who drink standing at the bars
of taverns; such persons drink for the gross love of
liquor; beware of gluttons, sots and habitual
tipplers
;
but also beware of unadulterated
water-drinkers
.
7*
BULWER AND WALTER SCOTT.
This
is the age of discoveriesof wonderful and
astounding discoveries. A spirit of fermentation
and free inquiry has got abroad, and put that
restless little animal man into a state of
preternatural
disquietude, insomuch that he has adopted
for the sober rule of his conduct Shakspeare's
hibernicism
,
We will strive with impossibilities,
Yea, get the better of them!
and he lightly projects schemes and broaches
doctrines that would have made the hair stand
on end upon the heads of his respectable
ancestors
.
The world never saw such times. Science
and quackery have become so intermixed, that
worthy
though obtuse people are puzzled to discover
the difference, and hence spring those two large
parties
the
innovators and the anti-innovatorsthat
keep society fermenting like a barrel of ale at
midsummer
.
In the eyes of the former, nothing is
good but what is new; they are for turning the
poor old world topsy-turvy, for shaking religion,
poetry, law, learning and common sense out of it,
and governing it hereafter by steam, mathematics,
and a sublime code of morals calculated for use
when the era of human perfectibility commences.
The anti-innovation faction are ridiculous in
another
way: they are good fat sort of people, full of
beef, beer, and prejudice, who are continually
perplexed
with fear of change; who think that time
and custom sanctify all things, and that whatever
has been, ought to be. Their ranks are headed by
grave, solemn old owls, who shut their eyes to the
light in a very owlish manner, while the recruits
of the other are, for the most part, pert, prating
jackdaws, dressed out in the borrowed robes of
philosophy
and philanthropy, and their cackle is worse
than the croak of their opponents, inasmuch as it
is more intrusive and presuming, the one being
active ignorance, the other only passive. Thank
heaven, a third party with knowledge of their own,
unite the zeal of one faction with the caution of the
other.
Such being the state of things, the number of
sublime and ridiculous discoveries daily made in
physics, metaphysics, law, government, and
literature
,
are scarcely to be wondered at. But the most
notable discovery of modern times is, undoubtedly,
the one recently made, that Edward Lytton
Bulwer
is a writer equal to Sir Walter Scott! The
author of Pelham, Devereux, and the Disowned,
equal to the author of Waverley! And this is in
strict accordance with the spirit of the age, which
is characterized by nothing so much as mutability
and love of change. The Athenians grew tired of
always hearing Aristides called the just, and a
section of the literary world are tired of hearing Sir
Walter styled the great, and have therefore set
up this opposition idol, whose claims, they say,
have been weighed in the balance and not found
wanting. It has long been the fashion to estimate
men of genius after the manner of Plutarch's
Lives, by their comparative rather than their
positive
merits, and some singular, and it is now
confessed, outrageous comparisons, have been
instituted
.
By many of the writers of his own time
Shakspeare was adjudged to be
inferior
to Ben
Jonson; but with this solitary exception, the
hardihood
of the preceding assertion has perhaps never
been equalled. To be sure, for some time past, Sir
Walter Scott, like the Bay of Naples, has been a
standard for small comparisons; and the several
admirers of all the second and third-rate novelists
have been endeavoring to exalt their particular
favorites
by insinuating that the northern magician
would have to look well to his laurels, or that the
great unknown must be content to bear a rival
near his throne, and such half-way phrases; but
this is the first time a direct claim of
equality
has
been put innay, some have asserted Mr. Bulwer's
superiority, but that appeared to be carrying the
joke a little too far. These valuable and
extraordinary
critics have for the most part been content
to make known their opinions to the public,
without
stating the grounds and causes on which
they are based. Like persons who have resolved
on committing a rash action, they at once bolt
forth their assertion of equality, and then, as if
aghast at their own temerity, dare not approach the
question a second time, coolly to give their reasons
for what they have advanced.
The admirers of the author of Waverley may
quietly and calmly invite comparison, and they can
afford to do it in a spirit of the utmost candor and
liberality, for there is little occasion to exalt their
favorite (if that were possible) by the depreciation
of any writer whatever. Render unto Mr. Bulwer
all that can reasonably be claimed for him, (and he
has proved that he has many noble qualifications
for an author,) yet what does that all amount to in
comparison with the merits of Scott? Mr. Bulwer
is a man of talent if not of genius, a fine thinker
and a ripe scholar; his mind is rich in classical
lore and philosophic reflection; his style is polished
and nervous, impassioned and harmonious, and he
has produced three works of great and varied merit,
Pelham, the Disowned, and Devereux; but is this
to put him at once on an equality with the man who
has conceived and executed those glorious and
imperishable
series of works known by the name of
the Waverley novelsa world within
themselves
,
teeming with living, breathing characters,
stamped with nature's impressabounding in
descriptions
as vivid and magnificent as ever poet
fancied or painter drew, and filled with humor and
pathos that flow from a source as prodigal and
inexhaustible
as the widow's cruise;a new edition
of human nature, as it were, in its most picturesque
forms? To place him on a level with one who has
done more for literature, both in quantity and
quality
,
with the single exception of Shakspeare, than
any man since Noah left the ark? As Othello says,
'tis monstrous!
But to come to particulars. Much has been said
of the qualifications Mr. Bulwer possesses, though
but scant mention has been made of those in which
he is deficient. His first great point of inferiority to
Sir Walter is lack of dramatic powerhe is a
descriptive
,
the other a dramatic portrayer of men and
manners. Sir Walter introduces his personages in
some gipsy encampment, old change-house, or
ancient
hostelry, hits off their costume and personal
appearance, and then leaves them to make their
acquaintance with the reader in their own way.
Mr. Bulwer describes his characterstheir actions
and their motives for those actions, at full length,
before he allows them to open their lips, fearful, it
would seem, that their identity might be mistaken,
like the painter who wrote under his productions
the necessary and significant information, this is
a horse and this is an ass. Hence it is, that
one
creates
characters, while the other merely
describes
them. In the hands of the one they become
instinct with life and animation; with the other
they are but pictures, which owe their value to
the skill and coloring of the artist. After perusing
Bulwer, who remembers and quotes the language
of his characters as they do those of Meg Merrilies,
Dirk Hatterick, Rob Roy, Helen Macgregor, Effie
Deans, or any of the thousand creations that live
and move and have their being in the pages of the
Scotch novelist? The studied denunciations of a
Sir Reginald Glanville, though invested with all
the power and energy of the writer, will, somehow
or other, slip from our minds; but who ever forgets
the threats of old Meg Merrilies to Godfrey Bertram,
or the homely yet wild and picturesque language in
which they are clad? The one does without effort
what the other with all his efforts cannot do; the
sayings and doings of Mr. Bulwer's personages wax
vague and indistinct almost as soon as the volume
is closed, while those of Scott are stamped upon
our memory, and pass not away.
In the pathetic, though strenuous exertions are
made, the powers of Mr. Bulwer are evidently
limited, at least in comparison. He writes page
after page of description, filled with dashes, italics,
adjectives and epithets, but it will not do. There
is nothing to touch the heart in the wrought-up
description
of the sufferings of his Gertrude Douglas
compared with the simple history of Effie Deans, and
the affecting picture of the interviews between her
and her sister Jeanie in prison. After reading them
over, we feel that we would not part with the novel
which contains them for all Mr. Bulwer has
written
,
or is likely to write. That gentleman is very
fond of similes and very skilful in their selection and
application, but when did he ever equal the
following
in simple and appropriate beauty, or clothe it
in language so perfectlybut that is not itwhen
did he ever write a single passage impregnated with
such a gush of natural feeling as this, where puir
Effie, the withered lily of St. Leonard's, thus
speaks of herself?And what am I, said she to
Jeanie, but a poor wasted wan-thriven tree, dug
up by the roots, and flung out to waste in the
highway
,
that man and beast may tread it under foot?
I thought o' the bonny bit thorn that our father
rooted out o' the yard last May when it had a' the
flush o' blossoms on it; and then it lay in the court
till the beasts had trod them a' in pieces with their
feet. I little thought when I was wae for the silly
green bush and its flowers, that I was to gang the
same gait mysel!Yet this is but one stroke from
a pen that has scattered thousands of similar
passages
,
like wild flowers, over his works.
On this ground the shadow of equality cannot
be claimed. But take any othertake that on
which Mr. Bulwer has been thought to excel.
There are few things he appears to have bestowed
more pains upon than the history of Sir Reginald
Glanville; he has striven to impart to it all the
effect of which he was capable, and the sufferer, in
language energetic and profuse, pours forth the
detail
of his wrongs, his blighted hopes and withered
feelings. But does this make an equal impression
on the reader with the reckless, careless account
given of himself by Nanty Ewart, the smuggling
VOL. I. 8
captain of the Jumping Jenny? Yet all the
advantages
are on the side of the former; he is a
gentleman, and undebased by low and vulgar
associations
,
while the other is a drunkard, an outcast,
and a vagabond; yet, strange to say, Nanty Ewart
with his low-life confessions is a much more
interesting
personage than the baronet with his elegant
distresses. And why is this, but because of the
reality of the picture? The one tells you of his
woes, and that enjoyment and hope have passed
away, but you do not realize that such is the fact;
the other asks no sympathy, but his snatches of old
songs, his reckless levity and desperate jocularity,
make you feel that a ruined and broken-hearted
man is before you. It may be added, that the one
has been frequently quoted as a choice specimen of
Mr. Bulwer's powers, while the other has never
been noted as marked with more than the ordinary
talent of Scott.
But if the author of Pelham is deficient in the
pathetic, his attempts at humor are melancholy in
the extreme.
[1]
[1]
This was written previous to the publication of Paul Clifford,
certainly
the most fortunate of Mr. Bulwer's works in this particular.
In the worst passages of the worst
novelists can any thing more meagre or miserable
be picked out than his Mr. Morris Brown or Dr.
Bossleton? The
humor
of the former consists in
being clad in garments the color of his name, and
talking about a Mrs. Minden; the latter in repeating
the termination of every sentence twice, only
reversing
the order of the words; yet notwithstanding
this slender stock in trade, the author seems to take
an absolute pleasure in the introduction of Mr.
Brown, and spins him through many a tedious
page. When the reader does meet with a
paragraph
provocative of a smile, it is the descriptive
talent of Mr. Bulwer in sketching an absurd
character
,
and not the humor belonging to the
character
itself. For instance, the description in Pelham
of Monsieur Margot's person is very good; but when
he brings him to act in what he intends for a
laughable
situation, as in the affair of the basket and
Mrs. Green, it is lame and labored in the highest
degree, and the end of the chapter becomes a
consummation
devoutly to be wished.
From these abortive attempts turn to the pages
of the author of Waverley, and what a mine of
humon is to be found in every volume! How rich
is the vein, how varied, and how inexhaustible!
You have it in every shapethe humor of
description
,
of situation, and of the words and actions of
the characters in the scene. And how spontaneous,
how perfectly natural and appropriate is the kind
with which each character is imbued. It is no
patch-work businessno continued iteration of a
quaint phrase, that might be put into the mouth of
one person as well as anothernot a habit, a trick
of custom, that can be got rid of, like a cold, by a
little carebut real, genuine, hearty humor, as
much a part of the personages in whom it is
invested
,
as their appetites and animal affections.
Nothing can be more distinct than the humor of
Cuddie Headrigge the ploughman and Ratcliffe the
thief and thieftaker, of Edie Ochiltree and Jonathan
Oldbuck, of Captain Dalgetty and Dominie
Sampson
,
of Caleb Balderstone and Bartoline Saddletree,
or of Baillie Nichol Jarvie and the Laird of
Dumbedikes
.
And this quality is made to bear
compound
interest when two of these worthies are
brought into collision, and their peculiarities
exhibited
in the strongest light by their different ways
of viewing and expressing themselves on a
particular
subject, like the antiquary Oldbuck and the
old gaberlunzie Edie Ochiltree holding discourse
about the Roman fortifications. Some of the scenes
in which these and other characters figure, are as
rich as any thing in English literatureas natural
and marked with the same profound insight into
character and attention to minuti as those of
Fielding
,
but more highly colored, and as broad and
ludicrous
as Smollett's, but without their coarseness.
There is the fine scene in Old Mortality where the
soldiers come to the miser Milnwood's house and
seize Henry Morton. What a group is there
what a glorious subject for a painter! The spare,
pinched form and features of the old miser
Milnwood
,
his gallant and handsome nephew (worth
all Mr. Bulwer's speech-making,
compliment-making
,
diplomatic heroes,) the fine old housekeeper
Alison Wilson, the prim, scraggy, puritanical Mause,
groaning in spirit, and nursing her wrath to keep
it warm, the solid-looking and apparently stupid
Cuddie, and the bold, profligate Bothwell. What
interest in the action and contrast in the faces, and
expression of the faces! It would make the
fortune
of any artist who could do this scene justice.
And then the dialogue: old Mause testifying against
the proceedings of Bothwell and his dragoons, and
uplifting her voice in order that by her means
Master Henry might be delivered like a bird from
the net of the fowler! and Cuddie's expostulations
with his mother anent her testifications, and the
fine contrast between her spiritual aspirations and
his longing after homely temporalities; then the
account of Mause and the Rev. Gabriel
Kettledrummle's
being carried into captivity by the men
of Belial; and again, Dominie Sampson and all
8*
the transactions in which he is concerned,
particularly
his manuvre to recover Lucy Bertram from
her fainting fit by the application of scalding water;
and Caleb Balderstone's contrivances; and the
matrimonial
dialogues between Mr. and Mrs.
Saddletree
,
and so on,
ad infinitum
. It is dangerous to
commence quoting from those novels, for there is
no knowing where to stop. Perhaps the best way
to make manifest Sir Walter Scott's superiority over
every other novelist, would be to merely give the
titles of his works and enumerate the characters
contained in them; the appeal of so many old
acquaintances
to the recollections of the public would
be irresistible.
To copy nature, is a general and
indiscriminate
piece of advice more applicable to a painter
than an author, though addressed to either it is
looked upon as a pithy and profound injunction.
Now to copy nature in her every-day forms, is
neither
difficult nor desirable. To report the slip-slop
conversation of a tea-table is to copy nature, and
the more literal the copy the less the skill required;
but to be
true
to natureto anticipate her, and
make human beings in extraordinary situations
and agitated by strong and conflicting passions, act
and speak as she would make them act and speak
in such situationsto make them do and say that
which the reader has no conception of beforehand,
but which, the moment he has read it, flashes upon
him as the only thing they ought or could have
done and said, is a power that few mortals are
gifted with, and it remains to be shown that Mr.
Bulwer is one of them. His characters have none
of the flippant prittle-prattle of common
conversation
put into their mouths; on the contrary, they
are in the opposite extreme, and many times talk
and act as men and women never talk and acted
before. They harangue, first one a speech, and
then the other a speech, by the page together, and
are by far too didactic and declamatory. The
following
is
one
instance of this author's infelicitous
adaptation of the language and actions of his
personages
to time, place, and circumstances. The
scene is a midnight assassination, where Algernon
Mordaunt falls by the hand of the conspirator
Wolfe. Clarence Linden catches him as he falls,
and with his murdered friend in his arms, and the
murderer standing beside him, gives vent to his
feelings
in the following pertinent and appropriate
interrogation
:Oh
wherewherewhen this man
the wise, the kind, the innocent, almost the
perfect
,
falls thus in the prime of existence, by a sudden
blow from an obscure handunblest in life,
inglorious
in deathoh! wherewhere is this boasted
triumph of virtue, or where is its reward?
Would nature or Sir Walter Scott have made
any man prate after this fashion under such
circumstances
?
True, the author endeavors to soften
down the absurdity by saying that Linden was
unconscious
of the presence of the assassin, but it is
easier for the reader to be told so, than for him to
believe it. A maiden in such a situation with her
lover, or a mother with her child, might be
unconscious
of any thing save the object they were
hanging overbut men and politicianscommon
friends, and the surviving friend cool and collected
enough to question the decrees of fate in good set
termsfor such a one to forget the murderer at his
elbow, is one of those remarkable instances of
abstraction
that very seldom occur, except in a French
tragedy; and it may be very good French-tragedy
nature, but that is about all. If Linden had seized
the assassin and called the watch, it would have
been a more natural sort of proceeding, and much
more in accordance with Mr. Bulwer's utilitarian
principles.
The forte of this writer appears to be eloquent
declamationmelancholy, fervid, or despairing, but
still declamation. (The terms melancholy and
despairing declamation may sound strange, but
perhaps they are not inapplicable to some passages
in Mr. B.'s works.) In Mordaunt it is calm, me
lancholy, and philosophic; fervid and impassioned
in the republican Wolfe; desperate and despairing
in the villain Crauford; and by turns bitter and
enthusiastic in the painter Warner
[2]
[2]
The feelings and sufferings of Warner have a striking
resemblance
to those of the Italian painter Correggio, as depicted in a
tragedy
of that name, a review of which is to be found in one of the early
numbers of Blackwood's Magazine.
This is an
imposing but not very difficult kind of writing, and
the real talent employed in it generally passes for
more than it is worth. This author's is of the best
description, and though certainly the passion
sleeps, it cannot be added that the declamation
roars; it often softens down into moralizing
reflection
,
in which the similes and images employed
are frequently beautiful, and the language in which
they are clothed flowing and melodious, and, when
occasion demands, nervous and vigorous; but it is
not all thisno, nor judiciously introduced classical
allusions and quotationsnor ingenious refutations
of common-place maxims and opinionsnor
brilliant
and antithetical aphorisms, that is to elevate a
man to an equality with the author of the Scotch
novels, to say nothing of the English ones. But it
in no way detracts from Mr. Bulwer's reputation as
a fine writer, to say that Walter Scott is immensely
superior to him; after that wonderful man he is
undoubtedly the most popular novelist of the day.
He may, in the novelty and excitement attending
his debut be both over and under-rated, but
Time at last sets all things even,
and he will doubtless find his proper level, which
we think will be far above the mass of his
contemporaries
a
little higher than the writer of the
O'Hara tales, and some degrees below the author
of Anastasius.
But for thee, good Sir Walter! the time is yet to
come when thou wilt receive the fulness of thy fame.
The present generation admire and applaud thee,
the future will feel a deeper and holier reverence for
thee; and the language in which thou hast
immortalized
thyself is one that is fast spreading in every
quarter of this habitable globe. Over the illimitable
regions of this continent wilt thou be read and
worshipped
;
in distant India and the yet untrodden
wildernesses of Australasia will thy name be known;
and the time may come when the British Isles will
be but as specks of earth to the boundless countries
that will speak their language and treasure up their
glorious literature. Then will the halls of
Abbotsford
become pilgrim shrines, and every decayed
memorial that speaks of thee a relic. And when
the tide of population shall have poured over the
mountain barrier, filling every highland glen with
cotton factoriesand weavers, spinners and such
mechanical persons erect their looms in the very
country of Rob Roy, the wild warriors and plaided
chieftains that once trod those rugged glens and
heathery hills will still live in thy undying page,
and thou wilt be the connecting link between a
present and a past agethe chronicler of the
tales of the times of old, and deeds of the days of
other years. What strange and savage customs
what deadly feudswhat wild legendswhat
furious
passions and fierce fidelity lay concealed
behind
those mountains that gird the highlands, and
which, but for thee, would have passed unrecorded
to oblivion; but as the prophet of old smote the
rock and the waters gushed forth, so didst thou,
with thy magic wand, touch those highland hills,
and the whole billowy scene lay disclosed to view!
Then the bloody lowland and English wars, what
an historian would they have missed; and though
upon the border side,
The glaring bale-fires blaze no more,
and the gallant Gordons and thieving
Armstrongs
and Elliotts keep honest snuff and
tobacconist
shops in Kelso and Jedburgh, yet shall not
the bitter feuds and midnight forays of their
lawless
,
fearless ancestors be forgotten. And when time
shall have made a brick and mortar land of England
when some future Manchester or Birmingham
perchance stands reeking and smoking where the
merry forest of Sherwood stood, still will its verdant
glades once clad in England's fadeless green,
and its strong and towering oaks look fresh and
unwithered in thy pages. How will the future
dwell upon the courtly pageantries of Kenilworth
and the knightly chivalry of Ivanhoeand the
ridings and onslaughts of the border baronsand
the gatherings of the clans in the seventy-six; and
thy native humor will brighten many an eye, and
thy touches of homely natural feeling thrill in many
a bosom yet unborn. Thousands will laugh and
weep with thee in thy works when the kind heart
and capacious head that conceived them are clods
of the valley; and
As long as the thistle and heather shall wave
will thy memory be worshipped and thy name
treasured up in the hearts of posterity.
A WALK IN BROADWAY.
[3]
[3]
This essay was No. 1 of a series published under the title of the
Rambler.
Reader
! gentle or ungentle! if thou for a moment
supposest that I, in placing this or any other
forthcoming
paper under the same title as the essays of
Samuel Johnson, have the slightest intention of
being as grave, as learned, as wise and as eloquent
as the worthy doctor, be not alarmed: read but to
the end of this lucubration, and thou wilt be
convinced
that no such outrage against the prevailing
taste of the times is intended. I do not say but
that I could be all this, if it so pleased me; but I
hope I have too much discretion, as well as too
strong a desire to be read, to harbor the smallest
thought of gravity or wisdom in an age when
startling
paradoxes have such a decided advantage over
sober truths. Antiquated authors like Steele,
Addison
,
Goldsmith, or Johnson, who are now, indeed,
fast falling into deserved oblivion, but whose
names
VOL. I. 9
may possibly be remembered by a few of the most
erudite of this generation, wrote to instruct; their
wiser descendants aim at the higher province of
amusement; and a writer that is now detected
attempting
to be useful, is justly looked upon as no
better than he should be. If any instruction is to
be administered, it must be as pills are to children
smothered in sweetmeats. The grand secret of
composition now-a-days (except among the
highest
,)
is to be flippant, fantastical, and unfeeling,
together
with the judicious use of notes of
exclamation
and interrogation, and a copious admixture of
dashes and asterisks. But this is foreign to the
matter in hand.
I have been a wanderer for the major part of my
sinful life in different parts of the globe, and among
other places have frequently wandered up and down
Broadway, a street situated on a small island
between
the East and North rivers in the state of
New-York, and which the inhabitants of the said
small island boast of as being the finest promenade
in the United States, much to the discomfort of the
mild and equable citizens of the neighboring city of
Philadelphia, who, upon the hearing of such an
assertion, wax exceeding wrothful, and straightway
commence talking, with great energy and
animation
,
of butter and water. At first I could not
perceive
the connexion; but was afterwards given to
understand, that as Broadway and business were
the boast of New-York, so were pure water and
excellent butter the distinguished attributes of
Philadelphia
;
and that the one was invariably used as
a set-off against the other! (In what strange ways,
and after what strange fashions, will not men claim
distinction!) Nay, to such a height has this frantic
lust of pre-eminence been carried, that blood has
been spilt, and the peace of families wrecked, upon
the butter question; and a New-York merchant
tenderly attached to, beloved by, and upon the brink
of marriage with, a Philadelphia heiress, after a
three years' struggle against numerous rivals and
difficulties, actually lost the lady at last by
audaciously
and pertinaciously affirming, that the
butter
was good enough, but nothing to make a noise
about!
Broadway, however, is a very fine street, the
longest, it is said, in a direct line, in the world.
There is not any thing particularly splendid in it,
and the stores, in general, are neither large nor
elegant
,
with an unseemly disproportion of
lottery-offices
among them; but the almost unbroken
line of respectable houses, neatly painted, and
shaded by lofty trees, gives it an air of substantial
comfort, and at the same time of lightness and
freshness, highly desirable. It is pleasant to stroll
along it; or, indeed, the principal street of any
large city. What a motley group of beingsalike,
yet how differentare daily pressing and hurrying
over its pavements! What a multiplicity of hopes,
and fears, and petty plans, and lofty schemes, are
unceasingly fermenting in the bosom of every
individual
that moves along the narrow footwalks!
Yet it is not the variety of human passions that
makes the wonder, for joy and sorrow, love and
hate, pride, vanity, interest, and ambition are
common
to all; but the endless combinations formed
by those passions according to the different degrees
in which they preponderate and act on different
individuals, and on the same individuals in
different
situations. Take up an arithmetic, and ten
simple figures form the ground-work; yet how
many million combinations, and no two alike, can
be created by these ten figures. So it is with man
and his concerns. And still, despite the individual
variety, what a general sameness prevails. The
hopes, and cares, and joys, and sorrows of one day
are like the hopes, and cares, and joys, and sorrows
of the next; and the same drama that is hourly
felt and acted in the streets of New-York, is
playing
with equal animation amid the wealth and
smoke of London, and the sunshine and poverty
of Naplesthe gravity of Madrid, and the gaiety of
Paris. Two thousand years ago, the eternal
city had her belles and beaux, her flirts and
dandies (a Roman dandy!)and two thousand
years hence, or less time, will the cannibals of
New-Zealand
have eschewed war dances and raw
victuals
,
and have their blue-stocking tea-parties,
biscuit
and lemonade
soirees
, French cooks, and
fashionable
quadrilles, as well as anybody. All is
still
The everlasting to be, that hath been;
and the probability is, that the antediluvians wrote
poetry, told lies, wore whiskers, and cheated their
neighbors, just as we do now.
It is also pleasant, as well as curious and
profitable
,
in roaming through a large city, to contrast its
present with its former situationto compare what
it has been with what it is, and to speculate on what
it may be. New-York, to be sure, is not rich in
historical recollections, for she is comparatively a
thing of yesterday. In walking her streets we do
not feel as in the ancient capitals of Europe, that
our footsteps, perchance, fall on the very places
where those of the mighty dead have fallen before
us. In the older streets of London, we know that
we are walking where Richard, Duke of Gloucester,
9*
high-reaching Buckingham, or Harry Hotspur,
actually walked, and that Shakspeare and Milton
familiarly trod even where we then tread; or the
High-street of Edinburghwhere the Leslie and
the Seyton, the Gordon and the Douglass, were
wont foolishly and gallantly to stab and dirk each
other for the crown o' the causeway. True, all
is now common-place and familiar; the merchant
plods homeward with his umbrella under his arm,
instead of his rapier by his side. But great as the
change is there from the past to the present, it has
still been gradual. Step by step have they toiled
their way from barbarism to civilization. Here, it
has been as the shifting of the scenery in a play,
rather than sober reality. It is but as the other
day when the forest flourished where now
merchants
most do congregate, and the streamlet
murmured
where the gin-shop stands. The council-fires
blazed and the sachems spoke to their young men
where now the honorable Richard Riker and the
honorable the corporation hold long talks about
small matters. The wigwam sent its tiny wreaths
of smoke into the clear air, where now the bank
coffee-house pours forth volumes of odoriferous
steam to mingle with the masses of vapor that
overhang
the city like a cloud; and its tables groan
with all the delicacies of the season where the
deer from the wood and the fish from the stream,
were cooked and eaten without the aid of pepper
and salttwo of the greatest blessings of
civilization
.
And not more different than the scenes were the
actors concerned in them. Step aside, good reader,
and mark them as they now pass along Broadway.
The first is one but little known to Indian life
one who lives by the folly and roguery of the fools
and rogues around hima lawyer. He is clad in
solemn black, as if that were ominous of the gloom
which follows in his train. What would the
Indian
,
with his untaught natural sense of right and
wrong, think of this man's quiddets, his quillets,
his cases, his tenures and his tricks; and of his
statutes, his recognizances, his fines, his double
vouchers and his recoveries? Alas! the poor
Indian
has but too deeply felt his power and the
power of his brethren in the modern black art.
They conjured away his pleasant haunts under
the greenwood tree, his silver streams teeming
with life, his beautiful lakes and fair hunting
grounds, all according to law, and left him a
string of beads and a bottle of fire-water, a bruised
heart and a broken spirit in their place. Here
comes another product of the present times, neither
rare nor valuable, indigenous to Broadway, and
flourishing there in peculiar rankness; a modern
Sir Fopling Flutter, of whom it may well be said
with the poet,
Nature disclaims the thinga tailor made him!
Mark with what affected effeminacy the full-grown
baby lounges along, and the air of listless
indifference
or slightly awakened surprise with which it is
his pleasure to regard a fine woman; but what,
indeed, are all the women in the world to this
caricature
of manhood, in comparison with his own
sweet self? Anon, another variety of the same
genus appears, quite as contemptible, not so
amusing
,
and a great deal more disagreeable. This is
your ruffian-dandy; one who affects a dashing
carelessness in his dress and deportment, wears
good clothes in a very ill fashion, and has generally
a checked shirt, a sailor's hat, or some other
article
of dress sufficiently different from the ordinary
costume of those around him to render him an
object
of notoriety. Mark the easy dignity of that
swagger as he rolls along, staring impudently at
all the women and frowning valiantly at all the
men, as if he expected every moment to be insulted,
and was afraid his courage might not be screwed
up to the sticking place. A sort of personage not
unlike Mike Lambourne in Kenilworth, allowing
for the modifications of the times. But lo! what
comes nextdame nature's loveliest work, a
woman
;
but, heaven and earth! how the
mantuamaker
has spoiled her! Why, what frippery have
we here? Silks and lace, ribbons and gauze,
feathers
,
flowers, and flounces! Not but that these
are all excellent things in their way, when
judiciously
used; but to see them all clustered, as in
the present instance, on one woman at one time, is
what the proverb states to be too much of a good
thing, or what the poet terms wasteful and
ridiculous
excess. Then look at those sleeves in
which her arms are lost, and that acre of hat upon
her head, with a sufficiency of wheat ears and
flowers on it, were they real, to feed a family or
stock a garden. And see! as far as the eye can
reach it rests on colors as varied and fantastical as
the butterflies in summer or the leaves in autumn,
in which the
dear
creatures have arrayed
themselves
.
Oh, matrimony, matrimony! thou art
indeed
becoming a luxury in which the rich and
opulent
alone will be able to indulge. Nine small
children might be supported, but to deck out one
of Eve's daughters in this fashion three hundred
and sixty-five days in the year, is what nothing
but a prize in the lottery or a profitable bankruptcy
is equal to.Still on they pass in throngs: the
grave and thoughtful student, abstracted from all
around, building up his day-dream of fame,
fortune
,
and beauty, and then in love with the
cunning
coinage of his own brain; and the rich old
merchant, not in love with any thing but still in
raptures, for cotton has risen an eighth. On they
pass, the whiskered Don, the sallow Italian, the
bulky Englishman, and the spare Frenchman, all
as eager (as a professed moralist might say,) in the
pursuit of business and pleasure, as if enjoyment
were perpetual and life eternal: and all this where,
but a little while ago, the wolf made his lair, and
the savage his dwelling-place. Verily, as a profound
German philosopher acutely though cautiously
observed
let
a man live long enough, and it is
probable
he will see many changes.
STEAM.
I had a dream, which was not all a dream.
Byron
Modern philosophy, anon,
Will, at the rate she's rushing on,
Yoke lightning to her railroad-car,
And, posting like a shooting star,
Swift as a solar radiation
Ride the grand circuit of creation!
Anon
I
have
a bilious friend, who is a great admirer and
imitator of Lord Byron; that is, he affects
misanthropy
,
masticates tobacco, has his shirts made
without collars, calls himself a miserable man, and
writes poetry with a glass of gin-and-water before him.
His gin, though far from first-rate, is better than his
poetry; the latter, indeed, being worse than that of
many authors of the present day, and scarcely fit even
for an album; however, he does not think so, and
makes a great quantity. At his lodgings, a few
evenings ago, among other morbid productions, he
read me one entitled Steam, written in very blank
verse, and evidently modelled after the noble poet's
Darkness, in which he takes a bird's-eye view
of the world two or three centuries hence, describes
things in general, and comes to a conclusion with,
Steam was the universe! Whether it was the
fumes arising from this piece of written vapor, or
whether I had unconsciously imbibed more
hollands
than my temperate habits allow of, I cannot
say, but I certainly retired to bed like Othello,
perplexed
in the extreme. There was no
dreamless
sleep for me that night, and Queen Mab drove
full gallop through every nook and cranny of my
brain. Strange and fantastical visions floated
before
me, till at length came one with all the force
and clearness of reality.
I thought I stood upon a gentle swell of ground,
and looked down on the scene beneath me. It was
a pleasant sight, and yet a stranger might have
passed it by unheeded; but to me it was as the
green spot in the desert, for there I recognised the
haunts of my boyhood. There was the wild
common
on which I had so often scampered frae
mornin
sun till dine, skirted by the old wood, through
which the burn stole tinkling to the neighboring
river. There was the little ivy-covered church with
its modest spire and immoveable weathercock, and
clustering around lay the village that I knew
contained
so many kind and loving hearts. All looked
just as it did on the summer morning when I left
it, and went wandering over this weary world.
To me the very trees possessed an individuality;
the branches of the old oak (there was but one)
seemed to nod familiarly towards me, the music of
the rippling water fell pleasantly on my ear, and
the passing breeze murmured of home, sweet
home. The balmy air was laden with the hum
of unseen insects, and filled with the fragrance of a
thousand common herbs and flowers; and to my
eyes the place looked prettier and pleasanter than
any they have since rested on. As I gazed, the
womanish moisture made dim my sight, and I
felt that yearning of the heart which every man
who has a soul feelslet him go where he will, or
reason how he willon once more beholding the
spot where the only pure, unsullied part of his
existence
passed away.Suddenly the scene changed.
The quiet, smiling village vanished, and a busy,
crowded city occupied its place. The wood was
gone, the brook dried up, and the common cut to
pieces and covered with a kind of iron gangways.
I looked upon the surrounding country, if country
it could be called, where vegetable nature had
ceased to exist. The neat, trim gardens, the
verdant
lawns and swelling uplands, the sweet-scented
meadows and waving corn-fields were all swept
VOL. I. 10
away, and fruit, and flowers, and herbage, appeared
to be things uncared for and unknown. Houses
and factories, and turnpikes and railroads, were
scattered all around, and along the latter, as if
propelled
by some unseen, infernal power, monstrous
machines flew with inconceivable swiftness.
People
were crowding and jostling each other on all
sides. I mingled with them, but they were not
like those I had formerly knownthey walked,
talked, and transacted business of all kinds with
astonishing celerity. Every thing was done in a
hurry; they eat, drank, and slept in a hurry; they
danced, sung, and made love in a hurry; they
married, died, and were buried in a hurry, and
resurrection-men had them out of their graves
before
they well knew they were in them. Whatever
was done, was done upon the high-pressure
principle
.
No person stopped to speak to another in the
street; but as they moved rapidly on their way, the
men talked faster than the women do now, and the
women talked twice as fast as ever. Many were
bald, and on asking the reason, I was given to
understand
they had been great travelers, and that
the rapidity of modern conveyances literally scalped
those who journeyed much in them, sweeping
whiskers
,
eye-brows, eye-lashes, in fact, every thing in
any way moveable, from their faces. Animal life
appeared to be extinct; carts and carriages came
rattling down the highways horseless and
driverless
,
and wheelbarrows trundled along without any
visible agency. Nature was out of fashion, and
the world seemed to get along tolerably well
without
her.
At the foot of the street my attention was
attracted
by a house they were building of prodigious
dimensions, being no less than seventeen stories
high. On the top of it several men were at work,
when, dreadful to relate, the foot of one of them
slipped, and he was precipitated to the earth with a
fearful crash. Judge of my horror and indignation
on observing the crowd pass unheeding by, scarcely
deigning to cast a look on their fellow-creature, who
doubtless lay weltering in his water, and the rest of
the workmen went on with their various avocations
without a moment's pause in consequence of the
accident. On approaching the spot, I heard several
in passing murmur the most incomprehensible
observations
.
Only a steam man, said one.
Won't cost much, said another. His boiler
overcharged, I suppose, cried a third, the way
in which all these accidents happen! and true
enough, there lay a man of tin and sheet-iron,
weltering
in hot water. The superintendent of the
concern, who was not a steam man, but made of
the present materials, gave it as his opinion that
the springs were damaged, and the steam-vessels a
little ruptured, but not much harm done, and
straightway sent the corpse to the blacksmith's
(who was a flesh-and-blood man) to be repaired.
Here was then at once a new version of the old
Greek fable, and modern Prometheuses were
actually
as plentiful as blackberries. In fact, I
found upon inquiry, that society was now divided
into two great classes, living and locomotive
men, the latter being much the better and honester
people of the two; and a fashionable political
economist
,
of the name of Malthus, a lineal descendant
of an ancient, and it appears rather inconsistent
system-monger, had just published an elaborate
pamphlet, showing the manifold advantages of
propagating those no-provender-consuming
individuals
in preference to any other. So that it
appeared
,
that any industrious mechanic might in
three months have a full-grown family about him,
with the full and comfortable assurance that, as the
man says in Chrononhotonthologos, they were
all his own and none of his neighbors.
These things astonished, but they also perplexed
and wearied me. My spirit grew sick, and I longed
for the old world again, and its quiet and peaceable
modes of enjoyment. I had no fellowship with the
two new races of beings around me, and nature
and her charms were no more. All things seemed
forced, unnatural, unrealindeed, little better than
barefaced impositions. I sought the banks of my
native river; it alone remained unchanged. The
noble stream flowed gently and tranquilly as of
yore, but even here impertinent man had been at
work, and pernicious railroads were formed to its
very verge. I incautiously crossed one of them,
trusting to my preconceived notions of time and
space, the abhorred engine being about three
quarters
of a mile from me, but scarcely had I stepped
over, when it flew whizzing past the spot I had
just quitted, and catching me in its eddy, spun me
around like a top under the lash. It was laden
with passengers, and went with headlong fury
straight towards the river. Its fate seemed
inevitable
another
instant and it would be immersed
in the waves, when lo! it suddenly sunk into the
bosom of the earth, and in three seconds was
ascending
a perpendicular hill on the opposite bank
of the river. I was petrified, and gazed around
with an air of helpless bewilderment, when a
gentleman
,
who was doubtless astonished at my
astonishment
,
shouted in passing, What's the fellow
staring at? and another asked if I had never
seen a tunnel before?
10*
Like Lear, my wits began to turn. I wished
for some place where I might hide myself from all
around, and turned instinctively to the spot where
the village ale-house used to stand. But where,
alas! was the neat thatched cottage that was wont
so often to
impart
An hour's importance to the poor man's heart?
Gone! and in its place stood a huge fabric,
labelled
Grand Union Railroad Hotel. But here also
it was steam, steam, nothing but steam! The
rooms were heated by steam, the beds were made
and aired by steam, and instead of a pretty,
red-lipped
,
rosy-cheeked chambermaid, there was a
cursed machine-man smoothing down the pillows
and bolsters with mathematical precision; the
victuals
were cooked by steam; yea, even the meat
roasted by steam! Instead of the clean-swept
hearth
With aspen boughs, and flowers, and fennel gay,
there was a patent steam-stove, and the place was
altogether hotter than any decent man would ever
expect to have any thing to do with. Books and
papers lay scattered on a table. I took up one of
the former; it was filled with strange new phrases,
all more or less relating to steam, of which I knew
nothing, but as far as I could make out the English
of the several items, they ran somewhat thus:
Another shocking catastrophe
.As the
warranted-safe
locomotive smoke-consuming,
fuel-providing
steam-carriage Lightning, was this morning
proceeding at its usual three-quarter speed of one
hundred and twenty-seven miles an hour, at the
junction of the Hannington and Slipsby rail-roads
it unfortunately came in contact with the
steam-carriage
Snail, going about one hundred and five
miles per hour. Of course both vehicles with their
passengers were instantaneously reduced to an
impalpable
powder. The friends of the deceased have
the consolation of knowing that no blame can
possibly
attach to the intelligent proprietors of the
Lightning
,
it having been clearly ascertained that those
of the Snail started their carriage full two seconds
before the time agreed on, in order to obviate in
some degree, the delay to which passengers were
unavoidably subjected by the clumsy construction
and tedious pace of their vehicle.
Melancholy accident
.As a beautiful and
accomplished
young lady of the name of Jimps, a
passenger in the Swift-as-thought-locomotive, was
endeavoring to catch a flying glimpse of the new
Steam University, her breathing apparatus
unfortunately
slipped from her mouth, and she was a
corpse in three quarters of a second. A young
gentleman, who had been tenderly attached to her
for several days, in the agony of his feelings
withdrew
his air tube and called for help; he of course
shared a similar fate. Too much praise cannot be
given to the rest of the passengers, who, with
inimitable
presence of mind, prudently held their
breathing-bladders
to their mouths during the whole of
this trying scene, &c.
A Liverpool paper stated that The stock for the
grand Liverpool and Dublin tunnel under the Irish
channel, is nearly filled up. And a Glasgow one
advocated the necessity of a floating wooden
rail-road
between Scotland and the Isle of Man, in order
to do away with the tiresome steamboat
navigation
.
I took up a volume of poems, but the similes
and metaphors were all steam; all their ideas of
strength, and power, and swiftness, referred to
steam only, and a sluggish man was compared to
a greyhound. I looked into a modern dictionary
for some light on these subjects, but got none,
except
finding hundreds of curious definitions, such
as these:
Horse, s.
an animal of which but little is now
known. Old writers affirm that there were at one
time several thousands in this country.
Tree, s.
a vegetable production; once
plentiful
in these parts, and still to be found in remote
districts.
Tranquillity, s
. obsolete; an unnatural state
of existence, to which the ancients were very
partial
.
The word is to be met with in several old
authors, &c. &c.
In despair I threw down the book, and rushed
out of the house. It was mid-day, but a large
theatre was open, and the people were pouring in.
I entered with the rest, and found that whatever
changes had taken place, money was still money.
They were playing Hamlet by steam, and this was
better than any other purpose to which I had seen
it applied. The automata really got along
wonderfully
well, their speaking faculties being arranged
upon the barrel-organ principle greatly improved,
and they roared, and bellowed, and strutted, and
swung their arms to and fro as sensibly as many
admired actors. Unfortunately in the grave scene,
owing to some mechanical misconstruction,
Hamlet
exploded, and in doing so, entirely demolished
one of the grave-diggers, carried away a great part
of Laertes, and so injured the rest of the dramatis
person that they went off one after the other like
so many crackers, filling the house with heated
vapor
.
I made my escape, but on reaching the
street, things there were ten times worse than ever
It was the hour for stopping and starting the
several
carriages, and no language can describe the
state of the atmosphere. Steam was generating
and evaporating on all sidesthe bright sun was
obscuredthe people looked par-boiled, and the
neighboring fisherman's lobsters changed color on
the instant; even the steam inhabitants appeared
uncomfortably hot. I could scarcely breathe
there was a blowing, a roaring, a hissing, a
fizzing
,
a whizzing going on all aroundfires were
blazing, water was bubbling, boilers were bursting
when, lo! I suddenly awoke and found myself
in a state of profuse perspiration. I started up, ran
to the window, and saw several milkmen and
bakers'
carts, with horses in them, trotting merrily
along. I was a thankful man. I put on my
clothes, and while doing so, made up my mind to
read no more manuscript poems, and eschew
ginand
water for the time to come.
BIOGRAPHY OF JACOB HAYS.
[4]
[4]
This was written during an awful prevalence of biographies.
He is a man, take him for all in all
We shall not look upon his like again.
Shaks
.
Ladies and gentlemen, allow me to introduce to your acquaintance,
Baron
Nabem
, a person who has a very
taking
way with him.
Tom and Jerry
.
Perhaps
there is no species of composition so
generally
interesting and truly delightful as minute
and indiscriminate biography, and it is pleasant to
perceive how this taste is gradually increasing.
The time is apparently not far distant when every
man will be found busy writing the life of his
neighbor, and expect to have his own written in
return, interspersed with original anecdotes, extracts
from epistolary correspondence, the exact hours at
which he was in the habit of going to bed at night
and getting up in the morning, and other
miscellaneous
and useful information carefully selected and
judiciously arranged. Indeed, it is whispered that
the editors of this paper
The New-York Mirror.
intend to take Longworth's
Directory for the groundwork, and give the private
history of all the city alphabetically, without fear
or favorlove or affection. In Europe there exists
an absolute biographical mania, and they are
manufacturing
lives of poets, painters, play-actors,
peers, pugilists, pick-pockets, horse jockeys, and
their horses, together with a great many people
that are scarcely known to have existed at all.
And the fashion now is not only to shadow forth
the grand and striking outlines of a great man's
character, and hold to view those qualities which
elevated him above his species, but to go into the
minuti of his private life, and note down all the
trivial expressions and every day occurrences in
which, of course, he merely spoke and acted like
any ordinary man. This not only affords
employment
for the exercise of the small curiosity and
meddling propensities of his officious biographer, but
is also highly gratifying to the general reader,
inasmuch
as it elevates him mightily in his own
opinion
to see it put on record that great men ate,
drank, slept, walked, and sometimes talked just as
he does. In giving the biography of the high
constable
of this city, I shall by all means avoid
descending
to undignified particulars; though I deem
it important to state, before proceeding further, that
there is not the slightest foundation for the report
afloat that Mr. Hays has left off eating buckwheat
cakes in a morning, in consequence of their lying
too heavily on his stomach.
Where the subject of the present memoir was
born, can be but of little consequence; who were his
father and mother, of still less; and how he was
bred and educated, of none at all. I shall
therefore
pass over this division of his existence in
eloquent
silence, and come at once to the period when
he attained the acm of constabulatory power and
dignity by being created high constable of this city
and its suburbs; and it may be remarked, in
passing
,
that the honorable the corporation, during their
long and unsatisfactory career, never made an
appointment
more creditable to themselves, more
beneficial
to the city, more honorable to the country
at large, more imposing in the eye of foreign
nations, more disagreeable to all rogues, nor more
gratifying to honest men, than that of the
gentleman
whom we are biographizing, to the high office
he now holds. His acuteness and vigilance have
become proverbial; and there is not a misdeed
committed by any member of this community, but
he is speedily admonished that he will have old
Hays [as he is affectionately and familiarly termed]
after him. Indeed, it is supposed by many that
he is gifted with supernatural attributes, and can
VOL. I. 11
see things that are hid from mortal ken; or how,
it is contended, is it possible that he should, as he
does,
Bring forth the secret'st man of blood?
That he can discover undivulged crimethat
when a store has been robbed, he, without stop or
hesitation, can march directly to the house where
the goods are concealed, and say, these are they
or, when a gentleman's pocket has been picked,
that, from a crowd of unsavory miscreants he can,
with unerring judgment, lay his hand upon one
and exclaim you're wanted!or how is it that
he is gifted with that strange principle of ubiquity
that makes him here, and there, and everywhere
at the same moment? No matter how, so long as
the public reap the benefit; and well may that
public apostrophize him in the words of the poet:
Long may he live! our city's pride!
Where lives the rogue, but flies before him!
With trusty crabstick by his side,
And staff of office waving o'er him.
But it is principally as a literary man that we
would speak of Mr. Hays. True, his poetry is
unwritten, as is also his prose; and he has
invariably
expressed a decided contempt for philosophy,
music, rhetoric, the
belles letters
, the fine arts, and
in fact all species of composition excepting bailiff's
warrants and bills of indictmentbut what of that?
The constitution of his mind is, even unknown to
himself, decidedly poetical. And here I may be
allowed to avail myself of another peculiarity of
modern biography, namely, that of describing a
man by what he is not. Mr. Hays has not the
graphic power or antiquarian lore of Sir Walter
Scottnor the glittering imagery or voluptuous
tenderness of Moorenor the delicacy and polish
of Rogersnor the spirit of Campbellnor the
sentimentalism
of Miss Landonnor the depth and
purity of thought and intimate acquaintance with
nature of Bryantnor the brilliant style and
playful
humor of Halleckno, he is more in the petit
larceny manner of Crabbe, with a slight touch of
Byronic power and gloom. He is familiarly
acquainted
with all those interesting scenes of vice
and poverty so fondly dwelt upon by that reverend
chronicler of little villany, and if ever he can be
prevailed upon to publish, there will doubtless be
found a remarkable similarity in their works. His
height is about five feet seven inches, but who
makes his clothes we have as yet been unable to
ascertain. His countenance is strongly marked,
and forcibly brings to mind the lines of Byron when
describing his Corsair:
There was a laughing devil in his sneer
That raised emotions both of hate and fear;
And where his glance of apprehension, fell,
Hope withering fled, and mercy sighed, farewell!
Yet with all his great qualities, it is to be doubted
whether he is much to be envied. His situation
certainly has its disadvantages. Pure and
blameless
as his life is, his society is not courtedno man
boasts of his friendship, and few indeed like even
to own him for an intimate acquaintance.
Wherever
he goes his slightest action is watched and
criticized
;
and if he happen carelessly to lay his hand
upon a gentleman's shoulder and whisper
something
in his ear, even that man, as if there were
contamination in his touch, is seldom or never seen
afterwards in decent society. Such things cannot
fail to prey upon his feelings. But when did ever
greatness exist without some penalty attached
to it?
The first time that ever Hays was pointed out
to me, was one summer afternoon, when acting
in his official capacity in the city-hall. The room
was crowded in every part, and as he entered with
a luckless wretch in his gripe, a low suppressed
murmur ran through the hall, as if some superior
being had alighted in the midst of them. He
placed the prisoner at the bara poor coatless
individual
,
with scarcely any edging and no roof
to his hatto stand his trial for bigamy, and then,
in a loud, authoritative tone, called out for silence,
and there was silence. Again he spokehats off
there! and the multitude became uncovered; after
which he took his handkerchief out of his left-hand
coat pocket, wiped his face, put it back again,
looked sternly around, and then sat down. The
scene was awful and impressive; but the odor
was disagreeable in consequence of the heat acting
upon a large quantity of animal matter
congregated
together. My olfactory organs were always
lamentably acute: I was obliged to retire, and
from that time to this, I have seen nothing,
though I have heard much of the subject of this
brief and imperfect, but, I trust, honest and
impartial
memoir.
Health and happiness be with thee, thou prince
of constablesthou guardian of innocencethou
terror of evil doers and little boys! May thy years
be many and thy sorrows fewmay thy life be
like a long and cloudless summer's day, and may
thy salary be increased! And when at last the
summons comes from which there is no escaping
when the warrant arrives upon which no bail
can be put inwhen thou thyself, that hast
wanted so many, art in turn wanted and
must go,
Mayst thou fall
Into the grave as softly as the leaves
Of the sweet roses on an autumn eve,
Beneath the small sighs of the western wind,
Drop to the earth!
LOVE OF CHANGEHOUSE HUNTING.
Man never is, but always to be blest
Pope
.
There
must be a great quantity of Dutch blood in
this city, for the euphonious names of
Vanbenschoten
,
Vanvredenburgh, Vanvoorhis, Vanoutersturp,
Vanschaick, Vanbokkelin, Vanmeerbeekie,
Vogelsang
,
Vonck, Volk, Vogt, &c. are to be met with in
every street, and at every corner; but in what street
or at what corner are to be found the still and tranquil
virtues, the sedate and circumspect demeanor, the
profound love of ease and phlegmatic temperament
of the ancient denizens of Manahatta? In the good
old times that have for ever passed away from this
island, a man might be born, reared, married, and
buried within a circuit of three miles; and a true
Dutchman would as soon have thought of going to
bed without his night-cap, as of chopping and
changing about from one house to another.
Wherever
he first inhaled the breath of life, there he
exhaled it. It was quite clear to his mind that
Providence had cast his lot in a certain street, and
a certain house, and for him to think of emigrating
to another, would not only be presumptuously
setting
up his judgment against high authority, but a
great waste of bodily exertion. Indeed, when he
looked around, and saw all the furniture firmly
fixedthe ponderous dresserthe solemn clock
the substantial tablejust as his great-grandfather
had placed them when the first ship first drifted
from Holland to this coast, the idea of pulling them
from their places, carrying them out into the open
air, and setting them up in another domicile,
seemed
not only a sacrilegious disturbance of the
household
gods, but an enterprise requiring so much toil
and trouble, as to make it scarcely worth the while
attempting, considering the short time that is
allotted
for man to sojourn in this world. So lived the
forefathers of a goodly portion of the present
quicksilver
generation. They worked when there was
no help for it, and sat still whenever they could;
they counted over their bright silver dollars (the
only kind of change a Dutchman loves) and put
them carefully away in their old stockingsthey
took their glass of genuine Schedam, they smoked
their pipes in peace
They eat and drank and slept. What then?
They eat and drank and slept again.
And even so passed away the mortal existence of
the forefathers of the identical Master Cicero
Vanderscholten
,
that goes to masquerades and executes
pigeon-wings and pirouettes with such grace and
agility; and so lived the progenitors of Miss Cecilia
Amelia Anna Maria Vanwaggenen, that makes a
noise on the piano, and keeps an album!
O
tempora
,
O mores!
Of all the civilized nations on the face of the
earth, the Americans seem to attach the least value
to a local habitation; and of all the parts of
America, New-York is the most restless. Its
citizens
seem to be born with a feverish love of change
and excitement, which pervades, more or less, every
action of their lives, and to this they sacrifice
friends, interest, and convenience. They put no
faith in the proverblet well enough alonebut
are always ready to give up well enough in the
desperate hope of getting something better. They
must be in motion, and that motion is about as
different from that of their Dutch ancestors as the
motion of a duck pond on a calm day is from that of
the rapids of Niagara. In business they are fickle to
a degree that appears, and really is, heartless and
unfeeling. They will give up a tradesman that
has served them well and faithfully, and in whom
they can place confidence, to run after some fresh
adventurer, of whom they know nothing. But
this is the way all over the country; and a
tradesman
has in reality just as little consideration for
his customers as his customers have for him. A
man commences business in a small city; in the
course of time forms acquaintance and connexions,
and finds himself getting along, as he says, as
comfortably as he can wish, when suddenly he
hears of some new town that has sprung up in the
wilderness, where they are doing considerable of
a business; and, without more to do, he sells off
his stock, takes leave, without regret, of kind friends
and familiar faces, and sets off to the land of
promise
to run a similar career. This is a national
trait, and does not attach, with any peculiar force,
to this city; but, for the love of change in their
places of residence, the New-Yorkers are
particularly
famous. They never regard a house as a
kind of inanimate friendone who has protected
them from cold, and rain, and tempest, and by
whose hearth they have spent many happy hours,
and enjoyed many comforts; but merely as a
temporary
covering, under whose roof it would be a
sin, shame, and a folly to live two years in
succession
.
Accordingly, on the first of May, when
people
all over the world are enjoying that charming
season among fields and flowers, the sagacious
citizens of New-York think they have lived quite
long enough in one place, and prepare to pitch
their tents elsewhere. Those that live up town
come down, and those that live down town go up;
and amidst disjointed furniture, broken crockery,
dust, dirt, and vermin, they hail the genial approach
of smiling May. After spending their money, losing
their regular dinners, and suffocating themselves
for three or four days, they squat down in their
new domicile for another twelvemonth.
But it is not only the miseries attending the
committal
of the act itself, but also the preliminary
ones which bespeak its approach, that are to be
taken into account. There is a great and crying
evil at present existent in this city, entitled, house
hunting, which disturbs the peace of families, and
is productive of much scandal and other ill
consequences
.
It appears that on the first day of
February
the householders notify their several
landlords
that they have only one more quarter's rent
to expect from them, and immediately after such
notification, nearly all the tenements in the city
are labelled this house to let, inquire so and so.
A stranger would naturally suppose that the plague,
the yellow fever, or some tremendous evil was
momentarily
expected, and that the inhabitants were
about to seek safety,
en masse
, in flight. No such
thing; but from that time the proud boast, that a
man's house is his castle, no longer belongs to the
citizens of New-York. A Spaniard's doors are not
more open to the holy fathers of the inquisition, or
a place-hunter's to a man in office, than are his to
all the impertinent people who please to demand
admittance. They march through his rooms, peep
under his bed and into his closets, and not
unfrequently
surprise him and his family in very
equivocal
situations; after which, they express a hope
that they have not disturbed them, to which they
receive a lying answer in the affirmativebeg
leave to trouble them for a glass of cold water
say they don't think the house will answer
and go about their business; and the only
satisfaction
the poor people have, is to go unto their
neighbor
and do likewise. But this is not all. There
is a nest of old maids in the city, who, having given
up all hopes of ever being obliged to look after a
house on their own account, kindly volunteer to do
so for their friends, in order to indulge their
penchant
for inspecting their neighbor's affairs, and
discuss the interesting tittle-tattle arising therefrom.
Under various pretexts they pop their noses into
every hole and corner of pantries, parlors, kitchens,
and cupboards, and spy into the barrenness of the
house; and all this is noted down in a sort of diary,
to be used afterwards at visits and card parties, as
occasion may require. I am slightly in the good
graces of the niece of one of these ancient women,
who favored me with a peep at her aunt's land
log-book
,
from which I made the following extracts.
For obvious reasons, the names of the people and
numbers of the houses are omitted.
February
5.No.  Greenwich-street. Called
at the house of Mrs. D. Rooms smallno
garretswonder where the goodness all the children
sleep. Carpets very shabbyremains of a turkey
carefully put by in the pantry, and black woman
making her dinner off cold mutton. Eldest Miss
D. has a new silk pelissewonder where the money
came from.
Mem
. The D.'s
may
be honest
enough, but can't imagine how some people make
a living!
Same day
.No.  Broadwaylooked in upon
my dear friend Mrs. Wthe house to let, going to
take a larger one. Cut a great dashhope it may
last. Mr. W. is, to be sure, cashier of the  bank,
but his salary cannot be much. Some how or
other, people in banks never want money.
Mem
.
If Mr. W. should be back in his accounts and
commit
suicide, which is not unlikely, what would
become
of poor dear Mrs. W.?
VOL. I. 12
February
17.No.  Hudson-square. Fine
looking housegreat deal larger than what I
wanted
,
but went in to see it. Mrs. M. not at home;
was shown through the house by Miss M. a poor
white-faced creature, with her hair out of curl, who
looked as if she had just got up. Recollected
meeting
a prettyish sort of girl by that name at Mrs.
K.'s party last night. Found out it was the same
should never have known her! Not quite so much
color as she had when dancing last night
suppose
she can get more when she wants it. Good
gracious! how the poor men are deceived!
Same day
.Went through the sausage
manufacturer's
premises in the Bowery.
Mem
. Eat no
more sausages, &c. &c.
It would be tedious to give more of these precious
records; suffice it to say, that there was scarcely a
house from the East river to the North, or from
the Battery to the regions about Fourth-street, which
had not been inspected by one or more of these
scandalous old women, who meet at night and
compare
notes; and not a single kind remark or
charitable supposition was ventured upon by any
one of them. They went altogether on Sir Peter
Teazle's principle, that it was a bad world, and
the fewer that speak well of it the better.
But this is by no means the only evil to which
the citizens subject themselves by this love of
change. They are innumerable; and, perhaps,
one of the heaviest is the injury done to the
periodical
literature of the country. A man will subscribe
for a paper or a magazine, with which he professes
to be agreeably entertained and well satisfied;
but if any new adventurer spring up, and promise
impossibilities in a flaming prospectus, he
straightway
relinquishes that which he knows to be good,
for the chance of getting something better; and
this, in its turn, is thrown aside for fresh
experiments
.
In no country are there so many and such
abortive attempts to get up fresh publications, and
this, in a great degree, accounts for it. Of the
majority
it cannot be said, that
'Tis pity they're short-lived.
They do not good and much harm; for by diverting
public patronage into so many channels, all are
inadequately rewarded, and hence the poor state of
the public press generally, compared with other
countries. In all sorts of business it is precisely
the same. If a man finds that past endeavors are
no security for future favors, he naturally relaxes
in those endeavors, and will as soon sell a bad
article
as a good one, when there is an equal chance of
his customer returning; thus, the evils which the
buyers inflict upon the sellers in the first instance,
eventually return upon themselves, and no one
gains by those proceedings but those who, under a
better state of things, would be neglected entirely.
But what avails talking? What can be expected
from the inhabitants, when the fathers of the city
set them such examples? The people move
themselves
,
but the corporation move the houses. Their
committee come and squint along a street, and then
say unto a man, Sir, you must shift your house
sixteen feet back! Shade of Wouter Von Twiller!
shift a house! What would a genuine Dutchman
think of such a proceeding; or, indeed, any
European
?
A little Frenchman, fresh from Paris, who
thought every thing on earth was to be seen there,
lately witnessed a performance of this kind. He
was met by a friend soon after, in a high state of
excitation. Oh, mon dieu! said he, I have
see what in Paris I nevare have seenevare! I
have see one house taking one leetle valk!Mon
dieu! But the evil may not stop here. In time
streets and squares may be found traveling about
the city, and it is not impossible that a man may
be run over by a church.
HYPOCHONDRIACISM.
O wad some power the giftie gie us,
To see oursels as ithers see us!
It wad frae monie a blunder free us,
An' foolish notion;
What airs in dress an' gait wad lea'e us,
An' e'en devotion!
Burns
.
Hypochondriacism
is a disorder produced by the
disorganization of the nervous system, whereby the
patient ceases to view things as they exist, and
acquires
the property of seeing others that have no
existence. His faculties become changed, and he
regards chimeras as realities, and realities as
chimeras
.
On all points excepting one, a
hypochondriac
may be perfectly sane, but on that one he
looks upon the rest of the world as fools, and
himself
as the only person to whom heaven has given
light. There are many shades of this disorder, and
the ways in which it manifests itself are
innumerable
.
Doctor Johnson gives a very meagre
definition
of a hypochondriac when he says it is one
12*
affected with melancholy. Now, though in some
instances this may be the primary cause, in nine
cases out of ten it is the offspring of vanity and
ignorance
,
which, secreting themselves in a man's
brain, engender there strange and overweening
notions
of his own qualities and capabilities; this, in
the first stage of the disorder, is termed self-conceit,
but swelling beyond all imaginable or endurable
bounds, it becomes at last a confirmed case of
mental
delusion, and takes the form of medical, legal,
religious, political, or literary hypochondriacism.
One of the peculiarities of this disease is the
manner in which those who are affected with it
laugh and jeer at all who are in a similar
predicament
with themselvesthe quickness with which
they detect their neighbor's infirmities, and the
obstinacy
with which they shut their eyes to their
own. Thus, a well-informed gentleman, who eat,
drank, slept, and behaved himself like other people,
could never get over the strange belief that he was
a barleycorn, and at the mere sight of a barn-yard
fowl he would fly into his house and lock himself
in, for fear of being picked up and transferred
to the crop of his enemy; yet the same
gentleman
was very much tickled with the story of
another hypochondriac, who in walking imagined
that he did not possess the power of turning, but
must of necessity move on in a direct line, and who
had cut himself severely by marching straight
through a shop window which unfortunately
crossed his wayjust as one foolish
hypochondriacal
author will laugh at another's expectations
of immortality, although at the same time he
does not entertain a doubt of its being his own
inheritance. I knew a profound scholar, and what
is more, a sensible man, but who, nevertheless,
insisted that he was cursed with a cast-iron nose.
No arguments could convince him of the fallacy of
what he considered so self-evident that it might be
observed by any one; and when a storm of
thunder
and lightning occurred, he was to be seen
running
about in an agony of fear, and using all sorts
of precautions to prevent his metal proboscis from
attracting
the electric fluid; after the storm he would
regain his composure, and thank heaven for his
remarkable deliverance. A friend, to cure him of
this fancy, told him of another person who
imagined
he had a glass nose, and was afraid of going
out on a windy day for fear of getting it injured,
at which he laughed immoderately, and proceeded
to show very plainly that no man ever had, or could
by any possibility have a glass nose. The other
then began gently to insinuate doubts respecting
the existence of any metallic substance on his
own face, upon which he grew mightily
offended
,
hit his nose a sharp blow, and asked him if he
could not hear it was cast-iron by the sound! This
would all seem ridiculous enough to a spectator,
but how many hundred thousands are there in this
world who terrify themselves with evils just as
imaginary
as cast-metal noses, yet at the same time
laugh heartily at the fears of those who
entertain
apprehensions for their glass ones? but because
their numbers are such as to keep each other in
countenance, they escape the charge of
hypochondriacism
which manifestly attaches to them.
Of all classes of hypochondriacs, the
health-preserving
are perhaps the most numerous and
notorious
.
These are the people for whom heaven has
not been able to make any thing fit to eat. Every
dish that is set upon the table is, according to their
view of things, impregnated with subtle poison.
One produces flatulency, another aciditybeef is
indigestible, ham is bilious, tea nervous, and so on
from the simplest receipt in Dr. Kitchiner's cookery
to the most complicated effort of Mons. Ude.
Whenever
they eat they say, I know it is wrong; and
look upon a person who makes a hearty, careless,
miscellaneous meal, as one who is not long for this
world. All their conversation turns upon their
internal
concerns; and, in company, they favor the
unfortunate lady or gentleman who sits next them
with anecdotes of their stomach and digestive
reminiscences
for the last three weeks. They are
amateurs
in physic, and swallow all sorts of
abominations
with infinite relish; and then they wonder,
for all the care they take of themselves, that they
are no better. Poor wretches! the undertaker eyes
them as he walks along; the coffin-maker takes
their dimensions in his mind's eye, and proceeds
to make their mahogany resting-places on
speculation
;
the sexton chuckles at their approach, and
says he hopes he see's them well! the
resurrectionist
marks them for his own; and the surgeon,
surveying their formation with a scientific eye,
longs to settle some disputed points of anatomy by
means of their unfortunate bodies. Death comes
at last and pops the little life out of them that
dieting
and doctoring have left, and they are troubled
with hypochondriacism no more!
Literary, as well as health-preserving
hypochondriacism
,
is not unfrequently occasioned by a slight
touch of dyspepsia. Young gentlemen with yellow
faces and weak digestions, mistake the sickly
fancies
produced by a diseased state of the humors for
the coruscations of genius, and whenever they feel
a little unwell, concoct what they call poetry, which
is merely a number of hypochondriacal notions
strung together, in which they abuse the
unfeeling
world, and long for pleasant death, and the
quiet peaceful grave, at the same time that they
are taking their spring physic, and using all
necessary
precautions to avoid one and keep out of the
other as long as possible. They poetize somewhat
after this fashion:
My burning browmy burning brow!
My bursting heartmy mad'ning brain!
Wouldwouldthat ye were quiet now,
And I at rest from all my pain!
The gravethe grave!how calm they sleep
Who lie where yonder yew-trees wave!
They neither sob, nor cry, nor weep
Oh give me thatthe grave! the grave!
and such like abominable nonsense, which many
people call very pretty, and very pathetic, and
so they come all at once to believe themselves poets,
and go on wishing themselves dead, until people of
common sense would have no objection if they
were taken at their word. One of the most
absurd
peculiarities of this tribe is, their invariably
assuming that physical imbecility and mental
strength go together, and
vice versa
, as if a sound
constitution, a cheerful temper, and a vigorous and
imaginative mind were incompatible. William
Shakspeare, Walter Scott, and Robert Burns were,
in their several ways, the three greatest men that
ever lived, and at the same time three as healthy,
hearty, and merry fellows, as the world has seen,
and never wrote a line of regular churchyard
poetry
in their lives.
Political hypochondriacs are as thick as flies at
midsummer, and are more headstrong, absurd, and
obstinate, than any of the other classes. No matter
how monstrous their dogmas are, the pertinacity
with which they cling to them leaves the man with
the cast-iron nose far behind. A member of the
English parliament got it into his head, and all the
other members could not get it out, that the great
cause of distress among the poor was the
plentifulness
of the grain harvests, that starvation was a
necessary consequence of over-production, and the
more wheat there was grown the less there would
be eaten. In this country certain people advocate a
tariff that will increase commerce and support the
navy, by doing away with the necessity for ships
and sailors; while others believe in a dissolution of
society, in consequence of a few men, calling
themselves
masons, getting together in a snug room, for
the purpose of singing and drinking without fear of
interruption. Indeed, there is no notion too
improbable
to find its way into the head of a political
hypochondriac. Many well-meaning individuals
firmly believed as soon as General Jackson became
president, that men would hang on trees as thick
as acorns, that he would fire the city of
Washington
,
destroy the constitution of the United States,
put the country under martial law, keep his hand
in practice by shooting a dozen citizens or so of a
morning before breakfast, and do a number of other
improper things for reasons best known to himself;
and when they are told that no such thing has
happened
,
they very wisely shake their heads, and say
the ides of March are not yet over. There is
another set of political hypochondriacs who credit
whatever the newspapers tell them, and of course
are worse than all the rest put together.
Then there are the religious hypochondriacs,
who firmly believe that no one can be in the right
except themselves
Some think on Calvin heaven's own spirit fell,
While others deem him instrument of hell.
But this is ticklish ground. In theatricals the cases
of hypochondriacism are innumerable, and generally
incurable. I have seen matrons of forty-five years
of age and one hundred and fifty pounds weight,
who really thought they looked and played the
girlish Juliet to perfection, and whom no
criticism
could convince to the contrary; and I have
seen a little fat fellow of five feet and an inch, who
looked upon himself as the
beau ideal
of Roman
grandeur and dignity. I have seen Miss  fancy
she could play a fashionable lady, and Mr.
imagine that he looked like a gentleman. I have
seenbut cases multiply too fast.
The greatest hypochondriac of modern times,
however, is undoubtedly Robert Owen. This very
singular individual has taken it into his head, that
by means of certain strange doctrines which have
the immediate effect of crazing the intellects of
those who dabble in them, the world is to be
regenerated
,
and the perfectability of human nature
accomplished
.
He actually believes the time is coming
when men will not lie, nor women flirtwhen
banks will not break nor bills be protestedwhen
tailors will keep their words and gentlemen pay
their debtswhen brokers will be generous and
politicians independentwhen a man will love his
neighbor as himself, and lend him money without
interest or securitywhen Cobbett will be
consistent
and Lady Morgan unaffected, and other things
equally strange and improbable. This is the
greatest
case of hypochondriacism on record, either
moral or medical, and any man who will believe
these things, will believe that the world is growing
honester.
VOL. I. 13
IDLE PEOPLE.
Under the greenwood tree
Who loves to lie with me,
And tune his merry note
Unto the sweet bird's throat,
Come hither, come hither, come hither!
Here shall he see
No enemy,
But winter and rough weather.
Shaks
.
There
is no class of human beings visited with
more matter-of-course vituperation than idle
people
.
Idleness! it is the greatest vice of
civilization
,
for it is the least profitable. Men may lie,
and cheat, and game, and drink, and break the ten
commandments in whatsoever way they please,
and they will find apologists; but for idleness, no
one lifteth up his voice to speak. From the busy
haunts of men, from the toil and turmoil of the
marts of traffic, from the din and smoke of
manufactories
,
from the high courts of Mammon, it is for
ever banished: only on the pleasant hill side, in
the waving meadow, and under the ancient forest
trees, or by the babbling brook and lazy river hath
it sought out an undisturbed retreat; and there its
devotee is to be found, stretched luxuriously along
the green sward, worshipping his divinity after his
own calm and easy fashion. Foolish fellow! up
and away unto the crowded city, for there money,
the white man's god, is to be madespend thy
days in bargaining and wrangling and
over-reaching
,
and thy nights in scheming and calculating
until thou art worth a million! but rest not, relax
not, toil and bargain and wrangle on, and thou
mayest yet be worth a million and a half! and then
if death some morning put a stop unto thy
profitable
speculations, think, for all thy care and anxiety
thy joyless days and sleepless nightswhat a
glorious consolation is thine! The poor idler goes
to his grave not worth a groat, while thou
descendest
to thine everlasting rest with more money
invested
in the funds than any man on 'change!
Idleness, saith the proverb, is the mother of
mischief. How strange that such a noisy
brawling
urchin should spring from so inoffensive a
parent
!
For my own part, I have a respect for idle
people; and, when no one suffers by their idleness,
they are the most sensible people on the face of the
earthyour only true philosophers. Love of ease
is natural to man, and industry came into the world
with original sin. Hard work occasioned the first
murder. If Cain, instead of tilling the stubborn
earth and earning his bread by the sweat of his
brow, had had nothing to do but lounge on the
mountain-side like his brother Abel, play his pipe,
watch his sheep feeding, and then feed himself, he
would never have envied him, and the second great
transgression would not have come to pass.
That idleness is the natural state of man, cannot
be doubted. Like the flowers of the field it
springeth
up without care or culture; but industry is a
hot-house plant, of forced and artificial growth, and
is apt to wither away, if not anxiously tended and
cherished. In asserting these undeniable truths,
let it not be supposed that any reproach is meant
to be cast on the industrious. Nothe man who
sacrifices his love of ease, and labors unremittingly
that his wife may be at rest, and his little ones
comfortably clothed and fedthat he may be free
from duns and debts, and walk through the world
fearing and beholden to no living creaturesuch a
man is worthy of all admiration. But there are
others, who have enough and to spare, but still go
onthe slaves of avarice and habit; who
dignify
their love of gain with the name of industry,
and plume themselves mightily on never being a
single minute idle; why what are they at best but
miserable earth-wormsvoluntary bondmen; the
worldly wise, and yet the most egregious fools!
One thing that has undeservedly brought
idleness
into bad repute, is the confounding it with
laziness, than which no two things can be more
different. The lazy sluggard who hates motion in
every shape, and lies upon the earth an inert piece
of animation, is scarcely upon a par with the beasts
that perish. A fine specimen of this tribe was a
fat old gentleman of this city, a prodigious eater,
who, in the summer time, used to sit, by the day
together, smoking and steaming like a caldron.
The only exercise he was ever known to take
consisted
in calling out, after he had sat on one seat
long enough to make it uncomfortably warm,
John, bring me a cool chair! and then moving
from one chair to the other. Now idle people are
the very reverse of this. In all sorts of games and
sports they are first and foremost. It is they who
can pitch a quoit or bowl a cricket-ball straighter
and truer than any one else; the swiftest runners
and most active wrestlers of the district. It is they
who have roamed the country far and wide, and
know where the finest fishing streams are to be
found, and where the birds are most plentifulthe
healthiest, hardiest, and most venturesome of
heaven's
creatures; who will scramble up a precipice,
13*
and risk their necks for a bird's nest, but droop and
pine away under a regular routine of
money-making
tasks. There are, however, different varieties
of this species, like every other. Some of a more
contemplative turn, who seek out the pleasant nooks
and shady places, known but to themselves, and
there muse away their hours. These are intimate
acquaintances of nature, and are initiated into
thousands
of her little secrets that others know not of;
and with Shakspeare in their hand, they read
unfolded
mysteries of mind and matter, that seem,
and are, not the records of observation, but the
outpourings
of inspiration. Such an one was Jaques,
though rather too cynical; and, at times, even such
an one must Shakspeare have been. It appears
impossible
that the scenes in the forest of Arden could
have been engendered any where except under
the shade of melancholy boughs. So thoroughly
are they imbued with a true pastoral spirit, so free
from the noise and smoke of cities, that it is really
strange, after reading As you like it, with your
mind filled with images of lonely forest walks, and
their denizens the duke of Amiens and his
comates
and brothers in exile, to walk to the
window
and see so many streets, houses, carriages, and
fantastically dressed men and women. How
pitiable
would he be who could afford to dream away
hours amid such scenes, and yet who should
forsake
them
For so much dross as may be grasped thus!
Yet idle people are looked upon as the very worst
and most good-for-nothing people in existence.
They are under the ban of society. The worldly
father points them out to his son as a warning, and
the prudent mother watches that her marriageable
daughter's eye rests not on them; their names are
stricken from invitation lists; and every griping
scoundrel twitteth them and vaunteth his superior
pack-horse qualifications. And for what?why,
their comparative poverty and practical philosophy.
Yet they are in one sense the wealthiest of men,
Poor and content, is rich, and rich enough;
But riches, fineless, is as poor as winter
To him that ever fears he shall be poor.
In towns a person of this temperament is
altogether
out of his element. He is a connoisseur in
sweet, wholesome air, and sighs to rove about in
search of it. As long as the grizzly tyrant winter
keeps the fair spring in chains, it matters little
where he is; but when one of those glorious days
that herald her approach breaks forth, and nature
becomes, on the instant, all life and animation,
there are few men, let them be as industrious as
they may, who have not experienced his feelings.
Who, on such a day, has not felt a pleasing languor
steal over him, and a distaste for ordinary pursuits
and avocations? Who does not long to leave the
hubbub of the city far behind, to stroll forth into
the fields, and have the taint of the smoke blown
off by the fresh April winds? and who would not
do so if
Necessity, the master still of will,
How strong soe'er it is,
did not drag him back to his toils? Oh! what a
clog it is on a man's spirit to feel that he is a slave
(for what are they but slaves with the privilege
of change, whose daily labor buys their daily bread?)
to long for liberty, yet feel that the pure air, the
green fields, the blue sky, the very commonest gifts
of nature, that are enjoyed by the brutes of the
earth and the birds of the air, are denied to him?
True, he may break through all restraints and go
about inhaling as much fresh air as he pleases;
but when the cravings of appetite hint to him that
it is dinner time, whence are to come the victuals
that constitute that important item in the sum total
of human happiness? Man is unfortunately a
carnivorous
animal, and must, once a day at least, be
fed with flesh, fowl, or fish: he cannot make an
unsophisticated repast off the roots and fruits of
the earth, for though
his anatomical construction
Bears vegetables in a grumbling sort of way
Yet certainly he thinks, beyond all question,
Beef, veal, and mutton easier of digestion.
Then why are idle people, who can afford to be
so without wrong to any one, so hardly dealt with,
when all men, deserving the name, would be idle
if they could? Who ever knew a creature that
made use of the too-common expression, I am
never easy unless I am doing something, that was
worth passing an hour with, or that showed the
slightest symptoms of having a soul? He cannot
be easy without doing something, merely because
he cannot hold communion with himself; he has
no treasures of thought to which he can revert,
and his mind preys upon itself unless exercised in
the miserable distinctions and petty gains and
triumphs
of business, which is at best but a necessary
evil. With a few exceptions, I much admire the
state of things that the old courtier in the Tempest
proposes to introduce into the enchanted island if
he were king of it
No kind of traffic
Would I admit; no name of magistrate;
Letters should not be known; no use of service,
Of riches, or of poverty; no contracts,
Successions; bound of land, tilth, vineyard, none:
No use of metal, corn, or wine, or oil;
No occupation; all men idle, all;
And women too; but innocent and pure.
All things in common nature should produce
Without sweat or endeavor; treason, felony,
Sword, pike, knife, gun, or need of any engine,
Would I not have; but nature should bring forth
Of its own kind, all foison, all abundance,
To feed my innocent people.
PRIZE TRAGEDIES.
In
days of yore Melpomene was a proud and
haughty dame, who had to be long and ardently
wooed before she would vouchsafe her company to
any one; she was like one of those fair,
unreasonable
damsels in the age of chivalry, for whose sake
a man had to endure much abstinence, penance,
and mortification before he was rewarded with the
slightest degree of familiarity; but now she is
transformed
into a mere modern miss, who will flirt and
keep company with all who take the trouble of
asking
her. And then both she and her votaries have
become mercenary. In former times it was the
divinity which stirred within them that prompted
tragic poets to the creation of those mighty works
that have spread a halo around their names; now
it is a mere matter of dollars and cents: ours serve
for hire, and undertake to manufacture tragedies on
any given subject that may be dictated to them.
On one point, however, they have decidedly the
advantage; if the ancients were superior to the
moderns in strength, they are far inferior in
productiveness
;
and an author now litters more
literary
offspring in a year, than three or four could
formerly bring forth in ten; but what is produced
with so little trouble and in such abundance, is
sickly and short-lived; whilst the rare, but healthy,
hardy offspring of the intellects of other years still
continue to bloom and flourish in immortal
youth.
The great point of inferiority of the ancients to
us was their ignorance of machinery, the
discoveries
in which we have applied admirably both to
physics and literature. Our forefathers were in
bodily strength immensely superior to the present
slim generation; yet by the aid of engines we can
do more in an hour than they could in a year. So
it is with the drama. They were giants in
intellect
,
and a tragedy was with them a tremendous
mental struggle and victory; with us it is a mere
mechanical affair. The matter is a trifle, the
manner
all in all. We take an interesting anecdote,
put it into turgid blank verse, inflate it with
bombast
and epithets, divide and subdivide it into acts
and scenes, and, by the aid of machinery, scenery,
dresses and decorations, make it go off with more
noise and eclat than can be produced by the most
striking and wonderful delineations of human
passion
.
The curious anatomy of the heart of man is
not half so imposing as the intricacies of a grand
tramp march; and a prolonged mock combat and
pantomimic style of giving up the ghost are superior
to the very finest poetry. This is not idle
complaining
.
It is so, and will always be so, as long
as show is preferred to sense; and such things have
probably been much in vogue ever since Thespis
played upon a cart, though it was reserved for the
present age to be exclusively devoted to them. The
good old times is now generally allowed to be a
misnomer, and it is foolish to affect to lament over
them. The world has greatly improved since
then; but certainly in most things connected with
the drama we have retrograded lamentably.
Modern
comedies are poor enough; but from
two-thirds
of modern tragedies, there is no affectation in
saying heaven deliver us!
[5]
[5]
This is meant to apply generally, and not to prize tragedies in
particular
,
much less to any single production.
The literature of these United States has been
made the subject of taunt and ridicule; and it is to
be wondered that such has so long been the case
when the means of remedying the defect were so
easy. It appears that at any time authors can be
VOL. I. 14
forced into existence as easily as mushrooms; and it
is really curious to observe, as soon as a five
hundred
dollar premium is offered, what a flood of
inspiration deluges the whole land! The mere
reading of the advertisements created hundreds of
tragic poets who never before dreamt of such a
thing; and a speculator in quills realized a very
handsome profit by buying up all the stock within
his reach on the first announcement of the
business
.
The ploughman quitted his plough and
wrote a tragedy, the drygood-clerks neglected their
customers and wrote tragedies, the frequenters of
ten-pin alleys, and similar elegant places of resort,
stayed at home o' nights and wrote tragedies; and
it is understood that some of them were the most
unique things of their kind that were ever
submitted
to the eye of man. To say nothing of the
grammar or the chirography, the violations of the
simple rules of Webster's spelling book were
grievous
in the extreme; and towards the latter end of
the fifth act
Murders were done too terrible for the ear.
In some instances the carnage was immense.
Two or three of the much-enduring committee have
scarcely recovered from the shock which their
intellects
received, and yet retain a perfectly excusable
and natural antipathy for the very name of tragedy.
Considering the manner in which they had to addle
their brains by perusing all this perilous stuff, there
ought certainly to have been a benefit for the
remuneration
of the sufferersthat is, the committee.
This was the prevailing character of the pieces,
the authors of whom had taken for their guide
Othello's exclamation, blood, blood, Iago! and
cut short the mortal career of their dramatis
person
with the most unrelenting pens. Others
there were of a more lady-like and lachrymatory
turn, who dealt in
Taffeta phrases, silken terms precise,
Three-piled hyperbole, spruce affectation,
and preferred tears to blood; but they also, in
self-defence
,
were obliged to make away with a great
number, as the depth of a tragedy now-a-days
depends
upon the mortality that takes place among
the persons brought together; consequently there
is twice as strong an infusion of the tragic in a play
where ten people are killed, as there is where only
five expire. Soldiers, citizens, peasants, and such
plebeian parts as are enacted by
supernumeraries
whose names are not in the bills, are,
however
,
not taken into account; just as in real life, a
great outcry is made about a dead general, while
the rank and file rot quietly away without any thing
being said about the matter.
But Mr. Forrest, Mr. Forrest, what excuse can be
made for thee? Thou who didst profess to admire
the Indian character, and venerate their great and
noble qualities. Was it well done in thee to single
out this persecuted race of beings from the
nations
and communities of men on the face of the
earth, as fit subjects to be backed and tortured by
all the poverty-stricken and unfledged poets in the
country? Call you this backing your friends?
Is it not enough that they have been ruthlessly
driven from house and home, that their lands have
been forcibly wrested from them, and the graves of
their fathers violated, but you must, by holding
out a five hundred dollar inducement, hound on all
sorts of people to dramatize the lives of their
warriors
,
and put into the mouths of their sachems and
orators, bad grammar and bombast, which when
living they would have blushed to utter? Think,
Mr. Forrest, of the number of noble chiefs that have
been resuscitated through your means, and
transformed
into senseless ranting braggadocios. They
may not, to be sure, appear in public; but will not
their several vainglorious authors distribute the
manuscripts of their unsuccessful efforts among
their friends and connexions all over the country,
merely to show the incapacity of the committee,
thus rendering the Indian character ridiculous, and
adding, as it were, insult to injury? If you want
more prize tragedies, make the affair general, give
the money to the best, but play all that are sent,
and let us have a laugh at the whole world. Make
no more invidious selections, but let there be
classic
victims, Grecians and Romans, of whom
antiquity
furnishes an inexhaustible supply. Besides,
it would be a very difficult matter to make another
aboriginal tragedy. Indianisms, such as
smoking
the pipe of peace, and keeping the chain of
friendship bright, sound very well when judiciously
and sparingly introduced; but it does not answer
to compound many long speeches entirely of such
figurative fragments.
14*
OYSTERS.
Man
has been styled a speaking animal, a
laughing
animal, a bargaining animal, and a drunken
animal, in contradistinction to all other animals who
neither speak, nor laugh, nor bargain, nor get
drunk; but a cooking animal seems after all to be
his most characteristic and distinguishing
appellation
.
In the important art of cooking victuals he
shines pre-eminent; here he taxes all his
faculties
,
racks his invention, and gives unbounded
range to his imagination. Nature has given to
every other animal a peculiar taste, and furnished
three or four kinds of food to suit that taste, but
this sense in man accommodates itself to an
innumerable
quantity of materials. He has made
copious
selections from all things that dwell upon the
face of the globefrom the birds of the air, from
the fish of the sea, from the inhabitants of lake and
river, yea, from the bowels of the earth has he
extracted
substances to minister to his palate, and the
whole mineral and vegetable world has been
ransacked
with indefatigable industry for its
gratification
.
Thousands of his species pass their lives in
dreary mines to send forth the simple but
indispensable
salt with which he seasons his viands; while
others fit out frail vessels, and amid storm and
tempest
,
traverse the wilderness of waters for certain
spices that add piquancy to a favorite dish! But
after he has collected all the products of the world
together, that is only the commencementthe
preliminary
mustering of his forces. What are all
these materials collectively to the innumerable, the
inconceivable quantity of dishes which he
manufactures
from them by skilful combinations or
incongruous
mixtures? Twelve figures can be set down in
thousands of different ways and no two alike; then
out of those millions of primitive substances, what
countless quintillions of dishes can he not
compound
!
whilst every day new secrets are brought
to light and added to the limitless list of
gastronomic
discoveries.
The ancients knew something as regarded these
matters; but still they seemed to have studied
expense and vanity more than real gratification.
There are few that have not heard of the
extravagances
of an Heliogabalus, his brains of flamingos,
his tongues of nightingales, and his heads of
ostriches, six hundred of which were served up in
a single dish, and for which single dish the deserts
of Arabia must have been scoured and desolated
but there is no ingenuity in this, nothing
remarkable
,
save its monstrous folly. At a later period
the art took a more complex form. In 1577 the
abstemious cardinal, Ascanius Colonna, gave an
entertainment to the prince of Nassau, when the
following unique
olla podrida
was produced, which
was looked upon as one of the greatest
achievements
of the times, and was so admired and lauded
by all who partook of it, that a certain holy father
present at the feast, composed a Latin ode upon it,
and handed the receipt down to an ungrateful
posterity
,
who refuse to avail themselves of this
chef
d'uvre
in the annals of cookery. The
ingredients
were ten pounds of beef, three pounds of a
pig, six wood pigeons, one pound of truffles, six
thrushes, one capon, three pounds of turnips, six
handsfull of green fennel seed, two pounds of
sausages
composed of curious materials, one pound of
pepper, six onions, twelve larks, three lobsters,
seven lampreys, four choice cardoons, (a vegetable
resembling celery) two heads of Bologna cabbage,
three pounds of tallow, spices, salt, sugar, and other
seasonings. How stomachs were constructed in
those days it is not stated.
The United States possess an advantage over all
the nations of the earth in two things highly
conducive
to human happinessoysters and peaches.
Men may disagree about forms of government, or
the fine arts, or the relative merits of poets,
painters
,
and actors; and whether they are right or
wrong, may be perfectly sincere and well-meaning
in their opinions; but whoever denies the complete
supremacy of the oysters and peaches of this part
of the world, must be given over as incurably
infected with prejudice and perverseness. The
peaches of England are nothing, and the oysters,
generally speaking, no more to be compared to
these, than a crab-apple to a pippin; though there
ought to be an especial reservation made in favor of
what is called the Colchester native, the flavor of
which must dwell in the grateful remembrance of
all who have had the good fortune to taste them;
they are uncommonly sweet, but smalla very
choice oyster for ladies; but when taken into a
tolerably capacious mouth, do not touch the palate
at every pointthere is still something wanting,
and you do not experience that unalloyed
gratification
,
that fulness of delight which is the necessary
consequence of swallowing a large, fresh, fat,
Yorkbay
oyster. So extremely grateful are the latter to
all who truly appreciate their estimable qualities,
that every additional one only creates a keener
desire for its successor,
As if increase of appetite had grown
By what it fed on,
until the stomach signifies its incapacity to receive
a farther supply of the luscious and delectable food.
Man is naturally a self-opiniated contrary animal,
and feels a natural inclination to disagree with his
species on all earthly questions; but still he divides
into parties and subdivides into factions, and it is
possible to find half a dozen people who have the
same views in politics, religion, and literature; but
perhaps no two were ever formed since the creation
with exactly the same tenets respecting the stomach.
They may hold on together for some time, and
confess that they both like boiled salmon or roast
ducks; but let them speak upon the subject of
eating
for a quarter of an hour, and a hundred minute
but important differences of taste discover
themselves
.
Indeed, two men alike in this respect would
be a much greater rarity than the two Dromios.
There are few points on which there is a more
unanimous
opinion entertained than oysters. All agree
as to their virtues in the first instance; but
whether
they are best raw, or stewed, or fried, or
broiled
,
or pickled, is the subject of endless cavillings,
and interminable harangues. The longest dispute
I ever listened to was whether it was best to devour
these creatures with black pepper or red; and such
was the earnestness of the disputants that the man
employed in opening them, making a mistake, kept
helping the red pepper advocate with black and the
black pepper zealot with red; and to the infinite
amusement of the lookers on, neither found out the
difference until they were told, when both instantly
declared they thought the oysters had a very
peculiar
taste! just as newspapers or politicians will
now-a-days commence a fiery dispute concerning
democratic and federal parties, or the powers of the
general and state governments, until they
unconsciously
change sides in the course of the argument,
without being anything the wiser; and just so
trivial
and undistinguishable are half the disputes into
which we poor brainless bipeds plunge with such
uncontrollable fury, to the infinite amusement of
all calm and dispassionate spectators. But it will
not do to go on grounding general reflections on an
oyster. It was made for better things than to be a
theme from which to extract a questionable moral.
I would if I could be eloquent in thy praise, thou best
and gravest
[6]
[6]
Wherein consists the superior gravity of an oyster is not very
apparent
;
yet it has long had that reputation as is evident from the ancient
and well known couplet:
of fishthou most nutritious and di
gestible of moluscous substancesthou stanchest
friend and steadiest supporter of Afric's trampled
sons, for whom thou daily effectest more than
Wilberforce
can ever hope to compassmuch do I
regret
that the insatiable appetites of the citizens are
robbing their bay of its greatest boast; like the boy
who killed the goose for the golden eggs, they are
not content with the yearly produce of thy fruitful
beds, but they leave them oysterless, seize on both
interest and principal, and expect a miracle to
provide
for the future. It is easy to foresee the
ruinous
consequences of such atrocious conductbut it
is not in common prose that thy merits and
sufferings
should be commemorated. I will take my harp
and sweep its softest strings.
LINES ON A NEWLY-OPENED YORK-BANKER.
With feelings strange and undefined I gaze upon thy face,
Thou choice and juicy specimen of an ill-fated race;
How calmly, yea, how meekly thou reclinest in thy shell,
Yet what thy woes and sufferings are man may conjecture well!
For thou hast life as well as he who recklessly seeks thine,
And, couldst thou speak, might draw forth tears as briny as thy brine;
For thou was torn from friends and home and all thy heart could wish,
Thou hapless, helpless, innocent, mute, persecuted fish.
Perhaps thou wast but newly joined to some soft plump young bride,
Who op'd her mouth for food with thee when flowed the flowing tide;
[7]
[7]
Oysters taken from the river and kept in fresh water, open their
mouths at the time of the flowing in of the tide, in expectation of
their accustomed food.
Kitchiner
.
Perhaps thou hast a family, from whom thou hast been torn,
Who sadly wail for him, alas, who never will return!
Thou wast happy on thy native bed, where blithesome billows play,
Till the cruel fisher wrench'd thee from thy `home, sweet home,' away;
He stow'd thee in his coble and he rowed thee to the strand
Thou wast bought and sold and opened, and placed in this right hand!
I know that while I moralize thy flavor fades away,
I know thou shouldst be ate alive,
[8]
[8]
Those who wish to enjoy this delicious restorative in the utmost
perfection must eat it the moment it is opened, with its own gravy in
the under shell; if not eaten while absolutely alive, its flavor and spirit
are lost.
Kitchiner
.
before thy sweets decay!
I know that it is foolishness, this weak delay of mine,
And epicures may laugh at it as sentimental whine.
Well, let them laugh. I still will drop a tear o'er thy sad fate,
Thou wretched and ill-fated one! thou sad and desolate!
O'er thee and o'er thy kindred hangs one all-consuming doom,
To die a slow and lingering death, or, living, find a tomb!
Like the Indian from the forestlike the roebuck from the glen,
Thy race is dwindling silently before the arts of men;
Ye are passing from the river, from the sea-bank, and the shore,
And the haunts that long have known ye, shall know ye soon no more!
The Blue-point and the Shrewsbury
Two famous species, found adjacent to New-York, now nearly
extinct.
are vanishing away,
And clamless soon will be our streams, and oysterless our bay;
Rapacious man, before your prime, ordains that ye shall die,
And drags ye from your cool retreats to boil and stew and fry!
Why were ye made so racy, rich, and luscious to the taste?
'Tis that has stripped your thickest banks, and made your beds a waste;
Your virtues have proved sanctified and holy traitors to ye,
And that which was your proudest boast has served but to undo ye!
E'en I, the friend of all thy kind, when I think of what thou art,
When I ponder o'er the melting joys thy swallowing will impart,
Can delay thy fate no longer; one look, it is my last!
A gulpone morea silent pausea sighand all is past!
The gravest beast is an ass, the gravest bird an owl,
The gravest fish an oyster, the gravest man a fool.
VOL. I. 15
PASSAGES
IN THE LIFE OF AN UNFORTUNATE.
Ah me! for aught that ever I could read,
Could ever hear by tale or history,
The course of true love never did run smooth.
Thomas Augustus Phelps
was a junior clerk in
a small retail store, in an unfrequented part of
Maiden-lane. His salary was insignificant, and his
expenses were considerable; and, there being no
visible
channel through which extraneous funds could
come into his possession, how he contrived, as the
saying is, to make both ends meet, was a
problem
which his most intimate friends were utterly
unable to solve, and which was, moreover, a
subject
upon which, for some reason or other, he
always
declined to throw any light. He was
generally
characterized as a genteel and rather
well-informed
young manthat is, his dress was
unexceptionable
;
his address easy, forward, and flippant;
and he discoursed with uncommon fluency on a
number of subjects which he knew nothing about.
After he had gone through the business of the day,
he improved his mind, of an evening, by playing
billiards, and his morals by lounging about the
saloons
and lobbies of the theatre, from which places
he criticized the performances in a very decided
manner. This he was the better enabled to do,
from being hand and glove with many of the minor
actors, by whom he was let into the secret that the
principal favorites of the town were persons
destitute
of ability, but that the capabilities of the
minors were uncommon, though lost to the public
by a monstrous system of managerial
mismanagement
,
which bore heavily upon the whole mass,
and with intense severity upon the peculiar talents
of the several informants. But his greatest
qualification
was his inexhaustible fund of what is termed
small talk! This he poured forth on all
occasions
,
in one weak, washy, everlasting flood, in
a way that gained him the ardent admiration of
numerous young ladies, and at last made an
indelible
impression upon the susceptible heart of Miss
Julia Carmine, only surviving child of an
artificial-flower
manufacturer in Division-street. Julia
was a beauteous being, in the spring of life. Her
features were strictly and chastely classical,
excepting
her nose, mouth, chin, and forehead; her eyes
were exceedingly blue, her color rich and roseate,
and her auburn tresses flowed in luxuriant ringlets
down her lovely neck, which was somewhat short.
Nature had done every thing for her, setting aside
that she wore artificial curls, and had purchased the
majority of her teeth; and though her complexion
of a morning was rather sallow, yet when dressed
out, and seen by candle or gas-light, she was in
reality a very pretty looking young woman. She
had faults, to be surewho has not? But the
greatest of them were, that she talked occasionally
a sort of mongrel French, played on the guitar, and
kept an album.
What a sacred thing is first love! and its
accompanying
train of inexplicable and indescribable
feelings! and how hallowed in the imagination
becomes
every spot connected with this purest of
passions
;
particularly the spot where a mutual
reciprocation
of sentiment first took place! It is that of
which I am about to speak. Julia and Thomas
Augustus sat alone one evening in a small arbor,
or rather wooden box, in a retired corner of the
Bowery tea-garden;
The moon hid her light
From the heavens that night,
and a variegated lamp, attached to the front of the
box, was all that shed a melancholy radiance over
the scene. Both experienced sensations unknown
till then, and they had each a glass of ice-cream
before them.
How beautiful is the firmament, with all its
countless myriads of twinkling stars, observed
Thomas Augustus Phelps, looking upwards.
Beautiful indeed! sighed Julia.
And this ice-cream aint so coarse neither,
said he.
Noby no means, responded she.
Methinks, continued Thomas, I could sit for
ever thus, with thee by my side, gazing upon the
blue vault of heaven, beloved Julia!
Julia did not answer, but her silence spoke more
eloquently than words; she bowed her head, and
it is presumed blushed, but, as the lamp wanted
trimming, there was not light enough distinctly to
ascertain that fact. Thomas Augustus gently
drew the sweet girl towards him, and oh!
extremity
of bliss! she did not resist. The coldness
of worldly restraint was broken downthey
exchanged
vows of everlasting fidelity, and Thomas
was about to seal the covenant on her lovely lips,
when the man that goes about to gather up the
empty glasses, unceremoniously popped his head
into the box, and observed, that he did not allow
of them there sort of proceedings in his garden!
15*
Thomas Augustus would have resented this
injurious
insinuation on the instant, only he was by no
means athletic, and did not possess a particle of
courage
.
He therefore contented himself with
declaiming
for some time in a style of lofty invective, and
wound up by indignantly paying the man what he
owed him, tucking Julia under his arm, and
walking
out of the shrubbery.
It is necessary, however, to premise that twelve
months antecedent to the tender passages on which
we have been dilating, Mr. Phelps commenced
business
on his own account in Canal-street. His
debut was made during that auspicious period
denominated
the Canal-street fever, when, in
consequence
of the lowness of the rents in that part of
the city, every body flocked thither, which caused
the landlords to quadruple their original demands,
by which judicious proceeding they ruined their
tenants and got no rent at all. He had invariably
represented his affairs to Julia as being in a most
prosperous state; but unfortunately, though he was
a young man possessed of many virtues, a love of
truth was not one of them. Indeed, they who knew
him best, affirmed that he was a notorious liar, and
there is no reason to doubt their word. As he had
started altogether on credit, and as he spent all the
money that came in as the goods went out, when
his bills fell due, he told his creditors he was
extremely sorry, but that he had no funds to meet
their demands: they in return assured him that
they were extremely sorry to hear it, seized upon
the residue of his stock, and turned him out of
doors. This was hard to bear, and he flew on the
wings of love to find consolation in the society of
his beloved Julia; but she was not at home. The
next day he called, and still the same answer. On
the evening of the third day he was admitted to
her presence, but Oh frailtythy name is
woman
!
she had heard of his misfortunes, and
received
him with chilling politeness. The lady was
not at all mercenary; but then she had found it
convenient, as she informed him, to plight her
virgin
vows to Mr. Raphael Jackson, (familiarly
termed Ralph Jackson) and they were to be
married
early in the ensuing week. Thomas stood
mute and motionless, for, as the poet justly
observes
,
Oh! colder than the wind that freezes
Founts, that but now in sunshine played,
Is the congealing pang which seizes
The trusting bosom when betrayed.
What barbed the dart and made the matter worse,
was that this Mr. Raphael Jacksona young
lawyor
with a good deal of cunning, and more
impudence
,
consequently likely to do well in the world
was his most particular friend. Julia aroused
him from his trance by asking him if he would
not stay to tea? this offer he indignantly
spurned
,
and immediately quitted the premises. The
next morning he found on his table an invitation
to the wedding. It was, of course, never suspected
that he would accept it, and was purely meant as
a piece of gratuitous insolence on the part of the
bride. Whoever calculated, however, on his not
coming, reckoned without their host. Yes!
exclaimed
he mentally, as he surveyed the perfumed
rose-colored note; yes; I will see her once more
for the lastay, for the last time!
About seven o'clock in the evening of the
twenty-second
of April, 1827, a jovial wedding party were
assembled at the house of Mr. Carmine, in
Division-street
,
to celebrate the nuptials of his accomplished
daughter. All was prepared for the impressive
ceremony
.
The bride had got through shedding the
preliminary tears usual on these occasions; the
bridegroom was doing his best, as in duty bound,
to look joyous and happy; the bridesmaids were
tittering and laughing for some reason or reasons
best known to themselves; the groomsmen were
endeavoring to be uncommonly facetious, and the
clergyman had put on a look meant to rebuke all
tittering and facetiousness, when the door suddenly
opened, and a figure stalked into the room. It was
Mr. Thomas Augustus Phelps, but alas, how
changed! He looked not like one who had come
to participate in a scene of happiness. His boots
were dirty, his hat was slouched over his eyes, his
coat was buttoned up to his chin, his cravat was
far from clean, and his hands were stuck into his
trowsers' pockets. The company recoiled, the bride
uttered a faint exclamation, and the bridegroom
stepped forward and demanded in a bullying tone
of voice, the meaning of this extraordinary
intrusion
?
Phelps spoke not a word, but drew from
his right-hand coat pocket the perfumed rose-colored
invitation note, and presented it to the bridegroom.
He then drew from his left-hand coat pocket an
uncommonly large horse-pistol, upon which Mr.
Raphael Jackson retreated with great precipitation.
Phelps deliberately cocked the pistol, and an
uncommon
curiosity took possession of the guests to
see which one of them he intended to sacrifice.
This interesting suspense was soon ended; for
slowly bringing the fatal weapon in a line with his
own forehead, he proceeded to pull the
irrevocable
trigger. A struggle ensued, and dreadful to
relate, in the scuffle the pistol went off full in the
face of one of the fair young bridesmaids.
Fortunately
she sustained no injury, which led to a
suspicion
that the instrument of death had been
loaded with an eye to safety. Upon this the
gallant
bridegroom experienced a revivification of valor.
He stepped forward, informed the unfortunate
Phelps that he should hear from him in the
morning
through the medium of Mr. Hays, and
peremptorily
ordered him to leave the room. The poor
bride, who during this scene had been rather in the
back ground, thought she now perceived a
favorable
opportunity for display, and accordingly, as the
most natural expedient, commenced a fainting fit;
but there being no one sufficiently on the alert to
catch her in his arms, and having, in the hurry
of the moment, neglected the precaution of seeing
that there was a chair in her immediate vicinity,
she was obliged, when just upon the brink of
insensibility
,
not only to recede considerably, but also to
look around her and diverge from a straight line in
order to attain that necessary piece of furniture.
This gave such an air of insincerity to the whole
proceeding, that even her warmest admirers were
compelled to admit that the attempt was a failure.
Mr. Jackson once more asked Mr. Phelps whether
he intended to quit the room, or whether he was
waiting for him (Jackson) to put him out. Phelps
scorned to reply; a peculiar expression flitted over
his pale features, he cast an indescribable look
towards
the bride, and then did as he was desired.
On the following day, about noon, a gallant
Liverpool
packet was passing Sandy Hook, outward
bound. On her deck stood the principal actor in
the intended tragedy of the preceding evening.
His disappointment in love, and some fraudulent
transactions connected with his late failure, had
induced him to seek relief in change of scene.
The breeze was fair, and the vessel was careering
o'er the glad waters of the dark blue sea at the
rate of about nine knots an hour. Phelps stood at
the stern of the ship gazing intently on the land of
his forefathers, which was fast fading in the
distance
.
A slight blue line at the verge of the
horizon
was all that remained to him of the home of
his childhoodthe scene of so many balls, and
publics, and partieswhere he had danced, and
sung, and played billiards, and eaten oysters when
a mere boy; the tears started to his eyes, he leaned
his head over the ship's side, and in a voice choked
with agony, exclaimed
Oh, captain, I am very sick!
The captain, in that cheerful tone of voice with
which a man who has nothing the matter with
him consoles another who has, replied, Never
mind, siryou'll be better in a day or twohaul
taut the fore-top-sail halliards there! belay!
This to Phelps, whose face exhibited as many
shades of blue, and black, and green, and yellow,
as the back of a dying dolphin, was a great
consolation
.
Indeed I have myself often had occasion to
observe the happy effects of similar scraps of
comfort
applied to sea-sick passengers. It is so
pleasant
when you are suffering under this horrible
afflictionwhen every minute seems an age, and
every hour an eternityto be told, never mind,
sir, you'll get over it in less than a week, maybe!
Time rolled on, and nothing reached the
American
shores concerning the fate of Thomas
Augustus
Phelps, except a flying report that he had been
undergoing a course of exercises in the Brixton
tread-mill, when one Sunday morning, in the
autumn
of the year 1829, a shabby-genteel personage
was seen strutting up Broadway. It was Phelps
yet why was he here? His first love blessed
another
;
and the children that ought to have been
called Phelps, were christened Jackson. The
wooden paling of Trinity church-yard was at that
period prostrate, and the cast-iron railing had not
been erected, so that there was no obstacle to a free
ingress to and egress from the burying-ground.
Phelps wandered in among the tombsa
presentiment
of some overhanging evil weighed heavily
upon his breast, and before he had proceeded far
he came to a plain marble slab almost overgrown
with grass. A strange curiosity seized him; he
knelt down and parted the rank weeds which
over-shadowed
it; a sunbeam at that moment darted
precisely on the place, and he saw, carved in
legible
German-text, the simple inscription Julia.
He was indescribably affected; and yet he felt a
melancholy pleasure in thinking that she had too
late become sensible of his merits, and pined into
the grave in consequence of his absence. While
indulging in this train of reflection, a troop of little
boys, attracted by the extraordinary spectacle of a
man upon his kness in a church-yard, began to
gather round, shouting and pelting him with earth
and small pebbles. He arose to reprimand them;
but there having been a heavy shower of rain,
and he having white duck trowsers on, the effect
of his kneeling, upon his clothes, can, like a
young heroine's feelings, be more easily imagined
than described. He instantly, therefore, became
an object of universal observation, and the little
boys shouted and pelted more than ever. Phelps
was exasperated beyond measure; he seized one
of the young miscreants, shook him well, and
threatened the most dreadful corporeal chastisement
if he did not desist.
VOL. I. 16
Hurrah for Jackson!
[9]
[9]
A common political cry about this time with young
republicans
.
exclaimed the young
rebel, nothing daunted.
Hurrah for Jackson! chimed in his
companions
in evil-doing. This pointed, though
unintentional
allusion to his rival, at once unnerved
Phelpsrecollections of former insults and injuries
came over him, and he strode from the
burial-ground
,
the boys hurraing all the while at his
coattail
;
when lo! who should be seen issuing from
the church porch but Mr. Raphael Jackson himself
with his own Julia, now Mrs. Jackson, hanging on
his arm! This was too muchso then it appeared
she had not pined away in his absenceshe had
not diedand he had been kneeling by the side
of some one else's Julia! They passed him
without
speaking, he muttered dreadful imprecations to
himself, and bent his way down Wall-street.
He is now only the wreck of his former self,
though he is more corpulent than he was wont to
be, yet it is not a healthy corpulency; and his
apparel
is the extreme of what is generally
denominated
seedy. Yet amid this moral and physical
desolation some traces of identity are yet preserved
some glimmerings of what once was Phelps!
There is still that peculiar strut in his walk, and
he still wears his hat knowingly adjusted on one
side of his head; but he drinks like a fish, talks
politics incessantly, and his shirt-frill is much
bedaubed
with snuff. What will be his final fate
depends upon ulterior circumstances; at present it
is enveloped in the mists and darkness of futurity.
SPRING.
Lo, the winter is past, the rain is over and gone. The flowers appear
on the earth; the time of the singing of birds is come, and the voice of
the turtle is heard in our land.
Song of Solomon, chap. II
.
Every
year, all the periodicals, in every city, in
every country of the earth, have something to say
upon the subject of spring, and have had something
to say since time was, or at least, since periodicals
were born, and will continue to have something to
say until time shall cease to be. It is, in all
respects
,
a most prolific theme, and there is no more
chance of exhausting it, than of exhausting our
kind mother earth of grass, leaves, and flowers,
and the never-dying vegetative principle. The
reason is obvious enough: last year's grass, and
leaves, and flowers are dead and past awaytheir
freshness and fragrance are forgotten, and their
beauty is remembered no more; so it is with the
essays, reflections, songs, and sonnets that sprang
into life in the spring of eighteen hundred and
twenty-ninethey also have passed away, and
their sweet thoughts and pretty sayings are
likewise
remembered no more; but as last year's
vegetation
fell to the earth and became incorporated
with it only to be reproduced again in forms of
fresh brilliancy and beauty, so do the thoughts and
images of former writers assume a new shape, and
bear the impress of the present time by appearing
in all magazines and newspapers, daily, weekly,
and monthly, for the year eighteen hundred and
thirty. And there is no plagiarism in all this; it
is merely, as Puff says, two people happening to
think of the same idea, only one hit upon it before
the otherthat's all. Indeed, who would think
of plagiarism on such an exhaustless subject as
spring? Why a thousand thoughts and images
that have lain dormant in the mind start into life
at the mere mention of the word. As the fresh
April breeze, laden with healthful fragrance, blows
upon you, it becomes a sort of natural impulse to
vent your feelings either by pen or speech. You
look back upon the snow, and fog, and sharp
unfeeling
winds of winter as upon a desolate waste
over which you have trodden, and fancy, as you
see nature putting on her youthful gay attire, that
you are entering into another and better state of
existence; forgetful that though her spring may be
16*
eternal, your own is flitting fast away, never to be
renewed. But no reflections! let them come with
winter, their fitting season. Spring was made for
enjoyment, or rather, anticipation of enjoyment
promises of goodpleasant visions, and gorgeous
castles in the air. Experience convinces not the
young. They think not of their last year's visions
that have faded away, nor the aerial castles that
have tumbled about their ears; or if they do, it is
only to contrast their frailty with the firm texture
and sure foundation of those in the perspective. But
though spring be delightful to all classes, it is so to
each in a different way, and for a different reason.
In the country, your true agriculturist, though he
wander amid a wilderness of sweets, marks not the
tiny buds that are expanding and blooming into
beauty all aroundto be sure, he hopes that no
killing frost will come and spoil his prospects of
cider, but that is all. These are too small concerns
for his capacious head. He ponders on acres of
corn and fields of buck-wheat, and plans where
barley should be sown and where oats. He looks
into futurity and calculates how much the yet
unengendered
grain will bring; he schemes how his
barren land may be artificially fertilized in the best
and cheapest manner, and it is his business, not his
pleasure, to take note of the wonderful operations
of nature. His wife considereth the dairy, and
looketh out with motherly care that her sleek and
velvet-coated cows be not turned from their winter
quarters into damp and swampy meadows, lest
they contract colds, coughs, catarrhs, and other
disorders
incident to cattle; while the rosy-cheeked
daughter attends to the poultry, (always the
daughter's
perquisite) and literally reckons her chickens
before they are hatched. Anxiously does she
watch that the young turkeys (the most tender of
domestic fowls) do not get wet feet; for on the
proceeds
arising from their sale depend the splendor of
the gown and the quantity and quality of the
ribbon
that have in summer to adorn the village
church, and excite the wonder and admiration of
its simple congregation. So passes spring with
them and others of their class. They talk and
think less of its beauties than those who merely get
glimpses of them in crowded cities, and have to
draw upon their imagination for the rest.
In the city spring brings with it a still more
multifarious
collection of hopeful schemes and projects.
Business that has been in a state of stagnation
during
the winter now flows briskly through a
thousand
different channels; and the ladies, whose
business
is pleasure, are busier than any one else, for
the spring fashions have come; milliners are now
the most obsequious of people; tailors examine with
a curious eye the coats of their customers as they
meet them in the streets, and inquire most kindly
and disinterestedly after their health and prospects;
merchants are scattering their ventures abroad, ships
are fitting out, much beef is salted down, and many
biscuits baked, but a number of hard things said
about the tariff notwithstanding; the North river
is emancipated from ice, and owners of steamboats
are preparing to oblige the public and ruin
themselves
by vigorous competition; the rustling of silks
is heard in Broadway, criticisms upon hats, gowns,
and trimmings are much in vogue amongst the
fair creatures who pace its fashionable side, and
they look upon spring as the most charming
season
of the year, it is so delightful for morning
calls.
Spring is coming! all good things are coming!
and some good things are goingoysters are going
there will soon be no R in the month, and then
they are gone; but shad are coming; strawberries
and pretty country girls are coming, so is fresh
butter; the men of Rochester and Buffalo, and
other districts of the far west have come, and
they wander up and down the streets in wrapt
amazement at the never ceasing jingling of
forte-pianos
,
and the twanging of guitars, harps, and
other stringed instruments; the sons of the South
have come, and Virginians, Carolinians, and
Georgians
are to be seen sauntering along, and gazing
with horror at the shocking quantity of freedom
enjoyed by the poor black wretches whom they
chance to meet, and though they see it every
summer
,
they are never able to get over the
astonishment
created by beholding a dark dandy or an
African coquetteas if white people possessed the
exclusive right to make fools of themselves. Ah!
think they, as a colored gentleman unceremoniously
takes the wall of themAh! if I only had you
in Savannah!
But spring has still its sad feelings, and after
levity
comes heaviness of heart. It is a joyous
season
to those who, like the year, are in their
springtime
,
just bursting into untried life; but to such as
have seen that time pass away for ever, whose
spirits
are depressed by difficulties, or broken by
unavailing
struggles, it is a season rather of melancholy
retrospection than present enjoyment. The aged
or unfortunate are insensible to its influence; they
recall
their
spring, and mournfully contrast the
happy past with the dreary present; truly is it
said,
Joy's recollection is no longer joy
While sorrow's memory is sorrow still;
and deeply do they feel its truth. To those in their
prime it is, at times, perhaps sadder still to look
back upon the flowery fields of existence through
which they have been rambling, and to contrast
them with the beaten track they now tread, and
the desolate prospect that lies before them. The
friends of their youth have passed away, so have
their brightest hopes; they feel themselves changed,
and their capacities for happiness diminished; they
see things full of joy and promise around, and are
filled with a mixture of wordly scorn and
unavailing
regret for what can no more be theirs; and
sadly do they enter into the feelings of the poet
The sky is blue, the sward is green,
The leaf upon the bough is seen,
The wind comes from the balmy west,
The little songster builds its nest,
The bee hums on from flower to flower,
Till twilight's dim and pensive hour,
The joyous year returnsbut when
Shall by-past times come back again?
PHILADELPHIANEW-YORKBOSTON.
Satirists
have said that all the concerns, great
and small, of this bustling world, its love and war,
laws, literature, and business, have self for their
beginning and self for their end; and that even
charity to others is only a more refined species
of self-love. Whether these suppositions be correct
or not, will, like the destiny of the lost pleiad, and
the powers of the general government, always
remain
matters of opinion; and far be it from me to
attempt to settle, and thereby render of no effect,
such interesting topics of conversation and
speculation
.
In putting pen to paper, it is certainly best to
avoid all new and hazardous assertions, and to
content one's self with advancing, in a fearless
manner, what no one can possibly doubt. I may,
therefore, in the language of some writers, who
display
a large quantity of superfluous valor and
determination
when there is no occasion for it, boldly
assert, without fear of contradiction, that self-love is
no rarity in this world of ours. It manifests itself
in a variety of ways, some of which are
exceedingly
curious and amusing, and as pleasant to
laugh at as a friend's misfortunes. One of its most
ludicrous forms is the way in which men interest
themselves in little localities, the pride they feel in
them, and the additional importance which they
imagine attaches to themselves, in consequence of
the celebrity of the city or district to which they
belong, for some small matter or other. Thus, a
Philadelphian identifies himself with the breed of
horned cattle in the vicinity of that cityhe
considers
their fame and his own as inseparable, and
looks down upon a citizen of New-York because
the cows of Pennsylvania give richer milk than
those of Long Island; a Bostonian thinks he ranks
considerably higher in the scale of creation on
account
of the occult mystery of making pumpkin
pies having attained a state of perfection in Boston
as yet unknown in the regions of the south, north,
and west; while a New-Yorker is apt to be
dogmatical
on all things connected with canals, though
perhaps he never saw one in his life, merely
because
the longest one in the world was
accomplished
in his native state.
They say there is but one step from the
sublime
to the ridiculous. Now the feelings of pride
and love with which a man looks upon his native
country, are very proper and natural; and though,
in the eye of cold-blooded philosophy, a person is
neither any thing the better nor the worse for the
spot of earth which he may chance to have been
born upon, yet men generally never have been, nor
ever will be of that opinion. The laws and
institutions
of a country, the fame of its literature and
science, and the long train of glorious deeds that
have been accumulating for ages, descend to a man
as a species of national property, and there is no
one but who values himself so much the more for
his share in it, and looks upon himself as braver
and wiser on account of the brave and wise men
his native land has bred. There is something
noble
in this feeling in the aggregate; but when it
comes to be frittered away upon small mattersto
be divided and subdivided into counties, towns, and
villages, it is simply ridiculous. Some persons
carry their local feelings to an extraordinary
extent
:
not only is their own country the greatest in
the world, but their city, for some reason or other,
is the best in the country; the street in which they
reside the best in the city, the house they occupy
the best in the street, their room the best in the
house, and themselves, by all odds, the best in the
VOL. I. 17
room. Nay, some do not even stop here. There
are people who form little local attachments about
their own persons, and fall in love with an eye, a
nose, a cheek, a chin, or a finger-nail. One of the first
vocalists on the British stage, is known absolutely to
doat on the construction of his leg; he thinks, that
since legs were made, nature never constructed such
a pair as he is the possessor of, and he accordingly
takes every opportunity of obtruding them upon
the observation of the audience. The earnestness
with which he details their circumference, in various
parts, to his friends and acquaintance, and the
complacency
with which he regards them when only
covered with thin black silk stockings, would be a
fine subject for any clergyman who wished to
preach a sermon on the vanities of this world.
Unfortunately the costume of English opera but
seldom affords an opportunity for the display of the
pedestals on which the musical hero's body is
erected
,
and those of Mr.were too often doomed
to be secluded in long wide trowsers, from the
admiration
of the public. But the fates were not
always averse, and times would occur when thin
black silk stockings were not at variance with the
stage regulations. Alexander the Great was a
proud and happy man when he crossed the
Granicus
;
Henry the Fifth when the battle of Agincourt
brought the French nobles, who had been playing
at dice for him, captives at his feet; Apelles when
his rival mistook his curtain picture for reality, and
Brigadier Generalthe tailor, when surrounded
by the best dressed staff in the militia, arrayed in
coats of superfine cloth of his own making; but
none of them were so proud and happy as this
vocalist
when he at last obtained an opportunity of
submitting his unexceptionable pair of legs to the
public view. He would rush upon the stage and
pour forth his excited feelings in song, and there
were few who could entrance an audience with the
melody of sound like himthey would hang with
breathless attention upon every accent, and he
never
failed to make his exit amid the most deafening
applause. This he was far from attributing
altogether
to his vocal powers. Ah! he would say, as
he reached the side wing, at the same time slapping
the objects of his admiration with affectionate
familiarity
Ah!
it is some time since they have
seen such a leg as that!
This is a long episode, but as it is a fact, and at
the same time shows the length to which men will
carry their local partialities, it may perhaps be
excused
.
I was greatly amused last week on board a
steam-boat, by listening attentively to a
disputatious
conversation between a Bostonian, a
New-Yorker
,
and a Philadelphian, setting forth the
several
excellencies of their several cities. The
Bostonian
was the most learned and pedantic, the
New-York
man the most loquacious and grandiloquent,
and the Philadelphian the most sensitive and
uncompromising
.
The first discoursed in a lofty strain
of the classic charms of antiquity, and the advanced
state of literature and the fine arts in the regions
round about Cape Cod. The unequalled state of
our literary and scientific institutions, said he, and
the extreme beauty of many of our public buildings
must be admitted
Public buildings, interrupted the Philadelphian,
cutting short the thread of the man of Boston's
discourse
,
if you want to see a public building, look
at our market, look at our bank, look at our
And if you talk of architectural beauty, said
the New-Yorker, look at our City-hall and St.
Paul's church, and the Park theatre; and as for
the fine arts, continued he with solemnity, I
regard
them as introducing luxury and corruption
as fitted only for the tainted atmosphere of Europe
as inconsistent with the genius of our political
institutions, and, I thank heaven, the charge of
encouraging
them cannot be laid to New-York. No!
quoth he, gathering strength as he went along, like
a stone rolling down a hill,give me the useful
arts. When I contemplate the immense sums
our
custom-house yearly pays into the national treasury
when I behold our docks crowded with shipping
when I survey our spacious bay, studded with
islands, and our waters covered with
Your waters! interrupted the Philadelphian,
unable any longer to withstand this torrent of
eulogium
,
your waters! why there isn't a drop of
water fit to drink in your whole town. If you
want water, go to Philadelphia; or if you want
milk, or peaches, or shad, or straight streets, or fresh
butter, or fresh air, or
Fresh air! interrupted York, in a supercilious
tone, and with an ironical though somewhat
agitated
expression of countenance, why, you have
no air worth speaking of in Philadelphia; look at
our
fresh air
our
fresh sea breezes daily wafted
from the vast Atlantic through our streets.
Through
your streets! reiterated the
descendant
of William Penn in a fury;
through
your
streets! Let me tell you, sir, your sea-breezes
may
be good enough, but your streets are so cursedly
crooked that the breezes cannot find their way
through
themlet me tell you that, sir.
The blood of the man of York was up; but he
endeavored to keep down his rising wrath, and
then in a voice of affected calmness, though
trembling
17*
with rage, began to undervalue and sneer at
straight streets, and boldly affirmed that crooked
ones were infinitely better for a variety of reasons
that he did not think proper to mention, and that
any man of taste would decide that Pearl-street was
a finer street than any in Philadelphia.
This was perfectly unbearable, and the
Philadelphian
,
after swearing in a very wicked manner,
went on to more than insinuate that his opponent
was a fool, an ass, an idiot, and no gentleman; and
they might have proceeded to settle whether straight
or crooked streets were best by knocking each other's
brains out, if the company had not interfered.
Happily
at this crisis the dinner-bell rang, and to those
who have traveled much in steam-boats, I need say
no more to account for the instant cessation of all
symptoms of hostility. Never did the clock
striking
twelve in a romantic melo-drama produce so
dramatic an effect, as the ringing of the dinner-bell
on board of a steam-boat. All previous topics of
conversation, argumentation, or disputation, are
instantly swept away, and a universal rush is made
towards the savory cabin. You may know an old
traveler by observing him take his station near the
hatchway as the time approaches. As soon as the
welcome sound strikes his ear, he gives a look of
triumph round the deck for a single instant at the
inconsiderate persons who, in remote parts of it,
have been gratifying their passion for the
picturesque
,
and immediately dives below. Then may
be seen the hurry and trepidation of the novice, the
struggle on the part of the gentlemen between the
attention and politeness due to the ladies, and their
own love of victualsthe painful efforts of the
ladies
to preserve an air of unconcern and composure,
and their anxiety touching the delicate first-cuts
from the bosoms of capons and turkeysthen may
be seen the utter looks of consternation of those
unfortunate
people who happen to be at the bows of
the boat, and the glare of horrid malignity with
which all the company above regard any corpulent
old gentleman who takes his time in descending
the ladder. The most impudent thing I ever
witnessed
in the whole course of my existence, was
during a scene of this kind, on board a steam-boat
last summer. An astonishingly fat old man was, by
reason of his previous advantageous locality, almost
the first who reached the entrance to the cabin when
the dinner-bell rang. He swung his unwieldly
mass of brawn slowly and heavily into the
doorway
,
completely obstructing the passage, and
proceeded
to descend at a snail's pace, amid the
smothered
execrations of the company. After a
considerable
interval of time, he succeeded in reaching
the middle of the ladder, when, what will it be
supposed
the fat old man did? He actually came to
a full stop, took his hat from his head, drew from
thence a pocket-handkerchief, proceeded
deliberately
to wipe his forehead, then one cheek, then the
other, and concluded by drawing it leisurely across
his chin, after which he deposited it in his hat
again, placed his hat on his head, and continued on
his way as if he had done nothing amiss. It speaks
volumes for the morals of the people and the state
of society, when I affirm, though it may seem
incredible
,
that he escaped without the slightest
violence
!
As the lady says in the tragedy, curses
kill not; and it was lucky for the fat old gentleman
that this was the case, otherwise he would have
been a lifeless corpse before dinner that day.
I have rather wandered from the subject of
localities
,
and it is now too late to recur to it again. I
may, however, state, that the Bostonian,
Philadelphian
,
and New-Yorker spoke no more during the
passage, and doubtless parted with a hearty
contempt
for each other; thus adding one more to the
many instances of the utility of warm disputes
about nothing at all.
OLD SONGS.
Mark it, Cesario, it is old and plain;
The spinsters and the knitters in the sun,
And the free maids that weave their thread with bones
Do use to chaunt it.
Shaks
.
I LIKE an old song. It is the freshest piece of
antiquity
in existence; and is, moreover, liable to no
selfish individual appropriation. It was born far
back in the traditionary times, so that its parentage
is somewhat equivocal; yet its reputation suffers
not on that account, and it comes down to us
associated
with all kinds of fond and endearing
reminiscences
.
It melted or gladdened the hearts of our
forefathers, and has since floated around the green
earth, finding a welcome in every place humanized
by a ray of fancy or feeling, from throne to
cottage
hearth. It has trembled on the lips of past
and forgotten beauty; and has served, in countless
wooings, as the appropriate medium for the first
fearful breathings of affection. The youthful
maiden
has broken the silence with it in many a lovely,
lonely dell; and the shepherd has chaunted it on
the still hill side. The rude sailor has filled up the
pauses of his watch by whistling it to the shrill
winds and sullen waters; and it has bowed the
head, brought the tear to the eye, and recalled
home, and home thoughts to the mind of many a
wanderer on a distant shore. It has been heard in
the solitudes of nature, and at the crowded, festive
board. It has refreshed the worn-out heart of the
worldling, and awakened thoughts that do often
lie too deep for tears, in the minds of the moody
and contemplative. It has been a source of
consolation
and joy to those who have passed away; it
comes unexhausted to us; and it will glide gently
down the stream of time, cheering and soothing as
it goes, from generation unto generation, till
utilitarianism
becomes universal, and music and poetry
fade into a dimly remembered dream. Yet a
truebred
,
moth-eaten antiquary would sacrifice it, if he
could, for a copper coin fifty years its senior!
If any musical man expect, from the title to
this, a learned article, he will be egregiously
disappointed
.
I have no pretensions to treat this subject
scientifically, being, indeed, admirably qualified, in
this age of confessions, as far as want of knowledge
goes, to write the confessions of an unmusical
man. As regards flats and sharps, I am truly
little
better than a natural; and as for quavers,
semi-quavers
,
demi-semi-quavers, and other subtler
divisions
,
if there be any, I am as ignorant of them as
the ass that crops his thistle off the common, and
brays in whatsoever note nature prompts him.
But what of that! Music is not altogether a
mechanical
science; and there are profounder
sympathies
in the heart of man than the orchestra think
of. There is no more nauseous animal in
existence
than your musical coxcomb, who has all the
terms and technicalities of the art at his tongue's
end, without the glimmering of an idea concerning
the human passions, the deep feelings, and the keen
and delicate perception of the beautiful, on which
that art is founded. Proportionably to be admired
is the man who, after spending years in study and
research, and successfuly fathoming and mastering
all difficulties, never dreams of considering his
laboriously-acquired
knowledge as more than merely an
accessory, not a principal, in the delightful science
he has made his study. The former are, as a
naturalist
would express it, in theatres and at
concerts
common;
the latter is of a species scarce
all over the world.
There may be loftier flightsa higher species of
fame, than that attained or aimed at by the
song-writer
;
but there is no one to whom honor is more
gladly rendered by the mass of mortals. His claims
come into notice, for the most part, in a genial
season
when
friends are met, and the glass and
sentiment
and song go round; when gladness swells
the heart, fancy tickles the brain, and mirth and
good-humor sparkle from the eye;when Bacchus
has almost closed up criticism's venomous optics,
and laid hyper-criticism quietly under the table;
when the fine-strung nerves are exquisitely alive to
all pleasurable sensations;then it is that divine
music, wedded to still diviner poesy, can, in an
instant
,
bid the warm tear start.
Or the smile light the cheek;
and then it is that the memories of the masters of
song are pledged with a fervor that the ethical or
epic poet may despise, but can never either expect
or hope for from the partiality of his cooler
admirers
.
Next to Shakspeare there is no one whose
memory is more fondly treasured than that of
Burns. Independently of being intensely loved and
revered wherever a Scottish accent is heard, social
societies are formed in every country in which his
language is known, to keep that memory fresh
and green. And he well deserves it. Perhaps
his songs are the best ever written. He has not
the polish, the refinement, the exuberance of
imagery
,
or the sparkling fancy of Moore, but he
excels
him in humor and pathos. They are,
however
,
both glorious fellows; and it must be a narrow
heart that cannot find room for admiration of more
than one. If the lyrics of Burns do not, as yet,
strictly come under the designation of old songs,
they at least will do so, for they have the germ of
immortality within them. It is almost impossible
to dream of the time when Auld Lang Syne
will
not
be sung. He had his faults (I am no
Scotchman), and in turning over his pages,
besides
occasional coarseness and bad taste, you
sometimes meet with a verse, that, not to speak it
profanely, bears a striking resemblance to utter
nonsense; for instance, (though what could be
expected
from words to such a tuneRobin Adair!)
Down in a shady walk,
Doves cooing were,
I mark'd the cruel hawk
Caught in a snare:
So kind may fortune be,
Such make his destiny!
He who would injure thee,
Phillis the fair!
But if your admiration of the poet begin to falter
VOL. I. 18
for a moment, perhaps the very next page brings
you to Highland Mary, Ae fond kiss and then we
sever, A man's a man for a' that, Mary
Morrison
,
or, that song without a name commencing
Here's a health to ane I lo'e dear,
Here's a health to ane I lo'e dear;
Thou art sweet as the smile when fond lovers meet
,
And soft as their parting tear
Jessy!
Burns has done for Scottish song what Scott has
done for Scottish historymade it known and
renowned
in every portion of the globe; and had
auld Scotland never produced any other names
of note, these two are amply sufficient to honor and
glorify her through all time.
What are generally known by the name of
Irish songs,the Paddy Whackmeracks, and
Barny Brallagans of the pot-house and the
playhouse
,
bear ten times less resemblance to the
genuine
melodies of the green isle, than even the
majority of regular stage Irishmen do to the
existing
natives. Both are merely broad English
caricatures
.
The soul of Irish music, beyond that
of all other national music, is melancholy. It is,
perhaps, too fine a distinction to draw, but of the
serious melodies of the three nations, perhaps the
English airs are most characterized by mournful
sadnessthose of Scotland by pathos and
tenderness
and
those of Ireland by a wild, wailing
melancholy
,
of an almost indescribable character. But
words are poor expositors in such cases. Let any
one play a few airs from each, and they will
probably
furnish him at once with the distinction here
attempted to be drawn. I would humbly suggest
Coolin, or Silent, oh Moyle, as the strongest
instances I can think of on the part of Ireland.
The English, it is said, have no national melody;
and perhaps this is true of that portion of the
country
from Dover to the borders; but long prior to the
presence of the Normans, who changed the
manners
and injured the pithiness of the language of the
natives, the British had melodies marked by great
simplicity and sweetness. Who does not
remember
the beautiful song, Ayr hyd y nos, familiarly
known as Poor Mary Ann?then there is that
fine air, Of a noble race was Shenkin, and many
others, which may be found in Parry's Welsh
Melodies
.
These are still to be met with in many a
quiet and sequestered glen amid the fastnesses of
Wales, where the harp of the Druids took
sanctuary
,
and where the poetry and melody of that
mysterious sect are still preserved. It is no wonder
that at the inpouring of the heterogeneous and
mercenary Norman flood, the pure native melodies
became corrupted, and were nearly swept away;
yet, notwithstanding, the splendid church music of
the English excites the deep admiration of Europe;
and their glees and madrigals have never been
excelled
.
Purcell, Locke, Jackson, and Arne, have
written many charming melodies: but to come
nearer to the present day, if I may venture an
opinion
,
I would say that justice has scarcely been
done to Shield, a sound, manly composer, who has
left a number of things behind him which really
and truly deserve to live and flourish amid the
mass of musical compositions that, fungus-like,
hourly spring into existence, and as rapidly decay.
The Thorn, Let Fame sound the Trumpet,
Old Towler, Heaving the Lead, Ere round
the huge Oak, and a number of others, if they
cannot justly lay claim to any great degree of
imaginative
beauty, have at least an infusion of genuine
melodya body, ay, and a soul, that will long
preserve them from oblivion.
Shakspeare's songs, for the most part, have been
fortunate in being married to good music; some of
them almost better than they deserve. Whether
in ridicule or not of the song-writers of his time, he
certainly made too liberal a use of the heigh hos
and ninny nonnys. Next to Ariel's pretty fancy,
Where the bee sucks, there lurk I, the one with
the most freedom and lyrical beauty is, to my taste,
Under the Greenwood Tree. But it loses half
its effect when transplanted from the forest of
Arden
,
and sung in a modern room, amid long coats,
cravats, decanters, and etiquette. Neither does it
assimilate better with boisterous mirth and
whiskey
punch. Yet it is an ill-used song, even on the
stage. It is too operatically given. Your Amiens
is generally (like the majority of male
music-mongers
)
a stiff-limbed piece of humanity, who
understands
singing, and little else; he generally takes
his station about four feet from the foot-lamps, and
there, with elongated physiognomy, and one arm
protruded towards the pit, goes through his work
with most clock-like precision. To parody a
beautiful
simile, it is music breathing from a wooden
block; all which is very unlike the free-hearted
lord whom we imagine, throwing himself at the root
of some antique oak, and, in a fine, mellow voice,
trolling forth, until the old forest rang again, his
most joyous invitation. But this may be amended
when, amid the other astonishing improvements of
the times, leading vocalists shall be endowed with
joints and ideas. Next to this, I like the one now
invariably put into the mouth of Rosalind, and
christened
the Cuckoo Song
When daisies pied, and violets, blue.
18*
But your stage Rosalind is generally the reverse of
Amiensan arch, vivacious lass, who imparts due
effect to the mixture of natural images and
domestic
ideas suggested by the saucy words of the
song.
The sea, the battle and the breeze, and the
rapid and manifold vicissitudes incident to the life
of a sailor, furnish a bold and beautiful variety of
subjects capable of being turned to good account in
a song or ballad. Yet, somehow or other, Apollo
does not much affect the quarter-deck. The ocean
brine is too powerful for the waters of Castaly.
Poesy in some sort suffers by a sea-change; and
the quantity to be extracted from a volume of
genuine
naval ditties is wofully disproportionate to
the bulk of rhyme. Some of the best sea songs
have been written by landsmen, and one great
cause of their being so, is their comparative freedom
from perplexing technicalities; for though a
characteristic
phrase may occasionally impart life and
spirit to a production, yet a technicality, whether in
marine or agricultural poetry, is a sore
stumbling-block
to the uninitiated. Now every line (or plank)
of three-fourths of your nautical melodies is calked
with them, independently of containing a much
larger infusion of tar than tendernessof pitch
than pathos. They abound, likewise, in an
inordinate
degree, in descriptions of tornadoes, and
discharges
of artilleryin slaughter and sudden death;
and the sentiments correspond thereunto, being as
rough as a hawser, and as boisterous as a
north-wester
.
Though admirably adapted to be growled
out by the boatswain when the vessel is scudding
under double-reefed topsails, they would on land,
and in a room, go off like a discharge of musketry.
But, worse than all, is the minuteness of detail
the distressing particularity which ever pervades
them. They are mere paraphrases of the log-book;
and the due course and reckoning of the ship is
most especially insisted on
That time bound straight for Portugal,
Right fore and aft we bore;
But when we made Cape Ortugal,
A gale blew off the shore, &c.
Yet, after all, there are some noble things in this
branch of the service, amply sufficient to redeem
it from dislike. Who is there that has not held his
breath when he has heard a rich, deep-toned voice,
commence Gay's glorious ballad
All in the Downs the fleet lay moor'd;
The streamers waving in the wind!
and listened throughout, with a quickened pulse, to
that plain unvarnished tale of humble love and
tenderness. There is much, too, to please any man,
who is not over and above fastidious, in dozens of
Dibdin's vigorous and hearty sketches of a sailor's
hardships and enjoyments, to say nothing of Pearce
and others of inferior note; but from your regular
orecastle narratives, Apollo deliver us!
Things called comic songs, to wit, Four and
wenty tailors all in a row, &c., are, in my mind,
striking exemplifications of the depth of
debasement
of which the human intellect is susceptible.
In whatever way America is, or may become
renowned
,
she will probably never be a land of song;
and for two or three reasons. There are already a
sufficiency of standard songs in the world to answer
all purposes; and she has imported an ample
sufficiency
to supply the varied tastes and caprices of
her musical population. Moore's Melodies are as
common in the cities of the west as in their native
land; and those of Burns are no rarity. The
geography
of the country, too, is strikingly
unfavorable
for indigenous song. Nature has created the
land in one of her most liberal and magnificent
moods, and formed its features on a scale of
grandeur
that is impossible to grasp in this kind of
writing. The ocean-lakesthe mighty riversthe
interminable foreststhe boundless prairies, are all
epic rather than lyrical. How would it sound,
either for rhyme or reason,
On the shores of Mississippi,
When the sweet spring-time did fall!
The idea suggested is too vast. There is no sung
endearing locality about such scenes; and as for
the sweet spring time, it
never
falls on a great
proportion of the shores of rivers whose waters rise
far towards the regions of eternal winter, and roll
through every variety of climate, to those of
everlasting
summer; while the smaller streams, which
correspond in size to the Nith, the Dee or
Bonnie Doon, are ruined by the general
appellation
of crik (creek), which is bestowed upon
them; and to which some such euphonious title as
Big Elk, Buffalo, or Otter, is usually prefixed.
Besides, America is not rich in recollections of the
past. No castles, grim, hoary and dilapidated,
frown upon her heights: no gorgeous abbeys
moulder
in her verdant vales. The joys, and sorrows,
and sufferings of humanity are, as yet, scarcely
impressed upon her soil. She has no records of
feudal strife, of faded greatness, and fond affection
of all tradition loves, and song delights in. Hope
must, in some degree, be to her poets what
memory
is to those of older lands. But the mind of
the song-writer is reminiscentnot anticipative;
and therefore it is, that with whatever species of
fame and greatness America may enrich her brows,
it is probable she will never, in one sense, be
worth an old song.
MORALITYHORSE RACING.
There
is a kind of people who, instead of finding
Sermons in stones, and good in every thing,
are gifted by nature with a peculiar quickness in
perceiving and detecting vice and wickedness in
every variety of form and complexion. They have
an aptitude in raking and scraping together all the
bad which is generally mixed up with worldly
pursuits
and amusements, and of overlooking
whatever
of good may be mingled therewith. Whether
this intimate acquaintance with evil habits and
feelingsthis familiarity with the obliquities of
human nature, is to be accounted for upon the
principle
embodied in the shrewd proverb of set a
thief to catch a thief, ought to be left to people
more charitable in their constructions than
themselves
,
or the verdict would not be at all flattering.
The worst of the matter is, they claim this sharp
perception of the vile and vicious as a sort of merit,
and account it pure stern morality harshly to
censure
what they dislike in the conduct of others.
They take a one-sided view of all things, try them
according to their own standard of propriety, and so
decide that they are altogether right or altogether
wrong: they cannot bring themselves to see that
the web of our life is of a mingled yarn, good and
ill together, that our virtues would be proud if
our faults whipped them not; and our crimes would
despair if they were not cherished by our virtues.
This is rather too reasonable and philosophical a
view of the question for them, and in reason and
philosophy they profess to place but little faith.
These infallible personages have seen or heard
that there are such things as foolishness and
frivolity in ball rooms, and therefore, without taking
into account the innocent mirth and harmless gaiety
which there predominate, they set down balls as
very foolish and frivolous affairs; they have seen or
heard that there are specks of immorality and
dissoluteness
to be met with in a theatre, and
therefore
set down a theatre as a concentration of all
that is dissolute and immoral; they have seen or
heard that blacklegs, vagabonds, sharpers, &c.
attend
race courses, and therefore set down all that
go as blackages, vagabonds, or sharpers. They are
great generalizers, and account a man who stands
and looks at one full-blooded horse running agains
another as a species of monster, incapable of
discharging
the moral and social duties of society.
There has always been a particularly large
quantity
of cant abroad on the subject of morality; and
the foundation of it appears to be laid in an
erroneous
belief of the extreme susceptibility of human
nature to impressions of either good or evil. Men's
morals, like their constitutions, are more permanent
and durable than is frequently imagined, and
neither
so easily destroyed or mended as mental or
medical hypochondriacs would have us believe. A
man beholds a discreditable action or hears a
questionable
speech, and is no worse for it; or he sees a
virtuous action and listens to a lecture containing
the most excellent advice, and is no better for it.
This is the case ninety-nine times out of a
hundred
;
and it takes a long familiarity with either
good or evil to make a permanent impression on
one with any pretensions to stability of character.
Nothing can be more childish than to hear the
advocates
or opponents of the stage, for instance,
endeavor
to settle its general tendency by picking out
little speeches and sentences either for or against
morality; and the mistakes to which this habit of
looking at details and neglecting the sum total have
VOL. I. 19
given rise, are very curious. Many a play, like a
man, has acquired a good character by sounding
words and lip-professions only. An author will
make a well-meaning peer or potentate declaim
upon vice or virtue in the abstract, or in cases far
removed from common life and every-day
occurrences
,
and gain much credit for the excellent
tendency
of his drama; while Gay's Beggar's Opera,
which exposes in plain language the disgusting
selfishness and utter want of feeling and principle
in characters and amid scenes which take place
under our very noses, has been more than once
hissed off the stage for its
immorality!
So much
for consistency.
For my own part I always loved horse-racing,
and even when a child, and the qualities of horses
were totally unknown to me, exhibited an incipient
propensity for betting by making tiny wagers on
the colors of the riders. Since that I have seen
many a race, and never found my health, morals,
or temper any the worse for so doing. It is a
fine sight at all times to look upon a good horse;
but to see one of the noblest of a noble species led
on to the race-course previous to starting, his
polished
skin glancing and glistening in the sun as
he moves gracefully along, is as glorious a picture
of animated nature as a poet or painter would wish
to behold. What fire and expression in his
eye! what a union of strength and beauty in his
finely moulded limbs! How light and elastic his
stepit seems as if it would scarcely crush the
young grass on which he treads. And then to see
him matched with another, or others, like himself
The anxiety you fell about the fairness of the start
the quickened pulse and rapid circulation of the
blood during the race, and the all-absorbing interest
of the final struggle, are indescribable, and I am
sorry for those who have never experienced them.
But then, cry your moralists, this occasions betting,
and betting is gambling. Such a consequence by
no means follows; but admit it for the sake of
argument
.
What is this to the gambling that is
carried
on on 'change, or other high places of
Mammon
?
Is not the cotton trade gambling? Are
not manufacturing speculations gambling? And
is not the banking system gambling, or something
worse? Yet who ever hears of the immorality of
those grave concerns? And as for betting, men
will bet on some subject or other, and a horse-race
is perhaps the very best thing they can exercise
their talents upon,
Most people, till by losing rendered sager,
Will back their own opinions by a wager,
is true enough, and accordingly men bet on all
thingson the death or marriage of their friends
on the election of their magistrateson their own
weight, height, or circumference, or the weight,
height, or circumference of their neighbors. Then
again the consistency of some very good people
who look with horror on the betting of a dollar
whether one horse runs faster than another, yet
who I know invest large sums in lottery
experiments
the
worst, because the most foolish species
of gambling. But the truth is, the world is made
up of people who, as Butler says,
Compound for sins they feel inclined to,
By damning those they have no mind to.
A volume composed of the lives or anecdotes of
celebrated race horses would be an interesting study
to the naturalist, the physiognomist, the
craniologist
,
and the philosopher. A race-horse is an
intelligent
being, and not a mere machine urged
forward
by a man upon its back. Some of them are
as capricious and fanciful as a fine lady, and some
as obstinate and self-willed as a doctor of laws;
while others again are equally as sensible and
knowing as those who bestride them; and from
natural good sense, and long and extensive
experience
,
acquire a fund of practical information and
intelligence on racing subjects. In numerous
qualities
,
not only physical but mental, they are
infinitely
superior to many a biped, whose memoirs
are frequently obtruded upon the public in two
volumes octavo; and I have somewhere read an
epitaph on one, which shows that I am not alone
in my friendly feelings towards these high-spirited
animals.
Here lies entombed beneath this heap of earth,
A gallant horsewhose ancestry or birth,
Though proud, swells not his eulogy: he shone
With genuine worth and virtues all his own.
His generous spirit, that with high disdain
Brook'd not the chiding spur, obey'd the rein:
Meek in his might, though wrong'd, he scorned to deal
Vindictive death-blows from his noble heel;
Sometimes with tame and drooping neck conveyed
The tottering infant or the trembling maid;
With dumb regard his bounteous master viewed,
And told in looks his honest gratitude.
But when the horn's shrill challenge waked the wood,
With ears erect and quivering limbs he stood;
Forward he flew, the vulgar steeds aloof,
The champaign rung beneath his bounding hoof!
Nor cliffs nor chasms his daring course restrain,
And mountains rise and torrents roar in vain.
Sunk is the arch of that aspiring crest,
The mane's proud streamers and the panting breast;
Mangled and mould'ring in one shapeless heap,
Those flashing eyes and thundering nostrils sleep.
Reader, whoe'er thou art, whose manly mind
Bleeds o'er the ashes of thy mortal kind,
Spare but one drop from pity's generous source,
Nor blush to shed it for my gallant horse.
19*
EATING.
He had not dined;
The veins unfilled, our blood is cold, and then
We pout upon the morning, are unapt
To give or to forgive; but, when we have stuffed
These pipes and these conveyances of our blood
With wine and feeding, we have suppler souls
Than in our priest-like fasts.
Shaks
.
Very
true: and if old Menenius did not succeed
in his application to the inflexible Roman to spare
his country, it was not for want of a correct
knowledge
of the acerbity produced by an empty
stomach
,
and the mollifying effects of good victuals
upon the temper; at the same time it presents
strange and mortifying images to the mind of the
littleness of human nature, and the insignificant
causes which are not unfrequently the mainspring
of mighty events. He had not dined, reasons the
old man; and to the degree of flatulency and
acidity
produced in Coriolanus's stomach by his not
having done so, Menenius ascribes his rejection of
the prayers of the grave senators and virgins to
save immortal Rome. It may be that he was right;
and perhaps the fate of the eternal city depended
materially upon as mean a thing as Tullus
Aufidius's
cook! So runs the world away. But the
truth is, since the days of Adam, eating has never
been, for any length of time, out of fashion; and
though abstemiousness is allowed by many to be a
virtue, it is one that has been always more praised
than practised. For my own part, I think it is
rather
an unamiable weaknessa phantom which
haunts the imagination of nervous people,
valetudinarians
,
and such as are continually scheming
how to spin out the thread of a miserable existence
after all their capabilities for pleasure and
enjoyment
have passed away. Besides, it is strenuously
recommended by physicians, and is therefore to be
distrusted, for no man perseveringly labors against
his own interest. Moreover, if the looks and
tables
of our worthy New-York M. D.'s are to be
taken as a criterion, it is quite evident that,
however
they may enforce abstemiousness upon others,
they never set it up to fright themselves. This
is, to say the least, suspicious; and I for one
conscientiously
believe, that if ever water-gruels, weak
broths, or vegetable diet comes into fashion, the
human species will soon fade away from the face
of the earththat living skeletons will be no rarity,
and a man of one hundred pounds a monster of
corpulencythat the poor old world will fall into
an atrophy, and that some future Calvin Edson,
divested of his superfluous flesh, will personify
Campbell's last man!
In literature, eating has always cut a
conspicuous
figure. The old dramatists are filled with soul,
or rather, stomach-felt descriptions of rich luscious
feasts; and though in those days a Ude or a
Kitchiner had not enlightened the world by his
wonderful discoveries, our ancestors were luxurious
rogues notwithstanding. Only see with what
unction
Ben Jonson makes one of his characters sum
up now unheard-of dishes:
I'll have
The tongues of carps, dormice, and camel's heels
Boiled in the spirits of Sol, and dissolved pearl,
Apicius' diet, 'gainst the epilepsy;
My footboys shall eat pheasants, calver'd salmons,
Knots, godwits, lampreys; I myself will have
The beards of barbels served instead of salads;
Oiled mushrooms, &c.
and Fielding and Smollett's heroes are good for
nothing without their dinner; they must have
solid meat and strong drink to invigorate and
stimulate
them for either war or courtship. Feed
them well, or they disgrace themselvesmake love
in a very awkward and insipid manner, and are
apt to have their courage called in question.
After this, came the terrific style of writing, of
which Mrs. Radcliffe was the head, and indeed,
almost the only one worth reading. Novels at this
time were so filled with trap-doors, dungeons,
secret
stair-cases, winding galleries, subterraneous
passages, shrieks, and midnight assassinations,
that it is presumed these horrors entirely took
away the appetites of the persons concerned, for
no mention is made of eating, though from the
frequent
allusions to measures of wine and
reviving
cordials, there is every reason to believe that
the heroes and heroines were addicted to
hard-drinking
,
which habit is bad enough at any time,
but particularly hurtful when indulged without a
reasonable portion of food, as it speedily destroys
the coats of the stomach, and induces a long train
of dreadful disorders. Fair and amiable, therefore,
as these heroes and heroines unquestionably were,
they doubtless ultimately fell victims to the horrid
vice of intemperance, notwithstanding the strength
of their constitutions, which, it must be admitted,
was extraordinary. From all that ever I could
make out in these romances, the ladies, though
described as fair and fragile beings, whom a
summer
wind would inevitably pulverizea compound
of unimaginable perfections and spiritual essences
in white muslinwere able, according to the
author
,
to endure more hardships and privations than
a Highland drover, a North American Indian, or a
Swedish soldier in Charles the Twelfth's time, and,
like a Greenland bear, possessed wonderful
capabilities
for supporting nature for a long period without
nutriment. In my unripe years, when devouring
the delectable pages of Anne of Swansea, or Francis
Latham, the gifted author of Midnight Horrors,
and the Black Forest, often have I marvelled
when the young lady, who was confined in an
uninhabited
part of the castle, and had refused victuals
for several days, was going to take her dinner. I
used to reckon up how long it was since she had
eaten any thing, and draw conclusions from my
own feelings, and this it was that first staggered my
young faith in the truth of novels. When I had
made calculations that she must be nearly starved
to death, I found in the next chapter the old story
over againan aged domestic entered and placed
food before Almeira, from which she turned with
loathing, and lost in a sense of her unparalleled
situation, continued totally abstracted from all
around, &c. Sometimes these heroines absolutely
lived for a month on the smell of a boiled chicken;
and when their prison doors were at last broken
open, and one expected they would be found to be
starved, squalid, miserable-looking wretches, it was
simply stated that they never looked so lovely,
confinement having imparted a delicate and
melancholy
tint to those cheeks which &c. As
Hamlet
says, there is more in this than natural, if
physicians could only find it out. What an
invaluable
wife would one of those ladies make for an
Irish peasant after his potato crop had failed.
Walter Scott, (heaven bless him!) among his
other worthy deeds, has revived the good old
practice
of eating and drinking upon paper. His
personages
,
one and all, with the single exception of
the earl of Glenallen, in the Antiquary, who made
his dinner of vegetables and water! are capital
feeders; they all eat with a relish, and seem to like
what is set before them. There is something
hearty in this, and persons with good digestions
think the better of them for it. Like sensible
people
,
they all do justice to good cheer whenever they
meet with it; and really it is enough to give a
person
an appetite to read the account of honest
Dandie
Dinmont's attack on the round of cold beef,
Waverley's breakfast in Donald Bean Lean's cave,
or the description of the savoury stew prepared by
Meg Merrilies in the kairn of Derncleugh, of which
the worthy Dominie partakes. It is characteristic
of Shakspeare and Scott that they are fond of
introducing
familiar occurrences like these amid their
most wild and romantic scenes, while feebler writers
are afraid to do so for fear of destroying the effect,
or rendering what is already tame or outrageous,
ludicrous.
Of late there is a kind of puppyism sprung up in
discoursing of eating, first generated by some of the
petit-maitre
correspondents of the New Monthly
Magazine. They discourse about the pleasures of
the table in a style of superlative affectation, treat
all solid joints as relics of ancient barbarism, and
all who partake of them as vulgar and John
Bullish
,
learn the names of a dozen or two French
dishes, and make a parade of their love of, and
familiarity with, soups, slops, stews, and kickshaws,
as weak, insipid, and unsubstantial as themselves.
Puppyism in writing and dressing is bad enough,
but puppyism on so solemn and serious a subject
as eating, is carrying the jest a little too far.
ALBUMS.
Ye who in albums are required to write,
Be wise, before you undertake the same;
Remember that whatever you indite,
Remaineth, to your credit or your shame;
That you had better leave the paper white,
Than rack your hapless brains with idle aim;
But, above all things, if the book you take,
Don't wait a year before you bring it back.
Sands
.
Albums
are one of the greatest nuisances of
modern
times. They waylay you, or rather are laid
in your way, in every house in the city, in which
a young lady turned thirteen, happens to reside.
They are as numerous and tormenting as flies at
midsummer, and, like flies at midsummer, the
irritating
evil cannot be grappled with; for, in both
cases, it is apparently so trivial, that all serious
opposition
and resistance become mighty ridiculous.
Yet human happiness is, for the most part, made
up of trifles; and it is to be feared that the
deduction
from the sum total, during the ensuing summer
VOL. I. 20
months, on the score of flies and albums, will far
exceed that created by anxiety for the temporary
welfare of our friends, or our own spiritual
concerns
.
Petty evils and insect troubles frequently
vex a person more than substantial grievances.
The insignificance of an annoyance gives it a
ludicrous
character that is very provoking, and frets
one to think that he can be so easily fretted. Many
a man's nerves are so strung that the tickling of a
straw will set him almost crazy; while a heavy
contusion brings him to his senses, and he smiles
at the pain it occasions. Suppose, for example, a
corpulent, choleric old merchant, preparing to take
his after-dinner nap in an easy chair, on a sultry
day in Augustsuppose sleep gently descending
on his eyelids, and gradually and deliciously
overclouding
his facultiessuppose, at this critical
moment
,
a rascally blue-bottle fly effecting his entrance
into the room, and commencing to amuse itself by
tickling the old gentleman. He hears its ceaseless
buzzing in his ears, and anon feels it promenading
across his forehead, leaving an intolerable itching
wherever it treads. Half asleep and half awake, he
impatiently jerks his head, and for a moment puts
the enemy to flight; but it is only for a moment,
for scarcely has he composed himself to sleep, when
he again feels his friend taking a walk down his
cheek and across his chin; he instinctively attempts
to crush his tormentor, and slaps his own face,
while all the time his nerves are acquiring a
preternatural
irritability. At last, a final attack upon
the sensitive organ of smell puts sleep and patience
to flight, and he starts from his chair in a highly
sublimated degree of rage, chasing the disturber of
his peace around the room in a perfect phrenzy.
Suppose at this instant the door to open, and the
servant to present a letter, informing him of the
loss of a richly-laden vessel. He becomes
immediately
calm and collected. This is a misfortune
worth struggling against. He braces himself up for
the encounter, and determines to bear it like a
man. Thousands meet death with perfect
calmness
,
but we have high authority that
there was never yet philosopher
That could endure the tooth-ache patiently;
However, they have writ the style of gods,
And made a pish at chance and sufferance.
It is the smallness of the evil, which seems so
easily to be got rid of or avoided, but which cannot
be got rid of or avoided, that destroys our
equanimity
;
and, it is upon this ground that albums are
afflictions of the first magnitude. The person who
first invented them has much to answer for. They
and steam-boats are the greatest curses and
blessings
of the present age; the one has been
productive
of as much trouble and inquietude as the other
has of comfort and convenience.
A certain gentleman, who takes ten glasses of
brandy per diem, justifies himself by saying, that it
is not the use but the abuse of stimulants that is
hurtful; and every young lady who keeps an
album
,
at the same time complains that they are
so common. She seems to think that all her sex,
excepting herself, are taking liberties to which they
are not entitled. A respectable widow in this city
has eleven daughters, each of whom maintains an
album; and any unfortunate visitor who is caught
fairly within her doors, may think himself lucky if
he escape with the loss of five effusions. The
senior
portion of these misguided young ladies are
fast verging towards a state of hopeless single
blessedness
,
I am half inclined to believe merely on
account of the cultivation of this pernicious habit.
They have frightened away their oldest friends, and
no male creature ever ventures within their reach.
Indeed, what person in his senses would visit a
house where a yard of poetry was required to be paid
down as a tribute? Though not exactly carried
on to the same extent, there are few dwellings in
New-York into which a person not gifted (or cursed)
with a knack of rhyming can safely venture. It
is in vain that a man of an anti-poetical
temperament
pleads that he is no poet. Never mind,
cry the fair inexorables, any thing will do;
though, at the same time, they expect their victim
to try his very best. The fearful album is placed
before him, he seizes a pen,
Cold drops of sweat stand on his trembling flesh,
and in a fit of desperation he writes himself an
ass, for the amusement of all future visitants.
Now it is unfair that a man should be violently
forced into a state of authorship against his better
judgmentheaven knows there are enough and to
spare who voluntarily expose themselves, and feel
no shame in so doing. To such ought to be left
the filling up of these records of folly.
There is much in a name, and album has
now become a hateful sound; yet the idea is not
in itself bad, of a young and intelligent beauty
preserving the scattered effusions of genius or
memorials
of friendship in this form. It is pleasant
to see such a book carefully cherished, and shown
only as an especial favor to those who may be
thought worthy of looking over its treasured pages;
but to have innumerable volumes of manuscript
scrawls, with which genius and friendship have
no connexion, continually thrust upon youto be
20*
obliged to listen patiently, smilingly, politely, and to
profess yourself pleased with the recitation of two
or three dozen desperate attempts at poesyto have
the beauties of the several compositions pointed out
to you, and to be asked your candid opinion of each,
when you dare not for your soul speak an iota of
truthand in the end to be required to add your
mite to the collection, suppose it be only two or
three verses, are very disagreeable indeed, besides
the disgrace of the thing; for nine-tenths of the
albums are nothing better than discreditable
receptacles
for disreputable pieces of prose and poetry
that cannot, by any stretch of the imagination, ever
hope to attain the dignity of print, or be
incorporated
in a book form in any other shape.
The alarming increase of these plagues has
probably
arisen from that love of flattery which has
been inherent in every man, woman, and child
since the fall; particularly, it is said, in women,
though on that head there may be reasonable
doubts entertained. But certainly in the majority
of cases where a young lady requests you to write
in her album, it is only a more delicate way of
asking
to be flattered. If she be pretty, she likes to
have it put on record; if not, she well knows that
poets never intentionally speak the truth. A
person
in the album-way, will have abundant
opportunities
of seeing the justice of this remark. I have
in their pages met with the most glowing and
outrageous
compliments, and have invariably
ascertained
that they were indited by people as
cold-blooded
as tortoises; so true it is that the
affectation
of passion is ten times as violent and
high-sounding
as passion itself. One is at present lying
before me, a few extracts from which may amuse
the reader.
TO DOROTHY SOPHIA .
Sweet maid! upon thy softly pouting lip
The fragrance of nine thousand flowers are strown;
The bee from thence nectareal dews may sip,
And otto of roses is by far outdone!
Couched in thine eyes one thousand cupids lie,
Singeing their wings among those burning beams
That dart electric fires into each passer by;
Poor things! they cannot fly away, it seems!
Would thou wert mine! ah! at that daring thought
Tumultuous tumults burst my bursting breast
No matterI will soon be where I ought,
The grave will ope, and then I'll be at rest!
Algernon Augustus Wilkinson Price
The following is of a more grave and unhappy
character, and the construction of the blank verse
is almost equal to that of. It displays a fine
vein of morbid feeling, and the insignificant parts
of speech with which the lines terminate, have an
unostentatious and natural effect:
Well, be it so! 'tis no consequence, and
I at last awake from a blissful but
Most deceitful dream of happiness, which
Now is flown for ever. I never will by
Word or look upbraid you, though my peace is
Totally destroyed, and my heart crushed to
Shivers. 'T is the lot of virtue to be
But half appreciated, and so I
Scorn to say a single word about my
Most untoward fate. I soon will be a
Piece of dull and inanimate clay and
All will be well! I've done, but still my
Last and latest prayer shal be forno
Matterfare thee well!
Romeo O. Higgs
.
It will be seen how strictly the amiable author of
the foregoing has adhered to the only sure and
certain
rule of making blank verse, that is, being
particular
in having ten syllables per line. Nothing
is easier, and by attending to this simple rule, an
auctioneer's advertisement may be taken out of
the newspapers, and made into unimpeachable
blank verse without any sort of trouble. The
manner in which Shakspeare and Milton have
occasionally departed from this fundamental
principle
,
is unpardonable. It was my purpose to
give twelve or fifteen pages more of extracts, but I
defer doing so in consequence of the heat of the
weather.
If all, or a portion of the above remarks, should
be offensive to the feelings of any lady who keeps
an album, I hope she will do me the justice to
believe
that I certainly meant
hers
to be an exception
to these general observations.
CONTENTMENT.
There
is perhaps no sounder or more generally
acknowledged axiom than that the value of a thing
is in proportion to its scarcity. This may be one
great reason why contentment has found such
favor in the eyes of the multitude; every one
setting
the highest value on what he had not, and
indifferent to the praise which might be bestowed
upon its virtues and efficacy, so long as he knew
his neighbor no richer than himself. Thus it is,
that this thing, whose intrinsic value (except in a
very limited degree,) is not worth a cent, has, as a
regularly be-praised subject, equalled even
Shakspeare's
Works, Warren's blacking, or La Fayette.
Now I mean to say that as far as the share
contentment
has in the enjoyment a man feels in
eating
his dinner, smoking his cigar, or, after his daily
labor enjoying the comforts of his fire-side, it is a
good; but, I also say, that taken in any extended
sense, it is an evil of the first magnitude. To be
content is to be satisfiedto wish for nothingto
aim at nothing, but to rest satisfied in whatever
situation you may be placed. Now look at the
world as it exists; you will find little or no such
thing, and well it is so. What is it that freights
the shipsbeautifies the citiesencourages the
arts, and promotes the wealth, intelligence, and
importance of a free and enterprising nation?
Assuredly
not contentment. It is a passive principle.
and, as such, man can have little sympathy with
it. He is an active animal. His pleasures lie not so
much in the possession as the pursuit. Is the
merchant
happier when, quitting the din and bustle of
the city, his ships, his freights, and his speculations
he hastens to the enjoyment of rural life, purchases
a beautiful villa, and looking around him, says
within himself I am content. Is he so? no
such thing! He must still busy himself with the
news, the business, and the exchanges; or, let him
look at home, every thing is wrong, every thing
wants improvinga part of his house is misbuilt
his walks are badly laid out, or a clump of trees
spoils his prospect. These are mended, and this
gives rise to new wants, and fresh improvements.
So he goes on, and dies at last amid all the mighty
bustle attendant on the planting of an orchard
the cutting of a canal, or the building of a
greenhouse
.
Perhaps the best personification of
contentment
is a fat London Alderman, seated, after a
plentiful
dinner, in his easy chairhis wine before him
his pipehis optics half closed, and not an idea
in his brain of either past, present, or future. It is
rather to be remarked that it is always confined to
fat, gross men. Contentment and corpulency go
hand in hand. There is no analogy between it and
leanness. A thin contented man is quite a paradox.
Now look at its effects upon human nature. Where
is it that all your bold, fiery, active, daring,
enterprising
spirits are to be found? Is it among your
men of bone and muscle, or your men of fat and
oil? how many
fat
men are there on record that
have ever done a daring deed? Csar disliked
Cassius for his want of the aldermanic
characteristics
.
That Cassius is too thin, he exclaims,
and again, although I fear him not, would he
were fatter.
Had Milton been a contented man, think ye the
world would have been in possession of Paradise
Lost. Had Byron been so, would he have written
Childe Harold? Would a contented man have
painted the Cartoons; or, had Columbus been so,
would he have been the discoverer of America?
No! were contentment to become in any degree
general, its benumbing influence would spread itself
over all the active principles of our nature. Can it
be supposed that such a lethargic thing and the
lofty aspirations of genius could exist in the same
person? No! the nonsense of contentment and
a cottage is prettier in the pages of poetry than
it would be useful in actual life. Look at its
effects upon nations. Was the free and fiery
Spartan
,
or the noble Roman, famed for it? Or, to
come to modern times, is it not notorious that
it is to be found in the greatest degree among the
degraded serfs of a Russian autocrat? there is not
in the world a more contented class of men, or who
have less wish to change their situations than the
Russian peasantry. It does and can only exist
with ignorance, and where man is free and in
possession
of his active faculties it flies from him.
END OF VOL. I.